Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
72

Author
Dennis Schwartz

BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, THE (director: Daniel Myrick; screenwriters: Daniel
Myrick/Eduardo Sanchez; cinematographer: Neal Fredericks; cast: Heather
Donahue (Heather the director ), Michael Williams (Mike the sound guy),
Joshua Leonard (Josh the cameraman), 1999)
There is something to be said about simplicity: it is unencumbering. To
shoot a film about a weekend excursion, shot in 16mm and on a high-8
video hand-held camcorder and have it shown in theaters, as the picture
jumps back and forth during the entire film, making it really annoying
to view, and have the audience be understanding about this, means that
this film, shot as if it were a true documentary, has captured something
genuine on screen that an audience is craving for. It also should move
it into cult film status for these 5 Central Florida University film
school students (3 actors,writer and director), who should be proud of
their achievement, accomplished by having a sound idea and made without
hardly any money for its production; the only other thing needed by them
was the conviction to do their own thing and in their own way.
Heather Donahue (Heather the director ), Michael Williams (Mike the
sound guy), Joshua Leonard (Josh the cameraman), play the three young
people on camera who hike through Maryland's dark woods in search of
finding out more about the legend of the Blair Witch
(Elly Kedward, found guilty of sorcery in 1785 and lashed to a tree
during a harsh winter). The film begins by announcing the disappearance
in the woods of "Burkittsville Maryland" of these three documentary
filmmakers in 1994, and the film presents itself as what the camera
shows was left behind after their disappearance. As we watch the footage
from the evidence recovered, we know as much about the legend as the
youngsters knew when they went out on their trek. The horrors come about
when we see how their expressions change from one of horseplay and
showing off their purchases of junk food and the good feelings they have
to one another, to one of real fear and anger with each other. It is the
horror on their faces and the way their expressions show real
apprehension that give this film a different twist to it than the usual
horror story, which, too often, relies on special effects. It matters
not what is seen along the way or how well they are acting, professional
actors could not have done a better job. What is really scary to see, is
how panic stricken they are when they realize they are really lost in
the woods, that they have little chance of getting out on their own and
are in need of a rescue party to find them. This makes the last minute
of the film the most haunting part of it. It sticks with you well after
viewing it, as you wonder what could have happened to them. It reminded
me somewhat of "Picnic at Hanging Rock", that film also effectively left
the disappearance up to the imagination and did not dwell on the details
of the children's demise. This method of filming mysterious
disappearances, proves to be an interesting way of handling it,
especially when you don't have much in your budget and your story is
razor thin.
The flaws in this project are that it was like going on the trek
yourself, walking over bumpy logs, getting wet, and feeling cold and
uncomfortable, and listening to all those snidish remarks and whining
that came out of the three. I would not like to see other films made
this way, or see a follow-up to this film, a film that lucked out and
became an enormous commercial success, which should make "big time"
movie producers drool with envy. This film, just happened to capture the
spirit of the project and was done in a satisfying way so as to reassure
us that we were seeing something that appeared to be genuinely creepy.
Follow-up films rarely capture the same spirit, and by correcting the
jumpy camera would not, necessarily, enhance the film. This film did
what it had to do and should be savored as the popular cult film it is
or will certainly become. It made a virtue out of shooting a low-budget
and unsophisticated story in the raw.
The other thing the film didn't do, was give us enough information about
the legend. I would have felt more toward the effort, if I had more of a
story and some more pertinent dialogue to go along with the scariness of
the film. It was also hard on the ears to hear their conversations, both
because of the poor sound quality and their endless ramblings,
punctuated only by profanity. But this is overwritten by their excellent
use of the forest itself, its twigs (designed to give the film its
terrifying logo) and rocks and darkness, as in one sense the area was
found to be beautiful, but when things went wrong, an ugliness of mood
and environment set in, giving the film all the props they would need to
make this horror film scary. I would give it an A if it was shown to a
film school class and held up as an example of how to make an innovative
film on practically nothing. But as a professional offering, I would be
more critical, and my overall discomfort in watching the film would have
me lower the grade significantly. Though I do heartily recommend this
film for the more adventurous sorts, and feel it is difficult to
evaluate because of the thinness of the story and such, yet it has an
appeal to it that goes beyond what we ordinarily look for in a film.
That something special is what draws us to this film, but not to a point
where we remain uncritical of it.
The film leaves the elements of mystery about it, as its ending is very
much connected to its beginning interview scenes of the locals, which
should provide many provocative responses from the enthusiasts of this
film, who will add mystery onto the mystery for this most dizzying and
engaging film... Incidentally, I did feel like I was motion-sick when I
left the theater. I wonder how many others felt that way!
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     There is a paradox in filmmaking.  The viewer goes to a film to
see an experience, but ironically not really to share the experience.
We as viewers want to see the story, but we do not really want to
participate in the experience.  The filmmakers we consider to be the
best do not make realistic films.  These great stylists of cinema are
mostly people that rather than making a film real for us make it
unreal.  The most real film is crude footage right out of a hand-held
camera.  Even using Steadicam is stepping away from reality. As we look
at he world our head bobs and jerks.  Steadicam smoothes out the bobs
and jerks making the resulting film less real.  A rare few films use
crudity and a lack of style to make the film more real for the viewer.
THE NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD is an effective horror film, not because a
great stylist polished it but because it looks like it is not polished
at all.  It is shot in black and white and photographed crudely.  It
does have music, but it is the music that the filmmakers could get free
and the music is rough.  Color and a lush orchestral score are a
distraction.
     As I write this review there are two horror film in wide release.
The remake of THE HAUNTING is a highly glossy film with great special
effects and images from the imagination of an artist.  THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT on the other hand is shot primitively with hand-held cameras
and has almost no music.  And that lack of style makes the film seem
all the more real.  By showing almost nothing of the menace in the
story it allows the viewer's mind complete freedom to imagine the
threat.  In fact THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT--perhaps coincidentally--very
nearly follows the rules of Dogma 95.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT was made
on a very tiny film budget, and it is made with almost no stylistic
tricks.  In fact it has no style whatsoever to distance the viewer from
the action.  That makes it the most effective horror film we have seen
in years.
     The plot of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is obvious from the first
minutes of the film.  We are told at the very beginning of the film
that in October 1994 three student filmmakers, Heather Donahue, Michael
Williams, and Joshua Leonard (played by Heather Donahue, Michael
Williams, and Joshua Leonard) were making a film.  They went into the
Maryland woods near Burkittesville to shoot a documentary about a local
legend, the Blair Witch.  They never came out of that woods and we are
told a year later their film footage was found.  We don't even know how
it is supposed to have been unearthed.  But we are seeing the raw film
footage they shot.  It is clear from the beginning that they were
incompetents and should not be out in the wild by themselves.  It is
not hard to guess what trouble they found in the woods and what caused
them not to come back.  The film spends the rest of its short 85-minute
length showing the viewer what was expected to happen did happen.  This
is not a great plot.  It is almost no plot at all, in fact.  The viewer
knows what is going to ensue and just sits there to see it happen and
to pick up the details.  Yet just seeing it all happen without having
the filmmaker interpose style between the viewer and the story makes
this film an experience so immediate and intense that people are
walking out of the film rather than subjecting their nerves to the
film.  The special effects in this film are all mostly sound effects.
They are all easy to create, but they tap into a basic fear of being
vulnerable in the woods, in the night, in the dark (to paraphrase both
versions of THE HAUNTING).  This is a film that will tap into some very
basic fears.
     The film is written, directed, and edited by Daniel Myrick and
Eduardo Sanchez. It is a Haxen Films production (probably named for the
classic 1922 Norwegian film documentary HAXEN, meaning "Witches").  The
three main characters apparently play themselves.  According to the
publicity most of the dialog is improvised, giving it a real immediacy.
Apparently they were given a rough plot outline and identifying with
the characters they argued among themselves in a sort of role-playing
game.  I would bet that the scenes were filmed in very much the order
that we see them in the film to make easier the slow build in the
actors' hysteria.  The reported cost of shooting the film was $20,000,
but the film is playing to full houses.  It is the kind of trick that
probably can be done effectively only once, though THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT is bound to have imitators.  This is a film of incredible
intensity.  It has no sex, no violence, a fair amount of medium-strong
language, but less than a lot of other films in theaters.  Yet it is
too strong for even some of the adults seeing the film.  I rate it an8
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  In case
there is any confusion the film THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, the television
documentary "The Curse of the Blair Witch," and any legends or
historical factoids found in either are complete fictions created for
the film.  A possible exception is the television description of the
backgrounds of the three film students who were real people and played
themselves in the film.  There never was a Blair Witch or an attempt to
do a serious documentary about her.
     Dogma 95 is a European film movement founded by Danish filmmaker
Lars von Triers.  It is intended to bring film back to a more natural
sort of filmmaking. THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT follows, as far as I can
tell, the first seven of the rules and breaks the last three.  However,
its compliance with so many of the rules of Dogma 95 may be purely
coincidental.  The following are the rule of Dogma 95.
     I swear to submit to the following set of rules drawn up and
confirmed by DOGMA 95:
     1. Shooting must be done on location. Props and sets must not be
brought in (if a particular prop is necessary for the story, a location
must be chosen where this prop is to be found).
     2. The sound must never be produced apart from the images or vice
versa. (Music must not be used unless it occurs where the scene is
being shot).
     3. The camera must be hand-held. Any movement or immobility
attainable in the hand is permitted. (The film must not take place
where the camera is standing; shooting must take place where the film
takes place).
     4. The film must be in color. Special lighting is not acceptable.
(If there is too little light for exposure the scene must be cut or a
single lamp be attached to the camera).
     6. The film must not contain superficial action. (Murders,
weapons, etc. must not occur.)
     7. Temporal and geographical alienation are forbidden. (That is to
say that the film takes place here and now.)

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Running Time: 87 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 30, 1999
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods
near Burkittsville,
Maryland, while shooting a documentary.  One year later, their footage
was found.  Thus
begins The Blair Witch Project, one of the best (yet extremely
frustrating) thriller/horror
movies to be released in a long, long time.
As this ultra low budget movie begins we follow the doomed film crew
consisting of Heather the director (Heather Donahue), Josh the
cameraman (Joshua Leonard), and Mike the sound guy (Michael
C. Williams) getting ready to begin their documentary.  They set out
to the town of Burkittsville, Maryland and begin to interview the
locals about an urban legend of sorts...  the story of the Blair
Witch.  Various soundbites are gathered, and then on day two the crew
sets off into the woods.  They are never seen again.  The audience
however, vaguely gets to see what happened to them over the next few
days, thanks to Heather's inexplicable urge to film every terrifying
moment of their ordeal.
All of the critical praise this film is getting might just work
against it with the casual moviegoer.  In countless ads and reviews
the word "scary" is used over and over again.  "It's scary as hell."
"The scariest movie ever."  Saying the film is scary is only going to
frustrate the casual moviegoer who is expecting Poltergeist or The
Haunting.  There are no special effects, no scary music, and no
monsters.  Don't get me wrong though, it is CREEPY as hell (especially
the film's final 30 seconds or so).
However slight, there is actually a difference between scary and
creepy.  A scary movie would be something that makes you jump or even
scream out loud, either by genuine terror or through those cheesy
music cues when a cat jumps out of nowhere.  A creepy movie like The
Blair Witch Project sets the stage for something scary to happen...
but ultimately never delivers.  Nothing ever makes you jump and
nothing ever makes you scream, even though the stage is fully set for
that to happen at any given moment.
Now let me give credit where credit it due.  When The Blair Witch
Project tries to be creepy it succeeds masterfully.  As the crew
settles down each night to sleep, that's when things start to get
creepy.  Basically, whenever the sun goes down, get ready to almost be
scared.  That's mainly what kept frustrating me though.  Sometimes the
night would go by too quickly.  If Heather is going to insist on
continuing to film these now nightmarish conditions they are being
exposed to, you would think that there would be more of these night
scenes.  Instead, there's more of the "human drama" which takes place
during the daytime.
The three principle cast members are all new to the film world, and
all are very good here.  I'm sure the casting was based simply on
budgetary constraints, but the film just wouldn't have been as
effective with any familiar faces.  As a result of the casting, you
feel like you're watching a real documentary.
In today's day and age of whiz bang CGI effects and no-brainer Kevin
Williamson crud, I'm all for the "less is more" approach for the
horror genre.  The Blair Witch Project takes that a step further,
opting for the "nothing is even less than less is more, so we'll give
you nothing" approach.  The filmmakers lull you into a false sense of
security with the first half of the film, which is basically just a
humorous story about low budget documentarians.  Then the creepiness
sets in which is very effective, but as I said it ultimately never
pays off.  We know just as much about what happens to these people
when the movie begins as we do when the final credits roll.  In a way
that bothers me, but the movie is entertaining and original enough to
make me overlook it's non-payoff.
Artisan Entertainment (the distributor of the film) has set up an
EXTENSIVE and very cool web site for The Blair Witch Project.  Check
it out.  Also, there's a special hour long documentary airing on The
Sci-Fi Channel called Curse of the Blair Witch that actually manages
to blur the lines between reality and the fantasy of this movie even
further.  [R]
Chuck Dowling -- chuckd21@leading.net
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
Christian Pyle
The Blair Witch Project
Written and Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez 
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Official Sites: http://www.blairwitch.com/  (mythology-recommended!)
http://www.artisanent.com/blairwitch/  (trailers, screensavers, comic book,
etc.)
http://www.blairwitchdirect.com/  (merchandise)
Grade: A-
Horror films have often proven that Less is More.  Many classics of the genre
have been made on relatively small budgets:  "The Last House on the Left," "The
Night of the Living Dead," "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre," "Assault on Precinct
13," "The Hills Have Eyes," "Halloween."  Even "Psycho" could join the list;
Alfred Hitchcock chose to make his first true horror film on a small budget to
limit studio interference.
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez's low-budget indie "The Blair Witch Project"
is the ultimate expression of the Less is More principle.  It follows this rule
not only in its method of production but also in what it shows-or, more
accurately, doesn't show-the audience.
By now, you've read the words that open "The Blair Witch Project."  They appear
on the posters, on the webpages, and in the trailers:
One year later their footage was found.
The movie the follows is supposed to be the recovered footage that three
college students-Heather, Mike, and Josh (apparently using their real
names)-made as a project for their film class.  Their subject is the local
legend of the Blair Witch, a ghostly figure who lives deep in the Black Hills
Forest and inspires the murders of children.  After some preliminary interviews
with Burkittsville (formerly Blair) residents about the legend, the trio sets
out into the woods armed with a Hi-8 video camera, a CP-16 film camera loaded
with black & white film, DAT sound equipment, and camping gear.
For the first quarter of the film the three students have a lot of fun playing
with their equipment.  They record themselves drinking, film a study of Mike's
sporadic chest hair, and try to catch Heather peeing.  This is all so real that
it's almost tedious except for the ominous knowledge that they won't be coming
back from this trip.
Before long, they're lost in the woods, and the map is gone.  There are
terrifying noises in the night and ritualistic warnings to leave.  Unlike most
teens in horror films, these three would be happy to leave if they could only
find the way back.  
After seeing "The Blair Witch Project," I'm not surprised that recent exit
polls have shown widespread audience dissatisfaction.  It's an experimental
film, and it doesn't offer what the average moviegoer is seeking.  When I saw
the ending I was initially disappointed myself, but my reaction was the result
of mistaken expectations.  
To continue this line of discussion, I have to wander in to SPOILER territory,
kids.  So, you might want to TURN BACK NOW.  
Watching "Blair Witch" can be as frustrating as it is frightening.  What we see
and hear is what would be recorded by three amateur filmmakers out in the
woods.  Most of the movie is shot by Heather with the small video camera which
lacks the definition we usually see in theatrical releases.  Some shots are out
of focus, others are shot in total darkness.  The sounds in the distance are
hard to make out.  Important events happen when the cameras aren't running.
Most frustrating of all for many horror fans, we don't see the witch.  In
"Danse Macabre," Stephen King said that one of the most terrifying monsters can
be "the monster behind the door."  He cautioned, though, that the writer can
never open that door because regardless of how awful the actual monster is, the
reader was expecting something worse.  However, the recent reactions to "Blair
Witch" suggest that not opening the door may leave the audience just as
disappointed, especially in a visual medium like film.
So, where do I get off giving it an A-?  Partly because I admire its audacity. 
Making a movie that suggests rather than shows takes guts.  The choice to film
most of the movie with a small camcorder is not only brave but also clever; in
part, "Blair Witch" is an examination of the technology that liberates
creativity (with video cameras widely available, almost anybody can make a
movie) but also obscures as much as it reveals (details in the movie's
low-definition video images are difficult to decipher).
>From Blair Witch's internet promotion, I expected a movie with the raw
intensity and gut-wrenching imagery of  "The Last House on the Left" or "The
Texas Chainsaw Massacre."  However, that's not what "Blair Witch" offers.  It
has only the slightest touch of gore and violence.  However, "Blair Witch"
still packs a punch-it's just that its intensity lies in the subtle way it
works on the viewer's mind rather than in horrific images.  While I was
watching the movie, I did not think it had affected me at all, but when I got
home I turned on the lights in every room.  The effect lasted until the next
night.  An really good horror film doesn't just scare you; it crawls inside
your head and rearranges the wiring.
One last aspect of interest:  "The Blair Witch Project" takes a step toward the
interactive multimedia that will doubtless be the dominant artform of the next
century.  It's website ">http://www.blairwitch.com/> takes the position that all
of the events depicted in the film are true and expands on the mythology of the
Blair Witch legend and on the search for the missing filmmakers.  It offers
photos of and interviews with characters who don't appear in the film and even
Real Video of television coverage of the search.  The mythology will be further
explored in a television documentary ("The Curse of the Blair Witch" on the
Sci-Fi Channel), a "true crime" book, and a comic book.  In other words, the
movie is only part of a larger work.  That is a situation quite different from
the familiar pattern of a movie based on a novel or a comic book adaptation of
a movie; those "tie-ins" retell the same story in a different format.  Expect
to see more movie/book/web/video projects which ask the audience to explore
different forms of media to get the whole story and which give the viewer more
choice in how to conduct that exploration.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Rarely does a film live up to its hype quite the way this one does.
Blair Witch roared out of Sundance with buzz calling it the scariest
movie ever made.  I am prepared to not only back up that statement, but
to add that it will likely be the scariest movie that will ever be
made.  At least in my lifetime.  And I'm relatively young.
This isn't your average teen slasher flick with a cast raided from the
ranks of the WB.  Blair Witch is an extremely low-budget experiment by
first-timers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez.  Their premise is
simple: Three student filmmakers venture into the woods near
Burkitsville, Maryland to make a documentary about a local legend known
as the Blair Witch.  They are never seen again and what the viewer is
watching is their film footage, which has just been recovered one year
later.
Don't let the trailers fool you  only the last five seconds of them are
culled from the film.  The rest has all been added to make the incident
seem more dramatic and real, which it's not.  Well, it's not really
real.  The film you're watching is the actual film shot by these three
kids.  The directors sent them into the woods armed with a home video
camera, a 16mm black-and-white camera and a DAT recorder, with only
vague directions and no real idea of what might happen to them.  So you
see and hear everything that happens as it happens.  It is more
improvising then acting, and when these people are terrified, they are
genuinely terrified.
The film begins slowly, but once it takes off, you'll be on the ride of
your life.  Blair Witch opens with the kids interviewing local residents
of the small town about their knowledge of the legend.  Then they
venture off into the forest with the intention of spending a couple of
days and nights filming a few of the places where the Blair Witch was
reported to have wreaked havoc on innocent townsfolk that dared venture
into her woods.  They see the graves of several children, and they find
the rock from which several fishermen reportedly disappeared.
The first night is uneventful  Josh thinks he heard something, but the
others (Heather and Michael) just laugh it off, thinking that he's just
trying to spook them.  The next night, the sound is louder and heard by
all three.  By the third night, the group has lost their map, has no
idea of their location are and literally run screaming from their tent
as something appears to be attacking it from the outside.  Then it gets
really scary.  Hell, `scary' isn't a strong enough word.  I don't think
a strong enough word exists.  There are no scary monsters, splattered
blood or musical crescendos to make you jump, but I still found my heart
pounding out of my chest, my hands covering my mouth and my stomach
nauseous.  And I love scary movies.
The ending of the film is so disturbing that it can't be described.
It's been several weeks since I've seen the film and I still can't get
Heather's screaming out of my head.  She doesn't seem to be acting; it
sounds like the actual screams of a person that thinks she's going to
die.  It's more than a little sick, but it's more effective than
anything you've ever seen or heard.  When the credits rolled, I sat
slumped on my seat with my mouth hanging open, thunderstruck from what I
had just witnessed.  It took me several seconds to realize that I wasn't
breathing.  And I wanted to see it again.  Immediately.
Do not miss this film for any reason.  See it at night.  Park in an
isolated spot in the back of the theater and try not to soil yourself as
you walk back to your car.  This isn't Scream, where you were laughing
on the way home.  This is serious, hardcore terror and is definitely not
for the weak-hearted.  (1:29 - R for language and psychological horror
that you will never be able to escape.  Ever)

Author
Bob Bloom

 The Blair Witch Project (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard. Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez.
 So few events live up to their advanced hype that it's a pleasure to
report that "The Blair Witch Project" indeed fulfills all the expectations
created by the past several months of buzz.
 "The Blair Witch Project," a small independent movie about a trio of
filmmakers who disappear in the woods of Maryland, is one of the most
harrowing films you will ever have the fortune of viewing.
 The movie follows a basic tenet of filmmaking: Put ordinary people in
ordinary surroundings, create an extraordinary situation and see what
happens.
 As human beings, our most primal fear is of the unknown - of those things
that go bump in the night. We may sense something, even believe we hear it,
but if it remains unseen, our imagination becomes our worst enemy. It runs
rampant with dread, creating worst-case scenarios that can drive a person
mad.
 And that is the genius of "The Blair Witch Project." It plays upon those
fears like a violin virtuoso plucking at our nerves, assaulting our senses.
 What makes "The Blair Witch Project" so frightening is its understanding
of the mundane, of normalcy. The movie is not set on some alien planet or
in some dank, dark castle in a distant land. It's here in the woods.
 And the woods, for the most part, are associated with pleasurable
experiences - camping, hiking, sex.
 Scorning the use of special effects, filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez utilize rocks and sticks to generate an unsettling atmosphere of
suspense, which slowly but continually builds: first to curiosity, then to
dread, up to fear and ultimately to outright horror.
 "The Blair Witch Project" is the quintessential independent movie. - shot
on a shoestring budget, relying heavily on improvisation. It is ragged and
dizzying, and this rawness - again - contributes to the overall uneasiness
that multiplies as the film careens to its abrupt climax.
 The trio of actors - Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
- were given camera equipment and sets of instructions by Myrick and
Sanchez, turned loose in the woods and were allowed to improvise most of
their dialogue.
 This illusion of reality permits them an enhanced sense of hysteria as
they stumble lost through the forest, which becomes more foreboding as the
movie progresses.
 Their dialogue is not Shakespeare, consisting mostly of "We're lost,"
"Where the fuck are we?", "What's that?" as well as intermittent arguments
as they take turns accusing each other of incompetence and placing all
their lives in jeopardy.
 They curse and swear at each other while continuing to cling together for
safety.
 The true-to-life manner in which they deliver their inane lines only adds
to the realism and the horror of their predicament.
 The three actors start off self-assured, almost cocky, and by the end are
babbling, frightened children.
 "The Blair Witch Project" is not for the faint hearted, yet it is neither
explicitly violent or bloody. It is nerve-wracking and intense. It is not a
movie you want to see alone.
 I saw "The Blair Witch Project" at a midnight screening. When I arrived
home and climbed out of my car, I know I walked a little more briskly than
usual to get into my house. The movie will cause you to do the same.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
MOVING DOWNTOWN, 8/11: 434A Main St., Lafayette, IN 47901
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Author
Eugene Novikov
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard. Rated R.
The Blair Witch Project will go down in the books as one of independent
filmmaking's biggest triumphs because of the extent which it has broken
through to the mainstream. Not only has it gotten an inordinate amount
of unabashedly positive reviews from critics but in its first few weeks
of limited release it has also achieved commercial success of gargantuan
proportions. Whether this $20,000 project can attain box-office bliss by
studio standards remains to be seen, but, if nothing else, it's already
a cult hit.
Popularity is fine, but is the movie any good? That's unrelated to its
Hollywood status and it demands more thoughtful discussion. It's
certainly original -- I've never seen anything like it. But does it have
any cinematic merit? Is it junky fun or is it a serious movie? This is
one of those films, I think, where the answers to all of these questions
are solely in the eye of the beholder -- and that's okay. What seemed to
me clearly true, however, is that this is no masterpiece of American
cinema: it is far too flawed to attain that status even though many fans
and even some critics, who have gone off the deep end, insist the
opposite.
Three student filmmakers -- Heather, Josh and Mike go on a hike into
Maryland woods to film a documentary on the Blair Witch, a local urban
legend. They disappear. A year later their footage is found. The Blair
Witch Project is that footage and nothing but that footage. They film
the whole trip, from the interviews they do with people in a Maryland
town to the hike. When one of them loses the all-important map they are
lost in the middle of nowhere with something mysterious and frightening
on their tail.
Inevitable tensions escalate within the group. Josh and Mike are furious
at Heather for refusing to turn the camera off and and focusing on their
dire situation. Heather and Josh are furious at Mike for apparently
kicking the map into a creek. Their desperation and refusal to cooperate
with each other threatens to destroy them. So, evidently, does the Blair
Witch.
The Blair Witch Project is constantly creepy and occasionally unnerving
but up until the gut-wrenching climax its format prevents it from being
genuinely scary and even then it seems to dilute it somewhat. It's a
grand idea -- making a movie solely filmed with a hand-held camera by
its characters -- but it has its drawbacks. All too often it's slightly
hard to tell what's going on because, understandably, the camera doesn't
stay steady when the people behind it are in hysterics. It's very
difficult to argue that being sure of what's happening is scarier than a
menace unknown, which is why something like The Game or the best of
Hitchcock's stuff is always more frightening than any slasher movie.
Tense anticipation makes the "boo" moment anticlimactic. Still, when the
viewer is utterly confused (which, luckily, happens only in a few
instances here) horror films tend to have less effect.
The dialogue, much of it improvised (the directors sent the actors alone
into the woods to film the movie), surprisingly comes off as realistic.
It's not particularly witty but it seems to resemble what real people
would utter in that kind of situation; it never feels fabricated or
manipulative. Profanity abounds but hey -- would you expect anything
less from three mightily pissed-off young college students?
Some will insist that even adequate execution of such brilliantly
original idea is enough to make this movie a milestone in cinema;
especially horror cinema. I disagree strenuously. It's enjoyable stuff
but folks, it's nothing to write home about. The climax approaches
terrifying and it contains many suspenseful, well-made sequences but by
the same token The Blair Witch Project is inconsistent, confusing and
unevenly paced. In a word (three, actually, but never mind): hit and
miss.
This nifty little film gets off to a slow start (to the extent that is
possible in a film running barely over 80 minutes) and drags through
some of its first half. But when it's going, it's good. Crafty,
visionary and enjoyable, this may not be a masterpiece, but it's a
refreshing digression from the pretension that indie filmmaking tends to
represent and from the horror movie clichés that make this movie's
companions so dull.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
www.CrankyCritic.com
    Syndicated in South America and Japan by Entertainment Drive
 (In rotation) Fax Message:
CrankyCriticŽ on the web: www.crankycritic.com; www.filmfrenzy.com;
www.ofcs.org; www.edrive.com
CrankyCriticŽ syndicated to South America and Japan by Entertainment
Drive
CrankyCriticŽ on TV: in rotation on CNN Saturday Morning
CrankyCriticŽ on radio: Fridays on techedgeradio.com. Commercial
syndication is in negotiation. Really.
Chuck Schwartz/ CrankyCritic.com  223 East 61st Street  Apt 5B  New
York, NY 10021
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: The Blair Witch Project
not rated, 87 minutes
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
website: www.blairwitch.com
IN SHORT: The buzz was better than the movie.
Cranky has written before of how those of us who make our living
reviewing movies are a small, compact community, who share the buzz on
"small" or independent flicks that may otherwise be overlooked. Over the
last six months there's been major buzz about a no-name flick -- that
means no star actors or production folk. It's no reflection on talent --
called The Blair Witch Project. Word was this documentary style horror
flick was tremendous, which explains the packed house in the screening
room when we got our first look at the flick this past June.
The story concept was great: Three budding filmmakers, Heather Donahue
(director), Michael Williams (sound), and Joshua Leonard (camera) are
shooting a documentary on an 18th century "witch" named Elly Dedward
when they vanish forever into a Maryland woods. A year later, their film
and tape is found and is edited into a coherent form by the team of
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, revealing the physically
deterioration and psychological self-destruction of eight lost days
during which the group finds themselves hunted by an unknown entity.
The only problem is, the history of the "Blair Witch" isn't well
documented in the film. The "filmmakers" spend more time focussing on a
1940s child killer who stalked the town and don't make a strong link
between that "possession" and others that have occurred over the past
two centuries (I'll get back to that). Residents of the town of
Burkittsville (formerly Blair) are interviewed about what they know of
the witch or the killer in the first half of the film that is very
entertaining. Once they get lost in the woods, and I'll not give most of
that away, the film begins to feel like something that was made up on
the spot.
Which it was. Myrick and Sanchez gave the three actors film and video
equipment to shoot with and story notes from which they were then left
to improvise. The net result are scenes that sometimes look totally
natural, and sometimes look like a bunch of scenery chewing. "Mike" goes
through mood swings that a) make you wish he had brought a Valium drip
with him and b) detract from the better than usual improv job done by
"Heather" and "Josh". That pair are more consistent in their
characterizations but the overall picture just isn't scary.
No one ever implied that BWP was a slice 'n' dice flick. If that's what
you expect in your scareflicks, you won't like this.
This is one of the few times that the website is a vital resource, and
more entertaining, than the film. There's a tremendous amount of
material documenting the "witch" or the alleged possessions (there are
more than one). Having the background details down cold will help fill
in the gaps for you and may raise the tension levels high enough that
you get a fright or two. Cranky got the material just before his
screening, and knowing the details only pointed out the failure of the
improvisations.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Blair Witch Project, he would
have paid...
and, as we used to say in school, an "A" for effort. The sum of the
parts do not make for an enthralling whole.
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Blair Witch Project (1999)
Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard, Bob Griffith, Jim King,
 Sandra Sanchez, Ed Swanson, Patricia Decou. Screenplay by Eduardo 
Sanchez and Daniel Myrick. Directed by Sanchez and Myrick. 87 minutes.
Rated R, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
"The Blair Witch Project" opens with a title card that reads "In October 
of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods near 
Burkittsville, Maryland while shooting a documentary. A year later their 
footage was found." That's all you really need to know before viewing 
this ingenious, extremely creepy horror movie. Shot with two shaky hand-
held cameras on a shoestring budget, "The Blair Witch Project" works 
because the creators remembered that the most effective of all special 
effects is the human imagination. 
With very little money (roughly $25,000) to work from, filmmakers Eduardo 
Sanchez and Daniel Myrick decided to turn lemons into lemonade, 
constructing a storyline that would transform their financial and 
technical limitations into assets. The result is a "mockumentary" about 
the shooting of a documentary. 
Heather Donahue, a film student and aspiring director, sets off to 
explore the legend of the Blair Witch, an 18th century woman who 
supposedly haunts the Black Hills Forest of Maryland, periodically 
reaching out from the netherworld to strike at those who trespass on her 
domain. Heather is accompanied by two fellow students: cameraman and 
friend Joshua Leonard and sound operator Michael Williams. While Joshua 
shoots documentary footage on 16mm black and white film, Heather records 
virtually everything on video, for use in a "The Making Of" feature about 
their movie.
After playfully filming each other and interviewing some locals, the trio 
heads off to search for the sight where the legend began, only to get 
lost in the woods. Hours grow into days, supplies grow scarce, tensions 
increase, and then the kids start hearing these strange noises... 
Setting the story in 1994 was smart. While firmly in our high-tech age, 
the year predates, just barely, the current climate where having a pocket 
cell phone is de rigueur for those under 30, so the idea of the three 
truly being cut-off from the outside world is plausible. Yet 1994 is 
recent enough to encompass the mentality of shows like "The Real World," 
so Heather's insistence on keeping the cameras running even when the 
situation becomes extremely dire is not that much of a stretch. After all,
 the more dangerous things get, the more important it is to continue 
filming because, as the "Real World" mindset goes, we are all potential 
stars if, and only if, our lives provide enough high drama.
The casting of Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard was 
equally inspired. All three actors (their actual names are used in the 
film, adding to the "is this real?" mystique) have a genuine quality 
crucial in making the production seem believable. Heather is determined, 
over-confident and a bit pushy; required traits for a director-in-the-
making. When she tapes an introduction to the documentary, her delivery 
is self-conscious and a tad stilted, exactly what one would expect from a 
student filmmaker. 
Even though he is working with a friend, Joshua remains reticent, clearly 
more comfortable filming the action than being a part of it. As the 
outsider, Michael is the wild card of the group. The extremely likable 
young man does his best to cooperate with the others, despite his 
discomfort at being stuck in the middle of nowhere with two people he 
barely knows.  
I cared about the fates of these individuals and found myself hoping 
against hope that they would somehow avoid the fate predicted by the 
title card. "The Blair Witch Project" deftly creates a sense of dread 
that grows steadily as events progress, with the shaky camerawork, 
obscured views and limited night-lighting effectively amplifying the 
disorientating ambiance.  
To a degree, the actors actually experienced those feelings. They were 
left alone in a Maryland state park for extended periods of time, filming 
themselves and improvising their dialogue based on directoral notes left 
at prearranged drop points. The unnerving sounds they heard were provided 
by the directors, who would periodically sneak around the actors' 
campsites in the middle of the night. 
On Internet film newsgroups, where arguing and sniping is the norm, a 
debate rages between devotees of the movie and those who consider the 
production nothing more than an over-hyped gimmick. To be sure, there has 
been a great amount of hype for the film, but so what? Convincing a mass 
audience to try out a low-budget independent flick is a tough chore and 
the folks behind "Blair Witch" have used clever promotion to create a 
whale of an advance buzz. And the finished product delivers the goods. 
"The Blair Witch Project" is much more than a gimmick. Eduardo Sanchez 
and Daniel Myrick have crafted a horror film that is genuinely 
disquieting, because they understand that no matter how much money 
studios throw into lurid nightmare imagery, the scariest monsters are 
those who lurk just out of sight, in the dark recesses of our own minds.

Author
Mac VerStandig
"On October 21, 1994, Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael 
Williams hiked into the Black Hills Forest to shoot a documentary film 
on a local legend called 'The Blair Witch,' and were never seen again. 
One year later, their footage was found." These are the opening lines of 
The Blair Witch Project. There are no credits, there is no flashback 
sequence, and there is no friendly narrator to guide you through this. 
The next 87 minutes is the three filmmakers' footage in chronological 
order - or so the audience is made to believe. In reality those 87 
minutes are occupied with unique filmmaking and a beautiful script which 
amalgamates for one of the scariest and most intense films since Alfred 
Hitchcock gave us a reason to not shower in 1960. But the film is not 
without its flaws either. A simple reality check can lead to some 
questionable aspects. And the production doesn't have the ability that 
Hitchcock had to make the film stick with you. 
The urban legend that is the Blair Witch is like most urban legends, in 
that it is confusing and unclear. Different people have different 
stories, and almost nothing is documented. The little that is known 
tells us that the Blair Witch has taken victims in the past, and is 
favorable to torturous, dismembering techniques. One person describes 
the creature as "an old woman, who's feet never touch the ground." 
Another description says "she was hairy from head to toe." That is, if 
there is a Blair Witch in the first place, something a respectably sized 
faction questions.
The unknowingly doomed group heads off into the Maryland woods after 
doing some brief interview work in Burkittsville, Maryland, where the 
town of Blair used to stand. The group of three gradually see their 
documentary evolve into a creepy and frustrating experience that tears 
at the very fabric of their relationships in a very similar manner to 
which MTV presents their popular show "The Real World."
At the core of the tumultuous relationship is Heather's authoritarian 
directing work. She demands nearly every moment be caught on film, 
including the behind-the-scenes aspects which she insists the group will 
someday look back on laugh. The footage is intentionally shaky, 
co-directors Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanches' attempt to give the film 
the ultimate realistic feel. But after a while you are led to question 
why the footage taken for the film would be of such a poor nature if 
Heather really is the great perfectionist that she is made out to be. 
You also can't help but notice than not more than once is any mention of 
reloading film made; despite the movie's claim of 21 roles being 
discovered.   
In The Blair Witch Project, there are no ghosts, no goblins, no 
monsters, there isn't even a witch shown on screen. There is no 
background music to gradually lead the audience into fear. There is only 
one isolated incident of blood and gore, a very mild one at that. 
Instead of using these traditional aspects to bring the crowd into 
horror and fear, the production simply plays with your nerves. By 
telling you the fate of the three protagonists before the film opens, a 
permanent dramatic irony is created. However, this aspect also brings a 
major downside as well. About one hour into the film, things have 
already gotten creepy and the group is already at odds with each other. 
This creates a sort of "Just die already!" sense, that makes the meager 
87 minutes seem perhaps a few too many.
The Blair Witch Project is definitely a clever film. Although Artisan 
Entertainment declined my request for a budget figure, it can be assumed 
that the movie was made at a fraction of what most independent films 
cost,  and couldn't even be fairly measured against the budget of 
Hollywood blockbusters. During the movie I was scared, but towards the 
end a feeling came over me where I just wanted the darn thing to end. 
And when it did, there was a queasy feeling in my stomach, but I think 
it came from eating too much popcorn.

Author
Chad Polenz
The Blair Witch Project
Chad'z rating: ***1/2 (out of 4 = very good)
1999, R, 88 minutes [1 hour, 28 minutes]
[horror]
Starring: Heather Donahue (Heather), Michael C. Williams (Mike), Joshua 
Leonard (Josh); produced by Robin Cowie, Gregg Hale; written and directed by 
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Seen July 31, 1999 at 6:10 p.m. at Crossgates Cinema 18 (Guilderland, NY), 
theater #10, with Reneé Gentile for free using my Hoyts season pass. [Theater 
rating: ***: very good picture and seats, average sound]
    Is there really anything scarier than the unseen? Don't you get scared to 
death when you come across one of those science shows on PBS about the 
millions of bacteria crawling all over you? Don't you freak out when you wake 
up in the middle of the night and hear a loud noise coming from within your 
house? Have you ever been told an urban legend while sitting around a 
campfire or walking down a dark alley?
    That paranoia associated with the little voids that exist within our own, 
supposedly secure and advanced world is what `The Blair Witch Project' 
attempts to deal with through a unique style of filmmaking almost never 
utilized by the movies.
    The film puts itself forward as a collection of `real' footage shot by 
three film students who were never seen from again after they set out into 
some supposedly haunted woods in October 1994 to make a documentary on the 
local legend of `The Blair Witch.' There is no narration or outside footage 
except what was shot by the students (the actors) themselves. 
    In case you don't know, the directors/creators Daniel Myrick and Eduardo 
Sanchez conceived the film as being the most realistic work of fiction an 
audience could see. They didn't write a script, all they did was come up with 
the major plot points and character traits and then sent the three actors out 
into the woods to make the movie themselves. Myrick and Sanchez and a few of 
their crew members kept tabs on the actors through global positioning units 
and had `booby traps' set and waiting so that everything the three 
experienced would be real. This technique certainly works for the film's many 
emotional points, although the lack of interesting dialogue and 
characterization serve as noticeable flaws.
    I'm not sure which is the most innovative concept at work here: the way 
the film was made; the fact a distributor decided to take a chance on it; or 
the fact that mainstream audiences seem to be just as excited and anxious to 
see something of the tiniest scale as they were for a few other summer flicks 
of the largest scales.
    Anyway, the film starts out with a lot of interviews with the local 
townsfolk and their interpretation, stories and alleged personal experiences 
with the Blair Witch. Some blow it off as nonsense, but others take it 
seriously. This lays the foundation for the bulk of the film and the actual 
climax itself which probably would have worked as well as it does whether or 
not this attempt at a backstory had been included. In fact, this is the 
film's weakest aspect because the interviews are a bit too short and informal 
and the characters don't think much of it either.
    Oh yes, the characters are: Heather (Donahue), the director who shoots 
almost everything she and her crew say on home video (which gives the film a 
realistic feeling because almost everyone has seen themselves on their 
parents' or their friends' home videos); Mike (Williams), the sound guy who 
doesn't say much at first except for a few snide remarks and one-liners, but 
who will later become full of emotion; and Josh (Leonard), the 
cinematographer who uses a grainy 16mm black-and-white camera.
    The three set out into the woods to hike to some specific landmarks 
associated with the legend which includes your common tall tale stories and 
places such as `Coffin Rock' and an old hermit's home and stories of children 
and hunters who were abducted and slaughtered by the witch. What ensues is 
not the three students' serious study of the legend, but of the psychological 
terror they will endure when they get lost, run out of food, fight with each 
other and then panic when they all fear they are being hunted.
    It's obvious to us why the three begin to break down and lash out at each 
other and what the strange sounds are that they hear at night. The most 
chilling and enduring scenes last only a few minutes when the three set up 
camp for a night and are awakened by noises and movement in the dark they 
attribute to either backwoods survivalists, animals or just the wind, but 
they never say what's clearly on their minds (and ours) - it's the witch. One 
of the single, most frightening moments I can recall occurs during one of 
these scenes where the crew is awakened by a presence outside their tent and 
the three flee into the woods, cameras rolling, and in the distance we see 
Heather running away and she screams, `My God, what the hell is that!?' 
    This is what makes `The Blair Witch Project' so superior to the countless 
Hollywood gorefests about monsters, serial killers and vicious animals. It 
relies on our own imagination to determine just how horific the elements at 
play might be. Throughout the film the three encounter signs of an 
intelligence such as piles of rocks and stick figures hanging from trees that 
weren't there before. These things are so simple yet they are frightening 
because of their nature alone. We want to believe that we can logically 
explain any occurrence in this day and age, but the atmosphere of paranoia is 
too thick and overbearing and thus it's all pure fear.
    The final scene is the culmination of everything the film is. It's 
disturbing, scary and realistic and when the climax ensues and there hasn't 
been a drop of blood shed or a villain in a costume or a CGI, it's a powerful 
moment.
    However, I take issue with the fact so much more backstory about the 
Blair Witch legend and the students' film expedition has been covered on the 
movie's web page and other media sources than what was included in the film 
itself. To have the film be entirely a string of Heather, Mike and Josh's 
footage is a great idea and works well, but what if the film had been a 
fictional documentary about the students' documentary? It could have been 
complete with a vast historical background of the Blair Witch legend and the 
rescue efforts that supposedly took place in the days after the students were 
declared missing. That might contradict the theory Myrick and Sanchez were 
going for, but I doubt it would have hurt (especially considering the film's 
running time is less than 90 minutes and seems to fly by).
    Still, as my friend and fellow film critic Dustin Putman said, to see 
`The Blair Witch Project' is not just to sit in a theater and watch a movie, 
it's to really experience something. It works on an emotional and intelligent 
level I've not seen since `2001: A Space Odyssey,' in that an invisible 
powerful force has outsmarted us in a day and age where we think we know 
everything there is to know.
---------------------------------
Please visit Chad'z 
Movie Page - over 230 new and old movies reviewed in-depth, not just 
blind ratings and blather capsules.
Associate member of The O.F.C.S. (Online 
Film Critics Society)

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
(Artisan)
Starring:  Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
Screenplay:  Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Producers:  Gregg hale and Robin Cowie.
Directors:  Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, intense situations)
Running Time:  86 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The last of the 34 films I screened at Sundance this year was not
merely the best film the festival had to offer.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
is a work of genre-redefining brilliance, a strong early candidate for the
best film of 1999, and one of the most unnerving psychological thrillers
ever made.  It works on the kind of primal level that will leave you
shaking for hours afterwards.  It's the kind of film for which festivals
like this truly exist.
     The concept alone is ingenious enough to grab interest (though not
utterly unique): an on-screen caption at the beginning of the film
announces that three college students disappeared in the Black Hills of
Maryland in 1994 while making a documentary film, and that only the
footage they shot was ever found.  Thus begins a 90-minute, verite-style
tale of the three students -- director Heather (Heather Donahue),
cameraman Josh (Joshua Leonard) and sound man Mike (Michael Williams) --
and their project to make a film about a local legend.  The story goes
that mass child murders and other disappearances in the area formerly
known as Blair are the work of the "Blair Witch," who lives in the hills
above the town.  The project leads to a two-day hike for location footage,
two days that we watch turn into a seemingly endless nightmare when the
trio gets lost and the sounds at night grow ever more disturbing.
     THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT begins with a seductive lightness of tone, as
the filmmakers record both their own preparations for the project (on
digital video) and the background interviews that will become part of
their film (on 16 mm film).  The interviews are frequently quite funny --
including a mother whose toddler grows disturbed by the scary story she's
telling -- while they also provide insight that the filmmakers really
don't take the legend very seriously.  The video pieces, meanwhile,
establish character traits that become crucial later in the film.
Heather, the project's leader, shows an unshakable-bordering-on-foolish
confidence in herself, leading to trouble; Mike, who expresses concerns
earlier than anyone, becomes the voice of common sense.  Writer/directors
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez don't just set up a scary story -- they
set up the people to whom this scary story will happen.
     And folks, scary ain't even the half of it.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
is the kind of film that wreaks its havoc almost entirely in your head,
just as the events in the film wreak havoc in the heads of the characters.
The directors use darkness and sound with shudder-inducing effectiveness,
never once resorting to cheap, trite tricks like people jumping into frame
or blasts of dissonant music (there is, in fact, no musical underscore of
any kind).  What we experience in THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is the collapse
of sanity -- as days go by, the three filmmakers run out of food, suffer
from sleep deprivation and cold, and gradually come to believe that they
may never find their way home again.  Heather reassures herself and the
others early in their experience that "it's very hard to get lost in
America, and even harder to stay lost," but the film plays on exactly that
fear of the wildnerness with a technique that will leave you
adrenaline-charged and breathless.
     Some viewers may be put off by the fact that the set-up guarantees a
bad end for the protagonists, or incredulous regarding why they would
continue to record their experiences.  Those elements might have troubled
me had THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT not established its characters so well that
they mattered more than the situation in which they find themselves.  All
three of the largely-improvised performances are dead on -- I dare a
viewer to find a moment when you can tell anyone is acting -- but Heather
Donahue's work is emotionally shattering.  Late in the film, she
videotapes an apology to her own parents and the parents of the two men
for placing them in such danger, the camera capturing only her eyes as she
speaks.  They are the eyes of a hunted animal, and the words she speaks
will chill you to your soul.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT works as a study of
disintegrating humanity only because we feel the humanity of these three
brash kids to begin with.  You expect a good horror film to be terrifying.
What makes this one great -- perhaps one of the best ever -- is that it's
also heartbreaking.

Author
Murali Krishnan
Due to a savvy marketing campaign, The Blair Witch Project was among
the most anticipated of the summer, particularly among fans of
independent film. It is a small budget film which demonstrates that an
extravagant Hollywood production is not necessary to make a good film,
as long as originality and creativity are employed.
The prologue to the film claims that the filmmakers disappeared over a
year ago, and that the film was constructed from the remains of their
footage which was eventually found. In a clever stroke of marketing,
the film's website goes into great detail about the disappearance and
it constructs a detailed background legend that the filmmakers were
investigating. Official websites for films are often merely an
advertising mechanism that provide an overview of the story, a
description of the cast, and a few stills from the film itself. It is
noteworthy that the website for this film actually enhances the film
by acting as an extension to the story.
Although portrayed as reality, the events in this story are all
fiction. In an age when every mundane new event (like a 45 mile per
hour car chase on a crowded highway) is given national prominence by
the network news organizations, it is unlikely that the bizarre events
purported by this film could have escaped notice. As confirmation,
there is the usual "all characters and events in this film are
fictitious" disclaimer displayed at the end of the credits. However,
knowing that the film is fictitious does not detract from the viewing
experience. It actually enhances it because the viewer is allowed to
enjoy the story fully rather than be distracted by implausibilities.
The footage begins as the three main characters are embarking on their
project. They are college students putting together a film
investigating the legend of the Blair Witch. Heather (Heather Donahue)
is the director of the film and the project leader. Joshua (Joshua
Leonard) is the camera operator and Michael (Michael Williams) is
handling the sound. The footage begins as they interviewing current
residents of Burkittesville, Maryland, which was previously a colonial
town called Blair. The interviewees relate vague stories of the
legendary witch who lived in the nearby woods, and also the story of
serial child killer who murdered several of the town's children about
fifty years earlier. It seems the killer was a hermit living in the
woods who claimed to be possessed by the witch when he perpetrated the
horrific crimes.
Eventually the trio enters the woods in their search for particular
historical landmarks related to the legend. From the premise it is
known that they will meet with misfortune, and the tension builds as
they proceed deeper into their journey. As they become lost and
encounter strange occurrences, the suspense noticeably tightens as the
audience wonders what their final fate will be.
The genre of mock documentary (mockumentary) has been well
established, and primarily used for comic effect (such as in the
hilarious Man Bites Dog and This is Spinal Tap). While the comic
mockumentary creates satire by portraying lampoons and exaggerations
as reality, this film is unique in that it tries to build suspense and
fear by attempting to keep all events believable. The fictitiousness
of the stories is never belied by the acting as all three actors give
outstanding, credible performances. The characters gradually transform
from enthusiastic adventurers to terrified, edgy, and confused waifs.
The main flaw is the uneven, and sometimes lingering pacing. The
production is obviously amateur, but the genius is that it tries to
portray a fictitious amateur production, so it succeeds perfectly in
that aspect.
Highly recommended. This film was subjected to a large amount of hype
both before and after its release. For people who are expecting too
much, or are expecting a tradition horror slaughterfest, it may be a
disappointment. It is not the scariest movie, and is not intended to
be. However, it carefully draws its boundaries and successfully
executes within them. Although it is not perfect, it is a marvel of
simplicity, originality, and creativity.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Mockumentaries are in.  Earlier this year Myles Berkowitz showed us
himself as he attempted to find love and happiness on his 20 DATES.  Few
people saw that movie, perhaps because most people can't get worked up
over some guy whose problem is that he's so obnoxious that women don't
want to go out with him more than once.
A fake documentary about getting killed in the woods by a witch is
another matter entirely.  One of the biggest art house hits in years,
the movie has now crossed over to the commercial theaters as well due to
the unprecedented level of interest.  Made by joint writer and director
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez on a sum so small that it would be
less that the rounding error on most Hollywood films, the movie's
financial success is without question.
But how about the movie?  Having been on vacation during THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT's release and hoopla, I saw the film much later than normal.
The idea for the story is undeniably clever.  Three young adults go into
the woods to film a documentary on the Blair Witch.  They never return.
The movie consists of the film and videotape found one year after their
disappearance.
Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard are the young
filmmakers who perish.  Whoops, I mean these three actors play
filmmakers with the same names.  If you're the sort who believes that
Elvis is still alive, you can check out THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT web
site, where more "truths" about the project are revealed.
This is all quite cute.  Cute, however, can only go so far.  As the
three of them wander aimlessly in the woods going in circles while their
compass points due south, their yelling at each other can get quite
tedious.  Nonetheless, it is easy to admire the filmmakers' audacity.
They have certainly tried to craft something unusual.  Unusual, yes.
Interesting, no.
If you suffer from motion sickness, the camera work will have you
looking for the barf bag.  They leave the cameras going so you see pans
across everything from the ground to the trees.  Imagine your 6-year-old
making a home movie, and you'll get some idea of what to expect.  Some
theater owners are even training their employees on how to deal with
vomiting.
"It's very hard to get lost in America these days," one of the
characters remarks after several days of wandering through the forest
with strange sounds and rock formations behind every tree.  "And even
harder to stay lost.  We have that on our side."
When the ending credits roll, instead of gasping for breath or thinking
about how scared you were, you may find yourself asking instead, "That's
it?  That's all there is?"
Scary?  Not for a second.  Even so, the next project by these two
directors is something to look forward to.  At least they are willing to
take risks.
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT runs 1:22.  It is rated R for language and would
be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
David N. Butterworth
        "The Blair Witch Project" sees an innovative idea marred by poor
execution.
        This low-budget film, now in wide release, uses a familiar
documentary approach to bring a heightened realism to its subject matter.
Since the movie is a good old-fashioned horror film (although
splatter-free, the film retains an uncertain "I Spit on Your Grave"-type
quality), the producers felt that this technique would result in some
genuine scares.
        Is it scary?  Yes.  But scary in that constantly looking outside
the corners of the screen to avoid jumping out of your skin way, not the
identifying with--and caring about the fates of--our leading players way.
        Here's the good idea that went a wastin'.  In October of 1994, a
trio of student filmmakers descended into the woods near Burkittsville,
Maryland in order to shoot a documentary about the legendary Blair Witch.
They were never seen or heard from again.  Their "discovered footage"
serves as the basis for the film that is about to unfold, "The Blair Witch
Project."
        Here's how its execution let it down.  Heather, the documentary
director (played by newcomer Heather Donahue), is a bit of a bossy boots
with a dictatorial approach to the project that begins to irritate early
on.  She quickly starts annoying her fellow filmmakers, Josh (newcomer
Joshua Leonard) and Mike (newcomer Michael C. Williams), and alienating her
audience.  Heather insists she knows where they are at all times but soon
enough it becomes clear they are lost.  In addition, Heather is obsessively
true to her medium, and refuses to turn off their color video camera, their
b/w 16mm camera, or their digital tape recorder.  So that when things start
to get scary--read on--Heather's right there with one of the cameras stuck
in a crew member's face, often while she's screaming "What the heck is
that!?" or more colorful words to that effect.
        If the circumstances in which our protagonists find themselves are
as horrifying as suggested then it defies all rational and logical behavior
for Heather to keep her camera rolling, no matter how dedicated an auteur
she may be.
        Donahue, Leonard, and Williams are clearly all amateurs and when
the going gets tough, their collective acting talents disintegrate.  The
supporting characters who play the Burkittsville (formerly Blair) yokels,
and provide interview-styled accounts of what they know about the Blair
Witch, are also unconvincing.  For a film like this to work, they need to
be absolutely believable as real people.
        After a while, the film becomes frustrating in its repetitiveness.
During the day, the threesome constantly bitch and moan about how lost they
are, whose fault it is, and what happened to the damned map.  They head due
south for a day and wind up in the same spot as when they started, all the
time following their compass.  At night, they hear strange noises all
around them and go rushing out of their tent screaming "Oh my God!" lit
only by a dim camera bulb, the black-and-white trees positively encroaching
on their frightened persons.  In the morning, there are little piles of
stones or twigs surrounding their camp.  If you're afraid of little piles
of stones or twigs then I guess this is one heck of a scary movie!
        This cycle then repeats itself over and over again.  Whine whine,
scream scream, stones twigs.
        "The Blair Witch Project" relies heavily on the power of implied
horror, meaning it's something of an anomaly in today's day and age, yet as
a result it's the kind of movie you can really only see once to appreciate
(or not).  Whereas I can truly understand what filmmakers Daniel Myrick and
Eduardo Sánchez were trying to achieve with this film, they made too many
mistakes along the way.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at 'http://members.dca.net/dnb'

Author
Fontaine Lien
The Blair Witch Project was overhyped.
And like most overhyped films, it was a major disappointment for me.
It was praised as the scariest movie to be made since "The Shining" or
"Halloween" or whatever, yadda yadda yadda, but in the end it was just
a justifiably glorified experiment in independent film
making. Creative?  Yes.  Well-acted? Yes.  Laudable?  That too.  But
scary? No.  Not in the way it promised to be.  It might be more
appropriate for viewing at a quiet, private gathering in your home,
rather than with a bunch of rowdy movie- goers who are just waiting to
be scared.
I have to admit, the first five minutes really hooked me, because this
was the first time we've actually seen movie actors look really crappy
(i.e., realistic) on screen.  No, I'm joking, but the point is we
don't usually see character exposition like this, from the third
person narrative to the first person, from hand-held video camera
(documentary of the film makers themselves) to the actual
black-and-white documentary of "The Blair Witch." It was like watching
a family video on screen, it was an unprecedented blurring of the line
between reality and fiction.  Even the taglines for the film were
cagey: they left people wondering whether this film that they were
going to see was a real documentary, a fake one, a film containing
documentary footage, or a documentary containing film footage.  Yes,
you would be as confused as I were, unless you're one of those people
who read up everything you could on this film and was prepared, sort
of.  Not even "The Real World" or "Cops" achieved this kind of
reality, which makes it all the more amazing because "Blair" is
actually fictitious.  I must marvel at the lengths the film makers had
to have gone though to accomplish this feat . . . but did we *really*
need to see an hour and a half of it before getting to the point?  We
knew these people were going to die, we knew that this time, the good
guys weren't going to survive.  The suspense just didn't work anymore
when everyone was waiting to see how these characters would die.
"Blair" tried to make the supposed witch scary by having her described
by commonfolk, by I think this was the witch's undoing.  These people
were too matter-of-fact; they spoke of the legends as if they were
like any other small town stories.  A hairy old woman with a shawl?
Whatever.  And why did kill?  That was never explained either.  The
pile of rocks, the man-shaped twigs, the goo on Josh's "stuff." None
of these were explained.  If there were any scary images being
conjured up in my head, they were pretty much diffused by the frequent
switches between daylight and night time and the non-stop bickering
between the characters, yeah, it's hilarious, and definitely much
better than seeing people screaming their heads off and spouting off
stupid lines, but it ruins the mood.  The passionate will cry that we
are all spoiled by special effects, that we need artificiality and
contrivance to scare us.  At this point I'm afraid that I must concede
their statements to be at least partially true.  Who wants reality
when we can experience it first-hand?
It's a pity, really.  If only the rest of the film were more like the
last five or ten minutes: the desperate, haunting, and truly unnerving
end to our three (or the two left) intrepid documentators.  To me,
that was the film's saving grace.  If not for the ending (which gave
me major chills when later that night I had to be alone in a big
house: I kept imagining shadowy figures facing the corners of the
walls), I would've walked off with a far worse impression of "Blair."
I'm fond of it, and I admire it, but I wish it had lived up to
expectations.  The truth is I now see this film as an aborted genius,
a glimpse at what might have been a true milestone in the horror
genre.

Author
Brian Matherly
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Running Time: 87 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 31, 1999
The trailers and the beginning of the move sum up this plot very
easily.  Three filmmakers venture into the woods of Maryland to track
down the legend of the Blair Witch for a documentary they are making.
They disappear and their footage is discovered a year later buried
underneath the foundation of a one hundred year old house.  From
there, things become a little more complicated.
I can say, with absolute assurance, that no film has ever had quite
the impact that this little movie has had on me.  Although I know it
was all a staged "mockumentary", there's no denying the psychological
impact this film will leave on you.  I didn't feel much upon initially
watching it.  I just thought it was an interesting film with some
pretty creepy parts.  I never even dreamed that thirty minutes after
the film had ended I would be frightened out of my mind just
discussing it with a friend.  I've gotten chills every time I've
brought it up since then.  This is not a movie that hits you right
away.  Instead this is a movie that sits at the base of your spine,
waits until you think everything is okay, then it slowly starts to
creep it's way up into your mind.  This is truly the most frightening
movie I have ever had the pleasure to watch.
The film is comprised of home video and 16mm camera footage that the
documentarians supposedly shot for their Blair Witch film, so don't
expect any steadi-cam shots or fancy camera work.  This is as real as
it gets folks.  I don't recommend sitting too close to the theater
screen though, because I guarantee you will get motion sickness from
the constant movement of the camera.  The performances of the three
lead actors in the film are so real, you may find yourself questioning
whether all of this has really happened or not.
This is definitely a movie that warrants home video viewing,
especially due to the fact that the bulk of the movie was shot with a
standard home video camera.  The reality of the images will strike
frighteningly close to home when viewed as actual video instead of the
tape-to-film transfer done for the big screen.  Word has it that a
special edition DVD with boatloads of extras (hours of deleted scenes,
alternate endings, commentary, the Sci-Fi Channel special, and others)
is being planned for release.  I urge Artisan Entertainment to forge
ahead with this plan and give us what could be the DVD to rival all
DVD's.  I know I'll be first in line to buy one.  [R]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
James Sanford
         To that short list of things money can't buy, let's add
"fright." After all, as too many of us found out last week, the multiple
millions of dollars spent on "The Haunting" produced only a
great-looking, utterly ridiculous mess instead of a world-class shocker.
         On the other hand, "The Blair Witch Project," which cost a mere
$60,000, is a nerve-wracking study of the psychology of fear that's
doesn't need computer-generated special effects or digital stereo
screams to give viewers the shudders. Instead, "Witch" writer-directors
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez have pulled off the trick of turning
their lack of resources into an asset. The movie's unfinished,
catch-as-catch-can look, complete with jiggly camerawork and sometimes
blurred imagery, is one of the primary reasons it's so disturbing and
creepy.
 "Witch" purports to be an assemblage of the film and video shot
by three student filmmakers who ventured deep into the Maryland woods in
1994 in search of material for a project they were planning about "the
Blair Witch," a legendary figure locals have blamed over the years for
mysterious disappearances and murders. The Witch is described by one
source as being uncommonly hairy, by another as "an old woman whose feet
never touch the ground."
 At first, the trio of young documentarians mock these theories
and spend a good deal of their time fooling around and teasing each
other. Even when they lose their way in the forest, Heather, the
unofficial leader of the group, assures her cohorts they'll "all look
back on this and laugh heartily."
 Instead, their circumstances become increasingly more serious,
even perilous. Mysterious piles of rocks appear around their campsite,
indecipherable noises surround them in the night, cryptic symbols are
found and the leafless tree branches begin to look like skeletal fingers
reaching out for the three intruders. What started off as a weekend of
fun begins to look like "Road Rules: The Death Trip."
 Myrick and Sanchez understand that what frightens audiences is
not what they see, but what they don't see. In its use of shadow, sound
and suggestion, "Witch" recalls the classic Val Lewton films of the
1940s, such as "Cat People," "Isle of the Dead" and "The Seventh
Victim." Myrick and Sanchez create a wholly believable atmosphere of
tension and bewilderment that proves to be much scarier than any amount
of blood or gore could be.
 In another offbeat move, Myrick and Sanchez have given their
characters the same names as the actors playing them -- Heather Donahue,
Joshua Leonard and Michael C. Williams -- and the stars' naturalistic
performances and seemingly improvised dialogue lend the tale an eerie
authenticity. Particularly chilling is Donahue's taped confession when
she realizes she doesn't know nearly as much as she thought she did.
It's a scene that's almost too wrenching to watch.
 Shot entirely on video and 16mm film, "Witch" is presented in a
constrained format that takes up only about half the total space on a
movie screen. That's a brilliant move on the part of the directors since
it makes us feel trapped right alongside the would-be filmmakers. We see
only what they see, -- and it becomes clear why they're terrified. James
Sanford

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) If you'd like to be creeped out by an amazing and
shocking document, then go see THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT without reading
this or any other review. If you want to steel your resolve before
seeing it, then read on.
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is an original urban myth. A title card tells us
that the film you are about to see is true. Three filmmakers disappeared
in 1994 while shooting a documentary about a legendary witch of
Burkitsville, Maryland. The filmmakers vanished somewhere, somehow, in
those woods. Finally, their footage was found and edited chronologically
to make this movie.
The three students, Josh, Michael and Heather, went in search of the
"Blair Witch." According to legend, an old woman disappeared several
hundred years ago and to this day she still haunts the woods outside the
town. 
The trio drive from film school to the town. An early shot in the
Burkitsville graveyard has Heather standing by a grave, reading from a
book. She looks like a bad TV news anchor wannabe. It's very hokey, but
then, she's no Ken Burns.
Next they interview a few of the locals. A man tells how she's rumored
to have killed her victims: killing one first while the others were
forced to listen to the screams, standing in a corner. Another woman
reassures her young daughter that there's no such thing as the Blair
Witch-- then winks at the camera and mouths "it's true." A couple of
fishermen debate whether or not they believe in the witch.
All in all, the residents of Burkitsville look like ordinary people. The
ones who talk about the witch look like the sorts of people who would
believe in that sort of thing. The movie is shot mostly on video, with
non-actors playing themselves. There are no bad actors because nobody's
"acting." There was surely a rough script, but most of the performances
were not rehearsed.
Next the three have to pack up their gear and hike a day into the woods,
to a spot where the witch was said to haunt. When they get there,
Heather stages a scene where she reads an account of the witch from a
certain cave. It's the exact spot where the witch supposedly abducted
some children. Heather's documentary looks like it would have been
pretty lame, but at least she's sticking to her schedule and her script.
The three must camp in the "haunted" woods that night because of the
length of the hike. The following day they pack their gear and head back
to the car. But instead of ending up at their car, they end up -- well,
somewhere else. In the 2 days hiking, they have become lost. 
(SPOILERS AHEAD: STOP READING NOW OR FOREVER HOLD YOUR PEACE.)
As the title card tells you, they never get un-lost. Their agonizing
descent from annoyance and anger to fear and desperation is not so much
pitiable as it is horrible, which is exactly what Myrick and Sanchez
were hoping for.
There are four techniques that really make BLAIR WITCH effective.
The first is absolutely essential for this type of horror movie. In
order to be scared by the supernatural, you have to first be convinced
of it. You have to be led by the hand from scoffing disbelief, through
entertaining the theory, to buying in. The characters you empathize with
have to start out saying "yeah, right, ghosts" and end up running and
screaming.
BLAIR WITCH does this very well: when the trio realize they're lost in
the woods, they go through some very rational thoughts. They're not
afraid a witch is going to eat them, they're just annoyed at the
inconvenience: the rented equipment is going to be charged for an extra
day, someone's girlfriend is going to be angry, their filming schedule
has been ruined.
The movie takes its time going through the descent to fear, which gives
the audience time to come down with them. It is only after much screen
time, when they run out of cigarettes, food, and water, that they start
believing in the supernatural. And why not? You would too. 
The second technique is that it never shows you the agent of the terror.
By making the "witch" invisible, there is always the possibility that
the terror springs from the mind, from fear, hunger, and fatigue. Even
if you become convinced that the terror is real, its invisibility will
force your imagination to make the thing more horrible than any solid
image could.
The second technique is enhanced by the third, the amateur quality of
the footage. Sometimes it's too dark or blurry to get a clear picture of
even what's right in front of your face. Also, the whole concept of
shooting on video and cheap filmstock gives the movie a look of reality
that just can't be faked. Because the subjects acknowledge the camera,
you can't as easily say "it's just a movie."
Finally, the movie works so well because of its actors, who were put
through quite an ordeal in the taping and filming of the movie. Myrick
and Sanchez made their actors hike to a specified location with a map
and a global positioning system; none of them were familiar with the
terrain. They had to be in character the whole time the camera was
running (which was a lot), and their emotion, jibes, and fights were
probably 90% "real." To make it easier for them to stay in character,
the characters were given the same names as the actors.
Horror guru Pablo Kjolseth will tell you that this concept (of
terrorizing your actors in order to get realistic looking "fear") is not
original. Neither is the idea of creating an urban myth for the screen.
Nevertheless THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT it is fresh for 1999, and most
importantly, it worked. It really is the scariest movie in quite a long
time.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Blair_Witch_Project_ (R) *** (out of ****)
Spanning two centuries and encompassing (among other things) mysterious
disappearances, gruesome acts of violence, a rare book, chilling film
footage, and a legendary witch, the sprawling mythology that filmmakers
Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sanchez, Greg Hale, Rob Cowie, and Mike Monello
have crafted around _The_Blair_Witch_Project_ is massive and murky enough
to make _The_X-Files_ creator Chris Carter proud.  It's almost a shame
that the film that inspired it all barely scratches the surface of this
elaborately constructed piece of modern folklore.
Since unexpectedly jolting audiences at this year's Sundance Film
Festival, _The_Blair_Witch_Project_ has been riding a wave of hype and
high expectations leading to its July theatrical release.  But the fact
that _Blair_Witch_ is an ultra-low-budget indie doesn't make it any more
immune to the inevitable feeling of disappointment that accompanies any
studio-manufactured object of ballyhoo.  Don't get me wrong; the
well-made product is a testament to the triumph of imagination and
creativity over financial limitations.  But it functions more effectively
as part of a larger multimedia entertainment experience than as a
stand-alone film.
The premise is simple enough that it is summed up in one tidy title card
at the beginning of the picture: "In October of 1994, three student
filmmakers diappeared in the woods near Burkittsville, Maryland while
shooting a documentary.  A year later their footage was found."  That
faux vérité footage is what makes up _The_Blair_Witch_Project_,
chronicling from the first person director Heather Donahue, sound guy
Michael Williams, and cameraman Joshua Leonard's ill-fated filmic
investigation into a legendary witch that haunts Burkittsville, formerly
known as Blair.  The project quickly turns from fun--such as interviewing
sometimes wacky locals about the legend--to a harrowing struggle for
survival as they become lost in the forest, where a mysterious force
stalks the trio.
Of course, we all know where this is going, thanks to that opening
blurb.  So it's up to writer-directors Myrick and Sanchez to come up with
a compelling journey, and they largely succeed.  The perpetually shaky
camerawork is annoying at times, but it contributes to the film's
greatest virtue--its air of authenticity.  Adding to that is the use of
unknown actors convincingly playing humanly imperfect characters named
after themselves.  The audience believes they are witnessing real people
experiencing real pain, real frustration, and, ultimately, real fear.
That sense of fear extends to the audience, but not quite as strongly as
has been made out to be.  There are two scenes in particular that struck
me as particularly frightening, but that was about it, and they come
fairly late in the game.  In fact, _Blair_Witch_ in just in the midst of
developing a head of steam when it ends.  While the film concludes on an
appropriately eerie and ambiguous note, its fairly abrupt nature is far
from satisfying.
For greater satisfaction, one must see the Sci-Fi Channel's forthcoming
tie-in special on the _Blair_Witch_ legend or visit the website, which
offers a wealth of information on the _Blair_Witch_ mythology, from the
legend's origins to events that take place after those depicted in the
film--not to mention the "story" behind the piecing together of the "lost
footage" into the 87-minute film.  A taste of this information is
provided in the press notes, which I did not read until after the film. 
Reading them has indeed made the experience and understanding of the film
a bit richer, but that doesn't change what is printed on the celluloid. 
As smartly conceived and executed as it is, _Blair_Witch_ the film is
basically a fairly familiar tale of three people who must learn to live
together and fend for themselves when lost in the forest.
Which is basically to say that _The_Blair_Witch_Project_ isn't quite as
special as it has been made out to be; it won't be the breakout hit
Artisan Entertainment is hoping for, just a sizable arthouse success. 
This is not to say that the film is not worth a look; it is a diverting
work of great ingenuity and invention.  It's just that to appreciate the
full breadth of the five filmmakers' vision, one must bone up on the
supplemental materials.  _Blair_Witch_ the film is ultimately as much of
a teaser for its website as is vice versa.  (opens July 16)
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Richard Wallis
When was the last time you were scared by a movie? Keep in mind that I'm not
talking about being spooked or startled; I'm talking about being totally and
uttering pierced by the sting of fear. The Exorcist? The Shining, perhaps?
Sure, Hollywood comes out with dozens of cheap thrills each year, and it
doesn't take much speculation to figure out that the true art of horror has
been long since swept under the carpet to make way for a genre of teen
comedies that disguise themselves as slasher flicks. But rest assured; The
Blair Witch Project is the real deal.
But the odd thing is, there is nary one special effect or false scare in the
whole of the film. Shot mostly on video (giving it a gritty, real-life
feeling) for a measly $30,000, Blair Witch embodies all that I love about
filmmaking. Making the audience use a little imagination for once, it really
is a breath of fresh air.
As everyone probably already knows, the films deals with three college
filmmakers who travel into the depths of a Maryland forest to document a
local legend. Though they are never heard from again, the footage they shot
was recovered.
The leader of the pack is Heather, the strong-willed film student making the
documentary based upon the Blair Witch phenomena of the title. If Heather
Donahue isn't at least nominated for an Academy Award for her work here,
then I propose a mass boycott of the Oscars. Blending comedy and pathos
seamlessly, she has created a truly sympathetic and ultimately tragic
figure. The performance of the year, in my opinion, and I will be astounded
if one comes along that is half as effective.
Joining Heather in her venture into the desolate woods are Josh (Joshua
Leonard), the 16mm cameraman, and Mike (Michael C. Williams), acting as
soundman. Though not quite as commanding in their roles as Donahue, I dare
you to spot a single moment where either of them are acting. Of course, this
is no surprise, considering the extremes the actors endured to make their
characters as true-to-life as possible. For 10 days, they pretty much
experienced what is depicted as fiction in the movie. Apparently, the whole
thing was entirely improvised, with notes hidden around the woods to simply
give the actors their motivation for the scene. No one can deny that these
are three courageous performances.
And it all paid off in the end, too. For a micro-budgeted independent film,
set forth amidst a slew of obscenely costly "summer" movies, The Blair Witch
Project has made quite a name for itself. Destined to become the most
successful film of all time (in a cost to profit ratio, that is), Blair
Witch first caused a stir at last year's Sundance film festival and
eventually was sold to an independent studio for a mere $1 million (if the
Louisiana Purchase was the best deal in American history, then this has to
be the second best).
A movie so frightening and completely effective is all too hard to come by.
Set the way-back machine to 1990, when John McNaughten's Henry: Portrait of
a Serial Killer premiered in theaters; audiences and critics alike were
taken back by the honesty of such a film, one that broke all the rules and
pulled absolutely no punches. Anyone who has seen Henry will no doubt recall
the infamous scene where Henry and his partner in crime Otis videotape
themselves invading a suburban home and callously killing the family that
inhabited it. Remember that nauseating terror? Remember that unflinching
honesty?
Blair Witch duplicates that same feeling of inner terror and hammers it home
for no less than 80 minutes. I realize that may seem like an excessively
brisk running time, but I'm not sure I could have taken any more than that.
Blair Witch doesn't simply scare you out of your wits; no, it's far to
clever for that. It drains you of every conceivable emotion, and afterwards
you are left numb.
Which, I suppose, brings us to the film's ending. I will say nothing of it
narrative-wise (ruining it would be a crime against humanity), but suffice
to say that it is the creepiest moment since Norman Bates smiled into the
camera at the end of Psycho. Again, no FX, just a profound feeling of shock
and - are you ready for this? Brace yourself - sadness.
You see, unlike most films of its kind, the characters here function as
people first and plot devices second. Right from the opening title card, we
know that the characters will not come out of their situation alive. This
makes their plight all the more sympathetic.
There have been rumors (I'm not sure if anything has been announced
officially) that a sequel or prequel may be in the works. Words cannot
describe the new level of ineptitude that this notion establishes. What's
next, "Schindler's List: The Babyboomer Years"? Or maybe "Saving Private
Ryan 2: Basic Training"? No, The Blair Witch Project should simply stand
alone and not give way to the system.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
Hype is a term usually associated with a highly anticipated big-budget
film, and it exists to spark interest so that the studios can make
lots of money. Too much hype almost always leads to a letdown, as
proven with "Godzilla" and "Wild Wild West". But "The Blair Witch
Project" is a "victim" of a different kind of hype. A hit at Sundance,
"Blair Witch" was hyped because of its critical praise and its
unconventional premise.
"The Blair Witch Project" is a fictional film about 3 twenty-something
filmmakers who head off into Maryland's Black Hills to film a
documentary on a local myth called the "Blair Witch". The three never
return(as we're informed at the beginning), but the footage which they
have filmed has turned into this movie.
The first few minutes of the film are comedic as the filmmakers ask
the locals whether they believe the myth or not. Then, as they begin
their hike into the woods, they begin to notice strange things.
The high-strung Heather is holding the camera, filming basically
everything that she, Michael and Josh do. What started off as a
documentary about the fiction of myths has turned into an exercise in
paranoia.
I don't want to give away much plot, because the thrill of "The Blair
Witch Project" is not knowing what is going to happen. Filmmakers
Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick have created one of the creepiest
and most original horror flicks of all-time. Heavily hyped on the
internet, many who see this film believe that it is totally real. But
if you see the film knowing the truth, then you will notice the
incredible wonder of the entire project.
Shot on a miniscule $100,000 budget, "The Blair Witch Project" used
its limited resources to make an incredibly creative thriller that
relies on smarts instead of effects to shock the viewers out of their
seats.
The filmmakers sent the three actors into the woods with cameras and
an understanding of the film's premise. They spent a week hiking from
spot to spot, and then picked up food and film. It was up to them to
improvise and film their scenes. The result is shot on poor 16mm and
Hi8 video with a couple of handheld cameras.
"The Blair Witch Project" has been breaking all kinds of box-office
records in its first week in limited release. Destined to be a
cult-classic, it proves that a low-budget can spark surreal
creativity, and that psychological paranoia is much scarier than
costly aliens.
"Blair Witch" reinvents the horror genre moreso than "Scream"
supposedly did. I'm glad that smarts and great marketing are adding up
to dollars for Artisan Entertainment, which is currently the boldest
name in independent cinema. "The Blair Witch Project" is far from
perfect, but it is a piece of landmark filmmaking.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Gary Jones
In 1994, three young and inexperienced documentary film-makers set off
into the Maryland woods to investigate the story of the Blair Witch, a
creepy figure of local folklore, said to be responsible for
disappearances and deaths over several decades. All that was ever found
of them was the footage they shot. This material was edited and the
result is presented here. It tells the remarkable story of how they
became lost in the forest and were tormented by strange unseen forces.
There's one often-overlooked aspect of this spooky tale that's worth
bearing in mind... it's not true. Let's just let that sink in a moment.
It's a story. They made it up. It didn't happen.
Some low-budget films have a structure or technical approach which flows
from a single cost-cutting idea. The excellent 1998 Canadian science
fiction film Cube was set in a huge maze of interconnecting cubic rooms.
A set was constructed of one such room, 18 feet on a side, and that's
where the whole film was shot. The Blair Witch Project takes a similarly
simple and retrospectively obvious idea to make a virtue of necessity:
the whole film is presented as the edited footage shot by the three
documentary makers and all this material was recorded by the three
actors playing the documentary crew. The actors were given a 16mm film
camera, a Hi-8 video camera and sound recording equipment, and each day
they were given some minimal direction and left to improvise a day's
shooting. The footage was collected at the end of each day in exchange
for food and the next day's story line. The real film-makers crept
around the actors' tent at night producing scary noises and preparing
strange artifacts for the increasingly uncomfortable cast to discover
the next day. The originality of this idea has been questioned, with
films such as Cannibal Holocaust and The Last Broadcast cited as earlier
examples of the mockumentary approach to horror movies.
The nature of the film lends itself to confusion about the reality of
the events depicted. When we see tired, hungry, cold and scared
characters on the screen, we are watching actors, but we are watching
tired, hungry, cold and scared actors. Many people seem to have had a
problem grasping the idea that the film is a work of fiction. Feeding
off the pre-millennial appetite for spooks and demons, the film-makers
deliberately fostered this confusion by using the actors' names -
Heather, Michael and Josh - for the characters and presenting the film
as a true story in promotional material. The official web site, for
example, provides extensive "factual" background material on the
(completely made-up) Blair Witch story and the unfortunate trio. The
story is also presented as truth in many of the unofficial web sites
which fuelled interest in the film. These sites were supposedly produced
by fans of the movie, but it has been suggested, although the film-
makers deny it, that some were actually professionally-produced
publicity sites masquerading as fan sites.
There is no violence or gore in the film (apart from a small lump of
unidentifiable bloody matter), no special effects and no visible
monsters or spooks - the story is told purely through the reactions of
Heather, Michael and Josh to what goes on around them. The three
performances are convincing, but it is hard to know to what extent we
are watching acting or a recording of three very uncomfortable people.
The story goes that the actors had to sign releases indicating that they
would not hold the film-makers liable for any psychological damage they
might suffer as a result of the harsh shooting conditions. In order to
see the performances, of course, the characters had to film each other
when they might have been expected to have more important things to do,
such as make their documentary, find their way out the woods, or run
around screaming. This is explained by the pushy Heather, who does much
of the most personally intrusive filming and claims to want to record
their experiences as well as make a documentary. I wasn't really
convinced by this explanation, but how else could we have a movie to
watch?
The film has so far made around $140,000,000 in the US - not bad for a
movie that cost around $40,000 to make (although the distribution
company that picked it up spent an extra $100,000 on the film, mainly on
improving the sound quality). It is hard to know what the film's writer-
directors, Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez can do next. They have made
one of the most successful films of all time, and the money people will
be throwing cash at them, yet they've made an unrepeatable freak of a
film, with no evidence that they will have a clue about how to make
another movie.
The Blair Witch Project is a triumph of marketing, and raises some
interesting issues about what's real and what isn't in movies. The
technical approach is novel, but this in itself isn't enough to sustain
a feature film. There are a few creepy moments, and a the final scene is
pretty chilling, but the scariest film ever made? Hardly. When the
making and marketing of a film is more interesting than the film itself,
you know there's something wrong.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
Lest we forget, Deliverance was 1972. Six years later The Hills Have Eyes.
Two decades later they still do. And James Dickey's backwoods have always
been there in the unconscious, waiting. What The Blair Witch Project does is
take us back to those woods, and then leave us there with three film
students--Josh(ua Leonard), Mic(hael Williams), and Heather (Donahue)--there
to document the Blair Witch Legend, get in and get out. But, as the opening
title card informs, they never make it out, meaning that during the next
80-odd minutes the issue isn't Will they die, but How will they die? Which
is quite a gamble for independents Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez,
dramatically speaking. But they make it pay. Before the opening sequence is
even over, narrative matters have ceased to intrude. This thanks to
genre--not horror, but documentary: they idea that anything can happen, and
did.
But the documentary brings with it its own set of conventions, one of which
is that the filmmaker is able to keep and objective distance from the
subject. Which is to say the filmmaker doesn't believe. Which, conveniently
enough, is the first mistake in any horror film. The second is to get
suddenly curious. Here, Myrick and Sanchez provide that tragic curiosity via
documentary interest, and then collapse any and all objective distance Josh
and Mike and Heather might have had from the Blair Witch Legend by making
them subject to it. Which is exactly the kind of sophisticated reversal so
often absent from horror.
All the same though, this is a horror movie. Josh Mike and Heather do make
all the typical mistakes--splitting up, with-holding information, turning on
each other, etc--and they do often choose, as Josh says, to stay and record
instead of help, but still, it never quite becomes formulaic. And it's not
just about cinematography, presentation, improvised lines, so-called
method-filmmaking. It's about stumbling deeper and deeper into the darkness.
The Blair Witch Project draws upon our most primal fear--the unseen
presence. The strongest scenes in it aren't the ones with the leaves rushing
by and the noises just beyond the frame, they're the ones where the screen
is black, and all we have to gon on is audio whispers. The weakest points
perhaps all occur in the first 15 minutes, where Myrick and Sanchez had to
edit this raw footage together in a back and forth manner, so as to firmly
establish that everything we're seeing is through the camera of a
crewmember. A necessary evil, perhaps, in the absence of voice-overs or
scores or potential soundtracks we're trained to cue into.
Does The Blair Witch Project intend to retrain us, though? Perhaps. If we
pay attention. First, however, it just disturbs us at a fundamental level,
and then, by foregoing the Hollywood ending, it doesn't take that
disturbance away. Suddenly, American cinema isn't so American anymore.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Chad Dowling
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Running Time: 87 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 3, 1999
***Be warned... the following review contains some harsh language***
The Blair Witch Project.  Quite possibly the least scariest movie of
all time.  If you want to see real terror on the big screen go back
and watch any scene with Jar Jar Binks in The Phantom Menace, because
this movie is not scary or even remotely creepy.
My colleague and friend Chuck Dowling wrote that if less is more, then
the Blair Witch filmmakers must have thought that nothing is more.
And this worked for him.  Well, I'm sorry, but nothing... is
NOTHING!!!!!  NOTHING IS NOT MORE.  IT'S NOTHIIIIIINGGGGGGGGGGG!!!!!!.
I do not pay 5 dollars to see nothing.  "Nothing" is free, available
all around the world at a location near you.
I am absolutely in amazement that some people find this movie scary.
I could just discount them and say, "Well, I guess they are just pansy
chicken shits who are probably scared of their own shadow."  But I
have intelligent friends who like this movie and so that doesn't hold
water.  There must be some other reason.  (Then again, maybe my first
thought is correct, I think I'll try pointing their shadow out to them
one day and test their reaction.)
When I hear people praising this film, I never hear them talking about
what makes up about 97% of this movie: three kids bickering with each
other about being lost.  They only talk about what might make up
possibly 3 to 4 minutes of screen time.  This being a few very short
night scenes where the kids hear some unscary sounds and another where
they shout "Josh!!"  over and over.  This film should not be called
The Blair Witch Project, it should more accurately be called THREE
DUMB AND PISSPOOR FILMMAKERS GET LOST...  AND ARGUE WITH EACH OTHER.
Oh ladies and gentlemen you will be so scared when you hear them
shouting "Josh!!".  And if you thought that was scary, wait till you
see a pile of rocks, and then some tinkertoy lincoln logs, oh my dear
lord you will be pissing in your pants with fear.  Oh yeah, and some
goo on one of their backpacks.  You've never seen terror like this
folks, and you don't want to.  The Chevy Chase/Goldie Hawn comedy Foul
Play is creepier than this film.  (For current films, I highly
recommend The Sixth Sense or A Stir of Echoes for a creepy filmgoing
experience.)
This film is an example of marketing with no substance.  The marketing
was brilliant, and the whole nation is in awe of just the premise for
the film.  They want this film to be good.  And I think they are
reaching and praising the wrong movie because they don't have anything
else to praise.  That wonderful film that rejuvenates the horror genre
may come along, but this is not it.  This film could have been SO much
better.  Just think, if maybe there had been only 10 minutes of
arguing about being lost, and 80 minutes of nighttime stuff.
I saw this movie with a girl who was extremely pumped for it.  She was
sold on this film.  And then, at one point during it, she turned to me
and asked '...are we supposed to be scared by this?'.
I've heard one opinion that you "have to use your imagination" to
create the fear in this movie.  Well, I thought that was what the
filmmakers were supposed to do.  Use THEIR imagination and create a
good movie.  I mean anyone can use their imagination and not pay 5
bucks for it.  But even if you like this idea, then what are you
imagining?  An entity called the blair witch?  Some rednecks fucking
with these kids?  Are either of these things really scary when you
think about it???
I've heard several people say that this movie makes them recall how
scary it can be to be out in the woods and hear something.  Well sure
thats scary in real life, but there are a lot of things that are scary
in real life that are not scary in a movie nor even interesting.  You
could sit in your house and see a snake or a spider and it could be
scary, but in a film it wouldn't be.
And no, a movie does not need a big budget or CGI special effects to
be scary or creepy.  Actually the less the better (see the equally
awful remake of The Haunting).  But you have to do SOMETHING.  You
cant just count on us all having nostalgic memories of how something
like this COULD BE SCARY, if it were real.  And by the way, about the
shakycam filming in Blair Witch.  Aren't these supposed to be
"filmmakers" who should know how to point a camera and shoot something
without shaking the camera constantly?  I'm not even talking about the
couple scenes where they are terrified, that's justified.  I'm talking
about the other 87 minutes of the movie where they can't seem to shoot
anything smoothly at all.  Minor quibble there.
There is a feeling in me that the people that like this movie are
suckers.  That the filmmakers are just laughing their asses off all
the way to the bank.  And I think there is a good chance they will see
this film again and say to themselves "what was I thinking??".  But,
if they don't, then thats fine.  If it works for them then that's okay
I guess.  I just lament that by making this movie a hit, we are going
to be subjected to more of the "nothing is more" approach.  Pretty
soon we're going to get some movies like this: just a still shot of a
prison jail cell.  For 90 minutes.  And we'll have to use our
imagination and think to ourselves, "my god, wouldn't it be scary to
spend life in prison?!!  This movie is the scariest movie of all
time!!!!!".  Or, a shot of a coffin, with some funeral directors
arguing with each other.  "Man, do you know how scary it would be to
die???!!!!  Now THIS is the scariest movie of all time!!!!" [R]
Chad Dowdell -- deniro1@leading.net
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
John Beachem
It seems to me that critics and audiences have become so tired of the same old
kind of movies, that they now turn to anything remotely different and acclaim
it as though it were the greatest film ever made. This would seem to be the
case with "The Blair Witch Project". While certainly innovative, and contains a
few genuinely creepy scenes, most of the film seems to revolve around watching
three teens bicker out in the woods.
Three students set out for a small town in Maryland which is home to a legend,
the legend of the Blair Witch. First interviewing the townspeople, they
eventually decide to head into the woods to find the site of the Witch's
killings. The three travel through the woods for days, becoming lost and
eventually turning on each other. The whole time, something in the woods stalks
them. Leaving small symbols at first, the stalker becomes more and more bold
and eventually openly attacks, dragging one off in the night.
It seems that the majority of people feel fully one way or another about this
film. Either they think it's one ofthe greatest ever made, or is an utter piece
of garbage they can't believe they were dragged to. I, on the other hand, am
fairly divided about this movie. As I said earlier, it's a truly innovative
film. Shot entirely as though it were lost footage shot with a home camera, it
does seem quite realistic. However, if you suffer easily from motion sickness,
stay far away. There are also a few scenes which are quite eerie. The two that
stick out most in my mind are the conclusion, and a scene where the group
stumbles across hundreds of figures made out of sticks in a section of woods.
Now, on to the items that really couldn't stand. One thing which I simply can't
believe, is that while running terrified through the woods, with some horrible
thing chasing them, the kids would actually keep the camera held at eye level!
The other major problem was that between nights in the tent, when the creature
in the woods harassed the group, they spent the days arguing on and on. I saw
some people in the theatre begin to doze off in these scenes.
Some truly creepy scenes which are plagued by stretches of boring dialogue
earns this movie three stars, and a reccomendation to wait for video (but watch
it with the lights off to get the true effect).
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Jamey Hughton
For More "MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton"
Visit:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
The Blair Witch Project, a low-budget horror movie that scared audiences
silly at the Sundance Film Festival, has been receiving incredible
acclaim among moviegoers. Certain critics have dubbed it `the scariest
movie since The Exorcist'. I'll be honest with you: it ain't. But what
director tag-team Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick have achieved here
is nothing short of extraordinary: opening the imagination to a world of
frightening possibilities. Tell yourself calmly `It isn't real' before
you enter the theater, and all should go smoothly.
The Blair Witch is a mythical creature said to live in the backwoods of
a small town called Burkitsville, Maryland. There have been many
campfire stories told about the murders of children and other
frightening occurrences, but no solid proof that the witch in question
ever existed. Three young college students - Heather (Heather Donahue),
Mikey (Michael Williams) and Josh (Joshua Leonard) - have set out to
make a documentary of the Blair Witch. Food and supplies have been
packed for a 2 or 3 day venture into the woods, where they hope to find
historical landmarks that have a significance in their project. They
interview the locals and find it to be common knowledge. However,
neither three show any particular respect toward the legend; they merely
view it as a fun trip into the woods and a chance to get very drunk.
The entire 90-minutes of The Blair Witch Project is composed of choppy
footage that, we are told, was found one year later. There are two
cameras that the trio use: a full color hand-held camcorder operated by
Heather to record the documentary in process, and a larger one used by
Josh for real footage. Mikey, meanwhile, is the sound man.
Sanchez and Myrick have made this film as real as humanly possible. The
actors use their actual names, and the shoot was supposedly composed
largely of improvisation, brought on by fear of the dark woods. When
things become scary for the characters, the tension begins to build in
the audience. They find themselves lost in the woods, stumbling upon
frightening crosses and stick figures dangling from the trees. Some
monologues are carried on in a pitch black setting taking place in the
tent, and you can only imagine what's going on around them. Things
become creepier than creepy when the group begins to hear children's
voices, and other mysterious sounds, echoing through the woods in the
night. We're very thankful when daylight hits.
As spooky as all of this sounds, it is much scarier in the aftermath.
You will go over certain scenes in your mind - in fact, one character's
helpless screams are still repeating themselves in my head. The
performances are air-tight, especially by Williams and Leonard.
Occasionally, Heather Donahue's cries and outbursts of profanity seem
forced. But, she also owns the most effective scene in the movie, in
which she records her apologies to the group's parents while holding
back sobs of terror. `I'm too scared to close my eyes, and I'm too
scared to open them,' she explains.
Sanchez and Myrick have wrung this great premise for every ounce of
possible fear. It is not so horrific that you'll find yourself quivering
in your seat, but it is scary. The ending contains one of the most
frightening frames in movie history. And, with only one scene of brief
violence, the directors have largely succeeded in proving one fact: that
images the imagination can conjure up are far more frightening than
anything shown on film. The Blair Witch Project is no phenomenon, but it
is very, very well done.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
Mark O'Hara
This is more of a response than a review, but I think "The Blair Witch 
Project" is a great film - just not necessarily a great horror film.
I admire it most for its creativity.  Filmmakers Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel 
Myrick ran with the idea of shoving three young actors out in the Maryland 
woods.  They must operate their own cameras and improvise all of the 
dialogue.  Of course there is always the fall-back of editing.  But the 
sheer originality is refreshing to watch.  I guess we have to overlook that 
the camera seems to be running much of the time, and not only when the 
supposed cameramen are filming actual parts of the documentary.  We see 
Heather (Heather Donohue) introducing the legend, the camera showing the 
faded stones of a graveyard.  But we also watch the trio leave Josh's (Josh 
Leonard) car on the side of the road, Heather working the camera as the men 
behind her trudge into the woods in search of the locales involved in the 
legend.  Although we never witness mundane things like meals, we do see 
several breaks the characters take as they hike under the trees.  And the 
choppiness of sudden cuts to the darkness of night is excusable.
I'm sure the best thing about the set, to the filmmakers, is that it was 
free.  The remote forest is pristine, primeval, and most of all, ominous.  I 
thought of Nathaniel Hawthorne's short stories, so-called civilized man 
venturing into the darkness, possibly to meet his doom.  At times we watch 
shots of the forest's extreme beauty; then darkness descends and the story 
tightens down to small enclosures of nylon pup tents.  These are familiar 
scenes to viewers who have camped.  What makes the characters take notice is 
the unfamiliar noises during the blackest part of night.  Rocks knock 
together, branches rustle, and human voices cry hoarsely and once even 
laugh.
Why do I say "The Blair Witch Project" is a great film?  Mostly for the 
chances it takes to be different.  The premise is a cool idea, and you can't 
help liking these indedpendent filmmakers and their gutsy young actors.  My 
bottom line is that the piece succeeds as a psychological study as much as 
any other genre.  I've read snippets of hype like the movie "does for the 
woods what 'Jaws' did for the water," and yes, there is a lot of suspense 
worked into the package.  But 'Jaws' is a suspense film, not properly 
horror.  At its heart, "Blair Witch" follows the fascinating degeneration of 
psyches:  as they become lost, assault each other in anger, and run in 
terror through the lightless woods, these jaded young adults let us glimpse 
the core of their humanity, and we are moved.
But maybe people don't want to be moved by the plights of characters; maybe 
they view these figures only as victims - fodder for a monster that they 
eventually hope to see, and that they hope is gruesome and more terrible 
than any special effects they have previously gawked at.
There's the rub.  Hey, typical American viewer!  Don't you realize yet that 
the most terrifying agent in this type of movie is your own imagination?  If 
you want to see slashing and blood-black gore, get thee hence!  Rent an 80's 
flick from one of the franchises.  Because what we have here is the chance 
of a revival of suspense films that actually make you think and make 
connections.  Wow!  There is not insulting of the intelligence at the 
beginning - only a quick set-up (perhaps too quick) for characterization.  
But so many elements come across freshly because of their improvised nature. 
  Why did Spielberg put most of the "Saving Private Ryan" cast through boot 
camp-like training?  What comes across on camera is more genuine, of course. 
  Place three actors out in the woods for several days - and the length of 
their ordeal does become a wee bit tiresome - and you are bound to come up 
with an edge that can't be faked by the best actors.  When Heather glances 
at her mud-caked hands and fingernails, we see the conditions that are 
crossing the lines of human endurance.  How else could Heather seem so 
genuine in her self-filmed apology to the mothers of her crew?  This scene 
is very unflattering to Heather physically.  We see up inside her quivering 
nostrils, her dirty hair is hidden inside her ski cap, her red-rimmed eyes 
leak tears that collect on the tip of her nose.  Just a magnificent and 
naturalistic performance.
I've mentioned a few flaws along the way.  Another is that I wanted to call 
out, "What are you standing around fighting for?  Why don't you double-time 
it down any trail?  You can cover forty miles in a day if you're desperate!" 
  Yet I suppose a certain hopelessness grips them, and when they happen 
across the same log they crossed much earlier the same day, we get a sense 
that perhaps they are not just wandering foolishly in widening circles, but 
they are victims of some especially tortuous haunting.  Anyhoo, wouldn't at 
least one of the characters start praying or invoking God in this situation? 
  Josh wears a talisman around his neck - the horn that wards off evil.  
It's funny, but just as their humanity makes us wish for their safety, other 
aspects of their behavior make us not care so much for them.
Next, the hype.  I've been fascinated by the advertising of films since I 
begged my mother endlessly for a buck so I could buy a "The Sound of Music" 
coloring book!  What strikes me here is that I knew more about the mythology 
of the Blair witch than was actually contained in the picture!  Because I 
read the official web site's version, I knew the origin of the folklore - 
the pre-Colonial woman being exiled into the woods, the disappearance of 
children and the bundles of twigs clogging the lake.  But these items 
constitute a dishonest type of reverse engineering.  It's virtually 
impossible to look at the film by itself, as a result of the additional 
fictions woven about it.  At the center of this grisly bundle is a decent - 
though very consciously rough - little story.  It's a stroke of both genius 
and exploitation to surround the movie with all the other stuff, when it 
could have been included in a few more minutes of footage.  On the site you 
see photos of state cops and searches and read the stories of the agonized 
parents and the eventual release of the footage found abandoned.  Very slick 
indeed.  But it's not part of the 86-minute movie. It's just as cheesy as 
the hype surrounding any type of artist with a bloated personality cult.  
Fortunately this film, divorced from the hype, is still decent.  I don't see 
the end of this multi-faceted advertising, but only much more of it, 
especially on the Internet.
Oh, I realize the dialogue is improvised, and we never see a good deal of 
the film the actors shot.  But c'mon, do they really need to use the f-word 
so many times?  It becomes like any syllable repeated until meaningless.  
The characters' languages - body language and paralanguage - put across more 
terror than their cursing.  (At the very least, copiers of "Blair Witch" 
should attempt more colorful variations on the standard four-letter 
expletives!)
Because it's become an important part of our lore and current culture, you 
should see "The Blair Witch Project."  You've heard the thing was made for 
around $30,000, sold to Artisan Entertainment for a cool million, and has 
grossed many more millions in its first weeks of release.  If that doesn't 
impress, then the bare-bones creativity will. (And if you think hard enough, 
you begin to wonder what is really stalking the trio - something beyond 
nature or something cultish.) The viewing experience is more creepy than 
scary.  But there are also a few nicely-wrought comic bits, as when Mike 
(Mike Williams) corrects the others when they call 'The Skipper' from 
"Gilligan's Island" by the name of 'Captain.'  In all, the film is gritty 
and realistic - cinema verite to the nth degree -- and finally, enjoyably 
unsettling.


Author
John W. Collins
Over the past one hundred years, many movies have been given
the moniker, "horror film," but few have deserved it. They were given
that title mainly due to their subject matter, but a vampire,
werewolf, zombie, ghost, maniac with an ax, demon, or even the Devil
himself does not a horror movie make. There have been many a valiant
effort. Some even managed to truly scare their audience, but they have
sadly fallen short of what a true horror movie is suppose to do. A
true horror movie's objective is not to just frighten you, but to
upset you; to make you feel uneasy as you are watching, and to make
that feeling follow you, even after you have left the theater. It is
not supposed to gross you out with gory make-up effects. It is not
supposed to  amaze you with what can now be put on the screen with
state-of-the-art computer effects. It is not supposed to make you feel
like you have been on a roller coaster after it is all over. A horror
movie is supposed to make you feel like you have been hit in the face
with that roller coaster. 
The "politically correct" 90s, where everyone is supposed to
feel happy, and you are not supposed to upset anyone, have not been a
very good time for "Hollywood" horror movies. Not to mention the ones
that are suppose to "rock the boat" and come right out and slap the
audience in the face. So, I was beginning to believe that the 90s were
going to be the first decade since the modern horror movie began (the
1920s)that we were not going to have a true horror movie; a classic in
the genre. But thankfully, I was wrong.
The Blair Witch Project just did make it with less than six
months left in the decade, but there it is, standing as an example of
what a horror movie should be. Made on a budget of  sixty thousand
dollars, and by a group of unknowns, TBWP, is well on its way to
earning more than one million dollars in only its first month of
release. It is setting box office records and has people standing in
LONG lines; lines that have not been seen since another horror classic
was in theaters, The Exorcist. 
The back story is simple enough. In 1994, three student film
makers went into a wooded area of Maryland to make a documentary about
the local legend, the Blair Witch. They never returned. The movie
consists of the footage that they shot and that was supposedly found
one year after their disappearance. What follows is a movie that
succeeds where all other so-called horror movies have failed. It is
nearly a textbook on how to make an effective horror film; on how to
manipulate your audience; on how to take ordinary places and
circumstances and make them terrifying by turning the familiar into
something unfamiliar. In a true horor film, it is not the film maker
that frightens the audience. They can put in "surprises" that make
people jump in their seats, but that is not horror. In a horror film
that is doing its job, it is the audience that is frightening the
audience.          
 Since the entire movie was shot with a video camera and a
regular film camera, TBWP. has a "reality based" feel to it. People
are used to seeing that only on television, not at a movie theater.
Then there are only three characters throughout the majority of the
film, so you have a very intimate setting and at times you feel like a
voyeur. Then since this is all "amateur" film making, there is no
blaring soundtrack of intrusive, popular songs. There is also no Dolby
surround sound, so you are forced to pay attention to dialogue. There
are bits of dialogue that you cannot make out, so like the characters
you are watching, you are not quite sure just what is going on in some
spots. All of this works to pull the audience into the movie and
forces them to be a part of it; something modern audiences are not
used to and that adds to the feelings of unease that are already
brewing because this movie is breaking so many rules. Then, this is
not a movie where action scenes are pilled on top of action scenes.
When something exciting is going on, the camera movement is jerky and
disorienting, and you can't always hear what is being said.
Then as if to add a final insult, there are no breathtaking,
wowie- zowie special effects. Just trees and raw human emotion. You
watch as the three film makers become more lost and frightened and you
are forced to observe their slow decent into near madness. A situation
that no one is comfortable with. And because you already know that
these people never make it out of those woods, you begin to wonder
just what IS going to happen to them? What horrible fate awaits them?
You find yourself rooting for them, even though you know that they are
doomed. Now the movie-going experience is completely out of whack.
Characters in a horror movie that you really like and care about? What
it all adds up to is that without even noticing it, you have become
involved. You are now a participant, be it willing or unwilling. There
is now a sort of audience participation going on and that is the key
element in any successful horror movie; or any other movie for that
matter. By this time, the audience is not really sure what is going to
happen next. Some are truly scared because of that very fact; they
don't know. To its credit, TBWP is not predictable. Some are mad
because they ARE scared and not used to that feeling in a 1990s horror
movie; others are mad because this movie is breaking all the rules.
Where is all the blood? Where is all the slam-bam action? Where are
all the bodies? How dare they. Others are just praying that this whole
damn thing will be explained to them at the end. But ALL are riveted
to their seats because no one knows where all this is leading.
We are all exactly where the movie wants us to be; off
balance, tense, and uneasy. We have been manipulated and placed in a
situation that many don't want to be in. Some are not even sure how
they got there. Then the final trap is sprung and we watch as the
final fate of the three characters that we have lived with for the
past hour and a half unfolds. Not wishing to give anything away, let's
just say that it is an ending that will be written about and discussed
in film classes for years to come. But the end credits roll, the house
lights come up, and the ordeal is over.
The effects of a true horror film last long after the credits
have faded from the screen. The images stay with you, they make you
take those quick glances over your shoulder as you make your way to
your car. Then if you go get something to eat afterwards, what you
have just seen is all that you can talk about. On the drive home, it
is all you can think about. Then when you are "safe" at home and in
your bed and the lights go out, you try not to think about what you
have just witnessed anymore. But it is no use. All the uneasy feelings
refuse to go away. And now that you are in darkness, they are
magnified. You are no longer in the relative safety of a crowed movie
theater. You are alone, in a state of undress, and laying there
wondering if there is something lurking out there in the dark that is
surrounding you. Just like the three film makers you had just seen had
wondered when they put their lanterns out. You try to tell yourself
that conventional wisdom is right, and that there is nothing in the
dark but the darkness. But you can't shake the feeling that
conventional wisdom just might be wrong. After all, it was wrong in
the case of the three young people in The Blair Witch Project. But
that was only a movie. Or was it?
The Blair Witch Project gets a very much deserved **** and
will join films like Psycho, Night of the Living Dead, The Exorcist,
and The Texas Chainsaw Massacre as a true horror film.

Author
Ed Morris
    After finally seeing The Blair Witch Project (TBWP), my first thought
was: "I have not been affected like I was supposed to, back when I first
heard about this film in February."  Of course, the film doesn't live up to
the hype, not that any other film in history ever did. The hype surrounding
this film is comparable to that of this year's Star Wars, and quite possibly
1989's Batman, which is the most hyped film I can ever remember.  But the
film on its own isn't bad, it's just not very good either.
The premise, which everyone on earth is now familiar with, is that you
are watching the filmed footage of three twentysomethings who went into the
woods and disappeared while looking for the legendary Blair Witch.  One of
the major flaws of the film is that it never gives you a background on the
witch, other than snippets of interviews with the locals the kids do in the
first 20 minutes of the movie.  And I don't want to hear that I should've
visited the website, either!  It should be in the movie.  That's complete
hogwash.
The middle third of the movie shows the kids having a group mental
breakdown as they become more and more lost, even retracing their own steps.
The last third deals with one of the three disappearing and screaming in the
distance, and the other two's search for him.  This final act of the film is
the best part of the movie, but unfortunately you wait 60 minutes for it.
The night scenes are tense, but not frightening.  The only part that
actually upset me was the last scenes of the film, when the two remaining
filmmakers stumble upon a dilapidated house in the middle of nowhere, and
their friend screams from within.  The two forget that they are in mortal
danger, and run thru the house looking for their friend.  This also is the
part that I didn't understand: why are the remaining two still filming? It
doesn't make sense.  It's just too incredulous to even consider.
The film ends abruptly, and the audience that I saw it with wasn't
satisifed.  But if you think about it, it can end only one way.  There was
much confusion from friends who saw it regarding what the remaining boy was
doing standing in the corner for the last scene.  After I explained that one
of the interviewees briefly touched on a hermit (not the witch) who was
possessed in the 1940's and made one person stand in a corner while he
gutted the other, my friends said they missed that.  I have to admit, I
didn't miss it, but wondered why the witch would do that.  The film does
explain some of the ways the witch kills, but this was not one of them.
After thinking about this some time, I realized it was a plot device to
allow the viewer some, albeit little, closure.  Another scene involves the
finding of bloody teeth in the forrest after the one filmmaker disappears
and his heard to be screaming in agony.  I felt the scene wasn't necessary,
and got away from the spirit of the film.  If the film's premise is "it's
best not to know", why go against it?
In any event, I rate the film ** out of **** stars and add: wait for the
video.

Author
R.L. Strong
ARTISEN ENTERTAINMENT PRESENTS A HAXAN FILM PRODUCTION
A FILM BY DANIEL MYRICK & EDUARDO SÁNCHEX   "THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT"
HEATHER DONAHUE   MICHAEL C. WILLIAMS   JOSHUA LEONARD
ORIGINAL MUSIC BY TONY CORA
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS: KEVIN J. FOXE, BOB EICK
CINEMATOGRAPHY BY NEAL FREDERICKS
PRODUCED BY ROBIN COWIE & GREGG HALE
EDITED, WRITTEN & DIRECTED BY DANIEL MYRICK AND EDUARDO SÁNCHEZ
Never underestimate the gullibility of the American Psyche. We want
our ghosts.  We need our government cover-ups and conspiracies. We
lust for an Extraterrestrial implant. And a lot of us really expect to
win the lottery. From this collective wanting of something unique and
otherworldly, comes the current flavor of the month "The Blair Witch
Project", a marvelously adept film representation of the old shell
game. Much hype and effort has gone into creating the "legend"
surrounding this film. There are individuals who earnestly believe in
the story of three film students who have mysteriously disappeared.
But for all the attentive hyperbole and inventiveness, what does the
movie have to offer. That is an interesting question, because without
the hype or the backstory (or the ingenious marketing strategy), 'The
Blair Witch Project' would not be as successful at raising the hackles
of most of it's viewers.
The film opens on a black screen. Fading up is the (now) famous
tagline for the film:
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods
near Burkittesville, Maryland, while shooting a documentary.
One year later, their footage was found.
With what has been seen before in the news reports about the film and
the mock documentary, this opening credit manages to create an air of
foreboding.
The film is basically a reconstruction from the discovered Video, Film
and Audio recordings of Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and
Joshua Leonard who have left home for Burkittesville, Maryland to
shoot a short documentary on the legend of the Blair Witch. We see
some interesting interviews with some of the locals of Burkittesville,
talking about the legend and the history of the curse.
As the three filmmakers march into the woods, tensions begin to
mount. Being ill prepared for any real camping experience, the three
young people are soon lost and bickering amongst themselves. This
slowly escalates into terror, as during the nights they are wakened by
strange noises, that seems to emanate from all around them.
As their terror and anxiety grows, Heather Donahue tries valiantly to
remain in control of the small group.  Unfortunately, her growing
self-doubt and insecurity is fuels by the constant bickering from both
Joshua Leonard and (especially) Michael Williams. When they loss (?!)
their map, all reason is lost. The students wander aimlessly in
circles, returning to the same campsite that they had left earlier
that morning.
That night after much noise and chasing of unseen visitors, Joshua
disappears.  Now Heather is seized with fear. Michael now has to serve
as the leader, something he seems suddenly capable of doing.  Again,
more noises during the night, followed by the discovery of a strange
totem left outside of their tent, which is tied together with remnants
of Joshua's clothing. Concealed inside are the visual remains of
something possibly human, possibly animal. Now all hope expires as
Heather has a breakdown, confessing to her video camera that she is
responsible for what has happened.  The film climaxes with the
discovery of an abandoned house, it's interior walls covered with the
dirty (bloody?) handprints of children.
What "The Blair Witch Project" has managed to do, with no lack of
inventiveness, is to re-invent the marketing champagne for
movies. Since the development of the Internet, motion picture
companies had used the World Wide Web as another marketing tool. You
can download trailers and bios of your favorite stars and view behind
the scene video clips from any number of movies. What has happened
with the "Blair Witch" is the creation of an advertisement that seems
not to be an advertisement.  The film in and of itself is remarkably
well done, in an amateurish cinema verité method. Unfortunately,
the constant videotape use calls into question the rational of the
participants. Why would you continue filming yourself washing your
hand in a stream to remove the blood from it, as it revolts you. Most
people would at least put the camera down (or drop it). But not
Heather, she is the consummate filmmaker. Willing to die (literally)
for her art. The use of the actors themselves as the camera men is not
so revolutionary, having been used to frightening effect in the little
seen film "THE LAST BROADCAST" (1998). The mock documentary style has
been a staple of Italian gore/cannibal films since the early 70's. But
what makes the 'Blair Witch' so involuntary is that there seems to be
no real direction of the actors. One does buy into the mythology after
a while, and being so immersed in this universe, can help but be
dragged along.
As a horror film, "The Blair Witch Project" is unique in that at a
time when prosthetic effects and cosmetics have become so realistic,
this film eschews them in favor of the old Val Lewton approach. What
you don't see is psychologically more terrifying than anything
visual. Your imagination can fill in the blanks much more clearly than
any effects master could. The Mise-En-Scéne of the woods decorated
with the totems hanging from every branch is remarkably foreboding,
giving the viewer a level of unease that cannot be easily shaken
off. Also the music by Tony Cora is along the lines of the subtle
tones and noises used in Tobe Hooper's 'Texas Chainsaw Massacre',
(another film that plumped the psychological well for it's
effectiveness)
Now, let's get one thing straight. No one really died here. In fact
Michael Williams is currently working on another film (a big budget
item). Heather has also been cast in another project. These young
people are professional actors.  The mythology of the 'Blair Witch' is
a complete fabrication. This is the stuff of urban legends. We've all
heard stories of headless ghosts wandering through wooden glades, or
businesses built on possible Indian (or Spanish) burial ground. All
nice little stories to help the kids get a poor night's sleep.  What
Directors Daniel Myrick & Eduardo Sánchez have done here is create
a marvelously deft psychological test for the masses. Without the
attentive mythology and aggressive hype, their film would not be
anywhere near as accessible or successful.
On it's own; the film is painfully slow. There is far too much 'shaky
cam' work being done, giving many viewers a disorienting
experience. For the most part this works in raising expectations from
the viewers that something is about to happen. The film is riff with
false starts. While the editing is remarkable efficient, it sometimes
works against itself, as whenever we jump from video to 16 millimeter
film and back within a short scene. But again, this has the desired
neurological effect of persuading the viewer. The film almost becomes
an inkblot or Thematic Apperception Test with it's continual viewing
of the woods, especially at night when the lack of light and
preponderance of shadow creates it's own images. Most interesting of
all is that the film is presented in an aspect ratio of 1.33:1,
basically the same ratio as your television set. This gives the film
another level of psychological immediacy, making the film seem
real. We're used to seeing films projected on a big, wide screen. This
film instead creates a field of view that is limited from the start,
as the peripheral area of the screen is blank. Whether this film will
work as well on home video is a question that waits to be answered.
This is a hard film to review. One cannot separate the promotion of
the film from the film itself. They are so intertwined with one
another as to be symbiotic, feeding off of each other. It will be
interesting to see the promotion that is used to market the film's
video release.
So on a scale of one to five stars, "The Blair Witch Project" gets two
ratings.  The film itself gets only 2˝.  But the promotion,
mythology and film together get a 4. "The Blair Witch Project" is not
so much a film, as it is what the title really implies. It is a
PROJECT!
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author.

Author
Brian Takeshita
The premise is pretty simple.  Three young film students go out into
the woods of Maryland to get footage for a project on what locals call
the Blair Witch, an entity who supposedly comes to claim lives from
the local population every so many years.  Although their foray is
supposed to last only a couple of days, they get lost and have a
difficult time getting their bearings despite their possession of a
map and a compass.  Worse yet, each night they are tormented by
strange, haunting noises, and each morning find evidence that someone
or something knows they are there.  Is it the Blair Witch?  Whatever
it is, the students never come out of the forest again.  Sounds like a
fairly run-of-the-mill horror movie, but what's different about this
film is it's a documentary.
Well, okay, it's a mockumentary, but the style in which THE BLAIR
WITCH PROJECT is filmed is so natural, it takes on a very eerie
reality.  Directors Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez hired three
actors, gave them sketchy details about the roles they were to play
and the rough outline of the plot, and turned them loose in the woods
with cameras, food, and a global positioning system receiver so they
would at least know where they were at any given time.  Myrick,
Sanchez, and a small crew followed the actors at a distance and left
them food and new camera batteries at predetermined checkpoints.  The
actors were free to improvise dialog, and shot all the footage
themselves with a small videocamera and a 16mm black and white, giving
the whole thing a documentary-like look and feel.  The improvised
script is also very effective, for even though much of the dialog is
repetitive and simplistic, it's probably more akin to what real people
would say in this situation than anything pre-written could have
achieved.  It's as if what these three actors are experiencing is
very, very real, making the film even scarier than you'd think.
Aiding in the illusion of reality has been a campaign of rumors and
publicity implying that the story of the disappearing film students
were true.  Even though the directors and actors have been
subsequently interviewed for printed articles, many unknowing viewers
have been uncertain as to the origin of the footage, purported to have
been found mysteriously in the basement of an abandoned house a year
after the "students" disappearance.  Believe me, creepy as this film
was, the fright factor would have gone up exponentially if I had been
under the impression it were real.  If you've got friends who don't
know the secret, don't spoil it for them yet.
Except for a few rare instances, the film doesn't explicitly show us
anything that would actually scare us.  Instead, most of the scares
come from the reactions of the actors, leaving the sources of their
terror to your imagination.  Moreover, a few of the occurrences are
even left up to your own interpretation, causing mild chills for the
next several days as you run the possibilities through your mind.
Those looking for definitive answers, or those who are more fond of
today's "show everything" style of horror film may find this film
lacking, but others will find this approach a breath of fresh air.
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is not one of those barn burners that throws
scares at you the moment the film starts to roll.  Instead, it's a
slow pot boiler that gives you circumstances and information that
ultimately lead up to an incredibly scary last 20 minutes.  So
frightening is this portion, that "It's not real" was a mantra I said
to myself every so often.  However, that's not to say that the film is
badly paced with nothing to offer until the end.  On the contrary,
while the first hour of the film may not be exactly frightening, it is
a very interesting character study as the film students realize their
hopelessly lost situation, then become aware that they may not be
alone in the forest, and ultimately lose their presences of mind.  As
they slip down that slope toward their ultimate fate, we're right
there along with them.
However, as effective as this film is, there are at least two things
which stand in the way of making it more enjoyable.  First is the fact
that the cameras keep rolling through virtually everything.  The
students have an argument and it's caught on tape.  The students are
scared out of their wits at something they can't see, and yet manage
to keep the 16mm going the whole time.  It occurs to you more than
once that any regular person would drop the camera once things started
getting desperate, and therefore the illusion of reality is shattered
in a few places.  But to their credit, the actors provide a
semi-decent explanation (looking through the camera filters reality,
and they sure don't want to be there), and besides, without the
constant filming there would be no movie.
The second problem is the constant jarring motion of both cameras,
especially the video camcorder.  I realize it would be pretty
difficult to keep a hand-held camera steady while on the move, but the
shakiness was to the extreme and left many at my screening with a
headache or nausea.  Be warned that if you're susceptible to motion
sickness, this film may not be for you.
If you see THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, just keep in mind that the payoff
doesn't occur until the end.  I've heard reports of people walking out
prematurely because "nothing happened," but to do so would be a
definite mistake.  If you wish to be scared, be patient and you will
be rewarded.  But as they say, be careful what you wish for.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.

Susan Granger's review of "THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT" (Artisan Entertainment)
 On October 21, 1994, three young film-makers hiked into the
Black Hills Forest of Maryland to shoot a documentary about the local
legend of the Blair Witch. They were never seen or heard from
again. One year later, their footage was found. This film is their
legacy, we're told, documenting what happened in the woods. Heather
Donahue sets the stage by interviewing residents about the spooky
folktale that involves mysterious disappearances and evidence of
gruesome torture.  Her two male companions, Joshua Leonard and Michael
Williams, trudge along. Terror strikes on the second night when they
hear snapping twigs and branches that sound like people circling their
tent - and then they find a hank of hair ritualistically tied with
blood and human tooth. "I'm scared to close my eyes. I'm scared to
open them," she says, as the fear builds. While the twisted conclusion
is not as horrific as you might expect, it's ambiguous enough to keep
you talking after the show's over. The story behind this low-budget,
counterfeit chiller is: writer-director-editors Daniel Myrick and
Eduardo Sanchez hired three actors and sent them into the woods for
eight days to improvise the picture. Certain destination points and
encounters were scripted, others definitely weren't. Therefore, the
images you see on the screen are often crude and jiggly - due to the
hand-held camera. Nevertheless, on the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10,
"The Blair Witch Project" is a goose-bumply, spine-tingling, scary
7. This creepy, clever, edge-of-your-seat thriller succeeds because it
plays on your imagination, your fear of the dark and the unknown and
the unseen, as opposed to showing graphic displays of violence and
brutality. What you create in your mind is far more terrifying than
anything someone can do with special effects.

Author
Walter Frith
At a perfect running length of 80 minutes, 'The Blair Witch Project' is a
completely fictional film that looks ferociously like a documentary.  It
uses mostly the thought of horror instead of visual horror itself to make
its effective showcase a truly memorable horror film that will have you
looking over your shoulder in the theatre. That's something few big budget
Hollywood films these days are able to do.  The film was made for around
thirty thousand dollars, the cost of a new car with several luxuries and is
destined to do well with young audiences.
Based on the fictional premise that a group of young student film makers
went into the woods in October 1994 to film a story about the legendary
Blair witch, gives 'The Blair Witch Project' its name. Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard play the threesome who are ambitious yet
naive, disorganized, irresponsible much of the time, and most of all
tenacious. The film reports that during the week or so they went hiking in
the reclusive woods of Maryland, they were never heard from again and that
their footage was found a year after their disappearance and that footage is
their story.
It begins with the group using various methods of recording such as both
black and white and colour to tell the story of how they are preparing to
leave for their excursion. We see them at home, in the driveway and in their
hotel on 16 mm film. Then the film picks up considerably from this point.
They talk to various people who have heard stories of the legendary Blair
witch, some believing in the story and some not. Their journey into the
forest gives them the lesson of their lives which may be their last. This
film may do for camping what 'Jaws' did for going swimming in the ocean. One
of the people in the town with whom they spoke before leaving for the woods,
tells of a story about a strange collection of rocks in a certain
arrangement. They find it and it becomes part of their story as a chill is
sent down their spines about this prophecy coming true and the consequences
that may come with it. They also find a ritual style of trees arranged in a
frightening manner which further threatens their sanity which they later try
desparately to maintain.
As the film moves on, their first night in the woods goes without much of a
hitch. As things go on they get worse and worse. One of them throws the map
away that was their salvation out of the forest, they run low on food and
water and hike around in a circle only to find themselves back where they
started. They make a humourous reference to the film 'Deliverance' which is
intended to get a few laughs. They hear strange noises in dark and far away
places in the woods at night and feel that their lives are in danger.
Tempers flare and we see this all done in a true professional style with a
script that looks like it was ALL improvised. In fact, much of the film was
reportedly improvised but not knowing which scenes were and which weren't
make it seem all the more impressive in its final blend. In a big Hollywood
production you can usually tell which parts are improvised. The acting is
top notch as we see the shift in friendships turn to hate and frustration.
Film makers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez have written, directed and
edited a documentary style motion picture (and you still won't believe that
it ISN'T a documentary) that shows they have a promising career if they stay
focused with their own visions and don't sell out to the Hollywood style
claptrap. The Cohen brothers ('Fargo') have been the main artists that have
avoided doing this and are the true material that film students should take
their cues from.  Perhaps Myrick and Sanchez have.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Mr. Bryan Frankenseuss Theiss
MY QUITE LENGTHY TAKE ON THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT

  When a variety of credible critics claim that a new horror movie is one of
the scariest they've ever seen, I make plans to see it. That's just how it
works. I love a good horror movie (sometimes even a bad one) and if a movie
really is scary, I want to experience it. However, the film festival and
promotional screening buzz of the Blair Witch Project has grown to such a
deafening roar that it seems inevitable that it won't live up to the hype. "It
couldn't be as scary as The Texas Chain Saw Massacre," I told myself, "But
hopefully it will be good."
  At least in the circles I travel, The Blair Witch Project is easily one of
the most anticipated summer movies of '99. Everyone wants to see if it lives up
to the hype - will it be another out of nowhere, low budget first feature
horror classic, like Night of the Living Dead or Texas Chain Saw Massacre or
The Evil Dead? Artisan Entertainment has cruelly but cleverly used this
anticipation as a promotional gimmick by going ahead and releasing it on a mere
27 screens nationwide. The scene at the Neptune in Seattle is, I would assume,
typical - the box office swarmed all day, every single show selling out hours
in advance, enormous around-the-block lines completely unprecedented for this
one screen, semi-arthouse theater. And while I was waiting in line two hours in
advance for a 9:45 showing, clutching tickets I had bought at 3 in the
afternoon, people would walk by, see the lines and exclaim variations on "This
must be the movie of the summer." No doubt these people will check the movie
out "when the crowds die down" and it's playing in multiplexes.
  Another thing that has apparently helped to promote the film is the "let's
pretend it's real" approach to some of the marketing. I never thought the web
site or other promotional materials were intended to deceive people into
thinking the Blair Witch was real. Nevertheless, I heard the guy behind me in
line telling a long, fanciful story about how the filmmakers were found
dismembered and the footage was buried in someone's backyard and blah blah
blah. Other people were overheard referring to it as a "true story." (I can't
help but suspect that these are the people who will be most disappointed by the
movie. They ought to realize it's a "hoax" as soon as it ends - would a real
snuff film have credits?)
  The premise of the movie, as you surely must know, is that three student
filmmakers venture into the woods to make an amateur documentary about a local
legend involving a witch and a series of child murders. The filmmakers, we are
told by the opening title, disappeared, and one year later their footage was
found. We watch their black and white 16 mm footage and goofing-around digital
video, edited together to tell the story of their experiences getting lost in
the woods.
  Early on, I was skeptical as to whether the found-footage conceit would work.
They interview some locals about the "Blair Witch" legend, and the very first
interview is rather stiff. The director of the film within the film, Heather,
records some narration in a cemetery, and it's almost too bad to be believed.
She changes her accent to sound more serious, and the results are laughable.
(Otherwise, the amateurishness of the documentary-in-progress seems dead on
accurate. I am absolutely positive that the aspiring filmmakers I went to
college with would have taken the same approach - static, black and white 16 mm
for the "scary parts," plus lots of crappy video footage of the filmmakers
hiking and fooling around in the hotel room.)
  But the film quickly won me over, and I found that there were very few
touches that rang false. Almost none of the dialogue seems like it could have
possibly been scripted (apparently, the directors led the actors on sort of a
role-playing scavenger hunt, leading them through the story with a series of
notes). As far as I can tell, most of the characterization is not so much
storytelling as footage of the actual bonding between the actors. They joke
with each other in ways rarely captured on film before - not clever quips, just
the kinds of things people say to each other when they're hanging out together.
One of my favorite such moments is when Michael jokingly reprimands Heather and
Josh for incorrectly referring to the Skipper on Gilligan's Island. "Let's stop
calling him 'The Captain,' you illiterate TV people. It's *the Skipper*."
  What results from this improvisatory technique is perhaps the most realistic
group of protagonists in horror movie history. I can relate to the heroes of
The Texas Chain Saw Massacre or Dawn of the Dead, but not as effortlessly as I
can here. The clever quasi-Method techniques used to get these performances
really help pull you into the movie. These are real people, really reacting -
it's just that what they're reacting to, of course, isn't real. But suspension
of disbelief was not a problem for me. I felt like I really was going to "shoot
doc" with these people, and then getting lost in the woods with them, and then
running blindly through the trees screaming with them.
  One particularly realistic touch is the way the fear slowly builds throughout
the movie. Some horror movies have their protagonists take their situations too
lightly, like when Jennifer Love Hewitt goes tanning shortly after witnessing
murders in I Still Know What You Did Last Summer. But I think most horror
filmmakers, had they made The Blair Witch Project, would have had the
protagonists terrified out of their minds for the last two thirds of the movie,
giving it a melodramatic feel that probably would not have worked. 
  The film, however, allows the characters to feel better when the daylight
comes. They may have witnessed something spooky last night in the dark, but in
the sunny afternoon everything seems safer. They allow themselves to
rationalize what happened, or to put it out of their minds, or to assume that
they can make it out of the woods before darkness hits again. For a long time,
they assume it's just someone trying to scare them, which still scares them
because "something has to be wrong" with someone who would bother to do that.
But as the film progresses, the situation gets worse, the nights get scarier
and the chances of ever finding the edge of the woods begin to seem miniscule.
It's a slow burn. Rather than start out with something scary, then introduce
the characters, then get scary again, The Blair Witch Project starts out funny
and really has to build toward the scary. And it works.
  I don't want to say that The Blair Witch Project is one of the scariest
movies I've ever seen. The more times people say that, the more the
expectations are built, and there will most certainly be people who see it
years later and have heard for so long how scary it is that when they finally
see it, it seems laughable. 
  But the fact is, a movie has never before scared me the way this one did.
Maybe The Shining or The Texas Chain Saw Massacre would have done the trick if
I had seen them for the first time at the right age and in a theater. Or maybe
The Exorcist, had I grown up Catholic. Only time travel will ever settle that.
But when shit went down in the Burkittsville woods, I felt a powerful,
vibrating chill all across my skin - the same feeling you get when you almost
get hit by a car or otherwise feel just a little too close to death. My
girlfriend and I like to watch horror movies together, and she usually squeezes
my hand tight during the scary scenes. This is the first movie that has
prompted her to bite my finger in fear.
  Many hardened skeptics and contrarians are already popping up to claim that
it's all hype, and that the movie actually isn't at all scary. I don't think
many of them could have been at the 9:45 Neptune show, though.
  Throughout the film, people all around me were looking at the film
intellectually, or just not taking it seriously. As the opening text unfolded,
the guy next to me continued a conversation with his girlfriend about some
Buffalo Springfield song that they had been reminded of by one of the trailers.
Later he said out loud, "That's a scary shot," dissecting the movie, probably
an aspiring filmmaker. Even late in the film, when things had gotten real scary
and uncomfortable, the theater would rumble with laughter every time a
character made a semi-amusing comment. It didn't seem like the kind of audience
that could be terrified by a movie.
  But at a certain point late in the movie, when the protagonists stumble upon
a certain thing, I heard an entire packed theater get scared out of their wits.
This is not a sudden jolt or a blunt scare like a dead body or a pool of blood.
It's just the unexpected discovery of something that at this point in the story
makes the audience fear what might happen next. A massive, communal moan of
dread rumbled back and forth between the walls of the theater. You could hear
the entire audience squirm in unison. This is not the "BOO! Made you flinch,"
type of shock that is so prevalent in modern horror films. This is more like
true blue, horrified, horrible, reeling in horror type of horror. I wonder if
this might be the closest I'll get to ever experiencing something like the
terror that people allegedly had when The Exorcist was first released.
  So why is it so scary? It's not virtuoso cinematic technique, or pushing the
boundaries of horror subject matter. I think what the filmmakers did was push
aside most of what they've seen in horror movies and instead try to imagine
what it would really be like in real life. What would really be scary? A guy
with an ax chopping off a guy's head? Yeah, that would be scary. But what about
something more subtle? Like, just hearing footsteps when  you're out where
there shouldn't be people? In a slick studio horror movie, the idea would be
ludicrous. But in a raw, low budget movie that so unerringly captures reality,
it wrenches your stomach.
  What's wrong with today's horror movies, many people have tried to convince
me, is that they show too much, when the real way to make a movie scary is to
leave everything up to the imagination. I think that's overstating the
argument, though. Yes, some of the most horrifying events in, say, Psycho, take
place off screen. You can't really deny that Jaws and Alien wouldn't be less
scary if their respective creatures had much more screen time. And I think it
is notable how many people remember horrendous amounts of blood and bodily
mutilation in The Texas Chain Saw Massacre, even though the actual movie is
virtually bloodless. 
  But just because it works so well in these classics doesn't mean it's the
only legitimate approach to making a horror film. Would Night of the Living
Dead be scarier without the shot of the zombies munching guts? Was I imagining
it when I thought the gruesome bloodletting and eye-munching tarantulas of The
Beyond made my heart beat fast? Would The Exorcist be scarier if we had to
imagine Regan turning her head around?
  I don't think so. But The Blair Witch Project takes the other approach -
leaving it to the imagination - and succeeds tremendously. I am certain that it
will become the most frequently used example of the "tell, don't show"
technique of horror.
  The premise of Blair Witch Project allows a good twist on being Left To The
Imagination (for now on, to be referred to as LTTI). Since the film pretends to
be an attempt to document actual horrific events, the audience is made to feel
like they are examining the footage, squinting at it, trying to find the
evidence in there somewhere. When something happens off screen, you don't
think, "Nice cinematic technique." It's more like, "Damn, they didn't have the
camera on." Like real videos of alleged supernatural phenomenon, the eeriness
of the footage largely lies in how frustratingly incomplete it is. You're
always searching for a quick glimpse of something, somewhere in the frame. In
the instances when you do see something horrifying, the camera is shaky and
unclear enough that it's debatable what you saw. Even the eerie sounds heard in
the night are largely LTTI, because they are covered by the ruffling
microphones and unzipping tents of the terrified film crew.
  I didn't even notice it until after the movie, but I think the lack of music
really helps, and almost falls into the LTTI category. A good score can really
add a lot to a horror film, particularly those of the atmospheric, gothic
variety. There are terrifying movies that don't work at all when viewed without
the music, like (according to John Carpenter) Halloween. But Blair Witch
Project has no music to poke at your emotions, or enhance the creepiness, or
tell you how to feel. The story is left to fend for itself. Even the end
credits, thankfully, don't try to cheer you up or appeal to your sense of irony
with a catchy tune. Instead, they leave you with ambient noises, as if to say,
"Keep thinking about it, sucker. This movie isn't leaving right away."
  So since the movie really does live up to the hype, and since the
overwhelming crowds of the limited release seem to be a genuine phenomenon, I
think it's safe to say that The Blair Witch Project will be a monster hit that
will signal a new era in horror films. Perfect timing, too, because the short
lived Scream cycle seems to be on its last legs. 
  Hugely successful horror films always inspire a slew of half-assed imitators
that miss the point, and a few pretty good ones that don't. It will be
interesting to see how studios and other filmmakers will try to capitalize on
and/or learn from The Blair Witch Project. Here are a few predictions:
1. Much lip service will be given to the LTTI technique. This week, Dreamworks
releases Jan De Bont's effects heavy remake of the LTTI classic The Haunting. I
predict that 75% of all reviews will mention The Blair Witch Project as a
superior alternative, because it doesn't try to show everything. Perhaps some
of the next slew of horror films will put more thought into the ancient art of
making the audience fear what they might see, instead of what they do see.
2. One or two studios will try picking up low budget supernatural horror movies
by unknown directors. They will be met with much less enthusiasm than The Blair
Witch Project.
3. Someone will try making a movie with a Scream style, plucked-from-TV cast
encountering a supernatural horror in the woods. The trades will call it "The
Blair Witch Project meets Scream."
4. I fear that particularly unimaginative filmmakers will try copying the
mockumentary angle. Blair Witch Project isn't the first horror movie to do
this, but another horror mockumentary inspired by its success would still count
as a rip off. Other filmmakers will have trouble duplicating the realism of
Blair Witch Project.
5. Hopefully, the movie's success will inspire filmmakers to think about what
really is scary, rather than what is traditionally used to scare people in
horror films. They will probe their own fears and try to figure out how to
depict them realistically on film. I don't think they should abandon the use of
extravagant visual effects, but it should free them up to realize that
audiences don't need them.
A postscript concerning The Blair Witch Project and my precious Texas Chain Saw
Massacre:
  Although the films are very different from each other, it is my belief that
BWP was heavily influenced by 'Saw, from the opening text implying (but not
outright stating) that the story is true, to certain witchly artifacts
reminiscent of the dangling bone ornaments in 'Saw, to the ambiguous marketing
which has confused people into believing BWP is a true story. There are still
many people who mistakenly believe 'Saw is based on a true story (Ed Gein, who
didn't live in Texas and had no chainsaw to massacre with, doesn't count). 
  After 'Saw, director Tobe Hooper went on to make one unacknowledged classic
(The Texas Chainsaw Massacre Part 2), one above average sleaze thriller (The
Funhouse), and one mainstream success that most people credit to Steven
Spielberg (Poltergeist). Most of the rest of his output has been either
substandard horror with limited appeal (Eaten Alive), or unmitigated crap
(Spontaneous Combustion, The Mangler). I still hope he will someday recapture
the demented magic of his two 'Saw films, but most write him off as the
director of a fluke one-off.
  I hope Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez, the creators of The Blair Witch
Project, don't suffer the Curse of Tobe Hooper. So far, the odds seem against
them. Much of the strength of BWP lies in the mockumentary gimmick, which one
would hope they won't repeat. But we don't know if these guys know anything
about other forms of cinematic storytelling, or directing scripted actors, or
even writing dialogue.
  On the other hand, we do know that these are clever guys who came up with an
original way to film an extremely effective horror movie. Here's hoping they
have more tricks up their sleeves.
"I write rhymes so fresh I try to bite my own verses." --Tash

Author
Michael Redman
As I sit in front of the glowing screen in this pre-dawn hour thinking about
this film, everything around me feels eerie. The usually-comforting piles of
clutter and artifacts that fill my office are alien. When my cat walks across
the keyboard causing me to delete his gibberish, it's not an annoyance, it's foreboding.
I walk to into the living room and put on some Jimmy Buffett -- the least
frightening music I can think of. It doesn't work. There's still a strange
atmosphere haunting the house.
This is the power of "The Blair Witch Project". It's been two days since I saw
the movie and the reaction remains.
Three student filmmakers wander off into a Maryland forest in October 1994 to
film a documentary about the Blair witch, a local piece of folklore. They
disappear, never to be found. A year later, anthropology students discover a
duffel bag containing film and video cassettes buried under a 100 year-old
cabin deep in the woods. The movie we see is the found footage.
Knowledgeable members of the audience know this is all fake. The actors
playing the students are still alive. The film team never existed. None of
them were lost or killed.
The footage is a combination of the black and white 16mm supposedly filmed for
the documentary and video shot for a "Making Of" feature. Much of it has the
appearance of what you get when you take a camcorder out for the day. Scenes
are poorly lighted. Subjects are out of frame. Often it's difficult to make
out what you are seeing or hearing.
It's the most unprofessional film cinematography ever seen on the big screen.
And possibly the most realistic. The amateur quality is what makes it work.
Like even the worst home movies or old grainy 8mm porn films, there's a
fascination because there's something real going on. It's as if you are
eavesdropping on someone's life.
No matter how much they try, high production values can never accomplish this.
The very nature of the unprofessionalism erases the barrier between the
audience and the film.
Anyone who has spent a few nights in the woods knows the fear of the night
unknowns that creeps into your mind at times.
Usually when I'm camping, it's with a large group of ten to a few hundred
people. There's always weirdness, but I have an idea of what most of it is. On
the occasions when there's only been two or three of us, it's a different
matter. Unidentifiable sounds come from outside the tent and you know there's
_something_ going on out there.
In the film, some of the "somethings" can be attributed, as you do when out
there at night, to animal activity. But some of them decidedly can not.
After the students are lost, they hear disembodied voices. They awaken one
morning to find piles of rocks outside their tent. The night scenes never show
us anything beyond the few feet the lights shine. Whatever is there, is beyond
their -- and our -- knowing.
Some of the most frightening scenes are from the camcorder left on as they run
helter-skelter through the forest in the dark. All we see are branches
brushing past the lens. All we hear are panting and a few excited words. It's chilling.
The three actors (Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael Williams) use their
real names in the film and are completely convincing as people you might run
into walking down the street. Ordinary people scared out of their wits.
The movie has some flaws. We don't learn enough about the Blair witch. When I
left the theater, I felt disappointed in the last two minutes. Too much was
neatly wrapped up and I thought it would have been better had the film ended earlier.
But days later, the final five seconds stay with me. It's more terrifying now
than it was then.
Although the film is undeniably ground-breaking, it's unlikely we're going to
see a lot of movies copying it as is the tradition. It's a concept that can't
work more than once or twice.
In some ways it's a one-trick pony. But it's a remarkable trick.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 24 years and during that time has
seen a lot of weird things in the woods at night. Email your camping
experiences to redman@indepen.com. No, really. Do it.)
[The appeared in the 8/5/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
John Carroll
The Blair Witch Project
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
82 Minutes Long, Rated R for strong language
A great film that has you captivated the whole way through for one of the
most haunting endings in the horror film genre.
   The horror film genre has always been depleted.  Since Hitchcock, we have
never seen a steady stream of truly scary films.  However, the horror film
genre has been resurrected in the 90s, but to no avail.  Scream gave
viewers a spook or two, I Know What You Did Las Summer was just a teen
vehicle, and the latest, The Haunting, is a special effects masterpiece
that forgets that its purpose is to scare us, not have us in awe of the beauty
of the house.  But, we have a true horror film in our midst right now.  The
Blair Witch Project.  It is not a scarefest from start to finish, but as
you shall see in this review, it gets us to believe and then pulls out the
horror.
   This film was made for forty thousand dollars.  You probably could have
only filmed two minutes of The Haunting with that budget.  But, after
seeing this film, we need to be constantly reminded that money cannot buy depth
in a motion picture.  Does this film look like it was made with forty thousand
dollars?  No, it looks like it used even less.  But, this is the bait.  And
once you believe that they are stranded in the woods, and once you believe that
there might be something out there with them, they pull you in.  Hook, line and
sinker.
   The cast is wonderful in this film.  The only way a horror film can scare
you is if they make you believe what is going on.  Alfred Hitchcock did that,
and that is why he is the king of horror.  I am not comparing Eduardo Sanchez
and Daniel Myrick to Hitchcock, but they did do a great job with their cast. 
Heather Donahue plays, well, Heather Donahue.  Joshua Leonard and Michael
Williams also play themselves.  I guess forty thousand dollars cannot buy you
different names.  Or maybe it just added to the realism.
   Heather Donahue is great.  In a present day where leading ladies are hard
to come by, Donahue takes the cake.  The problem with most women taking leading
roles is that they cannot be believable, something this whole film is based on.
 But, Donahue plays the role in stride.  Her character is the one making the
documentary, getting help from Williams and Leonard.  She is demanding, hard
nosed and the leader and I believed it.  
   Michael Williams plays his role terrifically as well.  When the film
starts, you think he will be the minor character.  All he is there for is the
sound.  Well, think again.  He lets his role flourish.  As the group of three
meshes, his role standouts, which becomes much more important as the film roles
on.  
   Joshua Leonard plays the sort of, peace hippie who tries to keep
everything under control.  Surprisingly, he is the first one to disappear.  His
role complements the others as well.  None of the cast stands out because they
all give great performances and they all mesh.  Whatever egos they may have had
were checked at the door because this cast is about getting the film done, not
giving the best performance.  This makes their performances even better.  
   The plot is the best part of this film.  Despite the great acting and
realism, all horror films still need a scary plot.  This one is based on three
filmmakers who want to make a documentary on the local legend of The Blair
Witch.  I will not spoil too much, but lets just say that The Blair Witch is a
person/creature who supposedly killed children years ago.  Then, after
interviewing a few locals, they head out into the woods.
   They start filming in the woods, finding places that are spoken of in the
legend.  They are disappointed, but still film, looking for more answers. 
However, they soon find a portion of the woods littered with The Blair Witch
"symbol."  This is where things start to go wrong.  They start
hearing noises in their sleep; first everyone believes it could be an animal or
some sort of prankster.  But, as they start to believe it could be The Blair
Witch, we start to believe as well.  And as things progress, they lose such
things as the map and Joshua.  That is about as far as I should go, but let me
just say that when you see the ending, prepare for a haunting experience.
   Is there anything wrong with The Blair Witch Project?  Yes, but
nothing major that holds it back from being a four star film.  The only flaws I
saw in this film were with two things.  Mike kicks their map into the river,
claiming it was not getting them anywhere.  At this point in the film, they are
nowhere near crazy, which is why I do not believe this part.  The other flaw is
nothing major and actually enhanced the experience for me.  But, for those of
you who cannot stand shoddy camerawork (i.e. your home movies) then do not see
this film.  The camera goes everywhere and even has times when the screen is
completely black and all you hear are voices.  This added to the realism for
myself, but might make other people just suffer motion sickness.
   Overall, this is the best film that I have seen this summer.  It has
humor in the beginning and then progresses to have you believe the scenario. 
Then it blows your mind with an innovative and haunting ending.  And,
ironically, it is a sharp contrast to the effects laden blockbusters that
plague us every summer.  Fortunately, The Blair Witch Project was made
with forty thousand dollars, plus a lot of heart, hard work and creativity. 
This makes it one of the best films of the summer and of the year.  
Rating: Four Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Brandon Herring
May contain objectional material and spoilers.
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
The movie opens with this message:
"In October of 1994, three student filmakers disappeared in the woods near
Burkittsville, Maryland, while shooting a documentary....a year later their
footage was found."
"The Blair Witch Project" is a brilliant, inventive, original and downright
horrifying movie that isn't your typical scare people by jumping type. This
movie has only shot of blood, no violence, no ghosts, no witches or anything.
What the movie does, is make your imagination run wild, and makes you scared by
what you don't see. The movie has no scary music and no jump scenes. The scares
are strong and long-lasting, and when something is happening it doesn't go to
another scene, it stays on that scene till it's over.
The movie is in a style of a documentary. Three film-makers: Heather Donahue,
Joshua Williams, and Michael Leonard. The three travel to Burkittsville,
Maryland to film a documentary based on the myth of the Blair Witch. Everyone
in this town knows about it, or her. Everyone knows that in the 40's a man
brutally killed children based on he heard voices in his head, which was the
Blair Witch. The three excited and hyped up go to camp out in the woods. 
They hike the trails everyday, and enjoy the fresh air. When they get back to
their tent, and begin to get in for the night, they hear noises, twigs
cracking. Then they find strange artifacts hanging from trees. They hear
voices, screams, laughs, as their food begins to dwindle they are forced to
live under strict conditions. All three of them are scared, not able to
understand what is going on. Their way out is blocked, they find rocks and
other sort of strange things.
"The Blair Witch Project" is a horror movie. But not the type of 'Scream'
movies you expect. This movie is downright scary and original. It is filmed in
the way of a documentary with thier footage and docu footage combined. It
doesn't have any ghosts or witches or anything to jump out at you to scare you.
This film is genuinely scary. And I have to say not to offend anyone, but if
you don't or didn't like this then you didn't understand it. If you thought it
was boring, then you didn't listen. If you thought the ending was bad, then
well nevermind. 
To put it another way: 'The Blair Witch Project' is an instant classic. The
opening message is what we are watching. The footage that was found. But what
we have to tell ourselves while watching this movie is that it is only a movie.
Nothing more, there are actors, actresses, directors and more. While watching
this movie, well no scratch that you don't 'watch' this movie, you expierence
this movie. You are made a character and brought into the woods along with the
students.
This movie is the scariest...no the most horrifying and terrifying movie ever
made. After it is over, you are left there thinking, and after it you are still
thinking. What was that? Who is that? I wonder what did that...These are the
many questions left unanswered. I don't think you will be able to sleep much
after this movie. I don't think you will be able to even think much after this
movie. At least that's from my expierience. See 'The Blair Witch Project' to
learn what it is like to be horrified. Then see it again.....
Reviewed  August 7, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard.
Directed By Daniel Myrick and Ed Sanchez
Running Time: 1 hour 20 minutes
Arriving in a barrage of hype, The Blair Witch Project is one of the biggest
box office success of the year. However, like The Golden Child, although
Blair Witch has made a lot of money, it's not very good. Donahue, Williams
and Leonard play themselves as three students who set out to make a
documentary about the Blair Witch myth. The film is made up of the camcorder
footage they recorded, which means grainy footage and woozy camera angles.
Although events start of normal, they get weird pretty quickly, while the
threesome argue more and more as the journey goes on.
Although an interesting premise, The Blair Witch Project amounts to nothing
more than a missed opportunity. The biggest mistake the film makes is to let
three mediocre actors the chance to improvise. Most of the dialogue is
ad-libbed, and still manages to sound like a poor B-movie. The 'script'
eventually degenerates into shouting matches, with the F-word included a lot
to sound like students. There are breaks in these arguments where some
creepy events occur, but then it's back to the shouting and swearing, which
gets very tiresome very quickly. If I wanted to see three people get lost in
the woods, shout a lot and swear, I'd go on scout camp. But no, the audience
is meant to  get some entertainment factor out of this, but I'm not quite
sure how.
The supernatural parts of the film are actually interesting, especially if
close attention is paid to the story developing first twenty minutes. With
no music and no budget to work with, the film has to depend on natural,
psychological scares, which are sometimes well delivered, sometimes not. I
never really felt truly scared during any part of the film, although there
is a small sense of fear underlying throughout the film. However, because
the actors are so irritating, the scares are lost when it eventually reverts
back to Heather saying 'What the f*ck is that?' a lot, and Mike giggling
like a loony.
There's also the niggling fact that these student filmmakers do some really
stupid things. The main problem is the fact that even though these hapless
bunch could be killed at any moment, and are hopelessly lost, Heather still
insists on filming it all. The film gives a half hearted reason why she
should want to do this, but it isn't very convincing. Also, the students
have no idea how to survive in the woods, such as following a large river
flowing through the woods to civilisation. There are also some parts where
the 'amateur' camcorder footage is obviously staged, Heather's apology being
a major one.
The Blair Witch Project, in the end, just fails to deliver. I suppose if
you've been lost camping before, the film may deliver some chills, but this
is no use for the other 99% of the paying audience who haven't been lost in
the woods. Apart from the final minutes, the film is mind boggingly unscary,
and the shouting matches get hideously dull. The spook scenes are short and
far between, and any other horror movie could probably achieve the same
amount of fear that these scenes provide. Although a good idea, it's not
executed well enough to be a fun, scary cinema experience. It's a worrying
fact when the website (http://www.blairwitch.com) is better than the film.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Artisan Films
 Directors:  Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sanchez
 Writers:  Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sanchez
 Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua
Leonard, Bob Griffith, Jim King, Sandra Sanchez, Ed
Swanson, Patricia Decou
   If you're going away this summer, you'll probably be
sending the folks back home those picture post cards to
make them jealous: "Wish you were here," or some other
original quip.  Everybody has a great time on vacation. 
Never mind that the family's all together 24 hours a day
under stressful conditions--foreign languages, strange
customs, exhausting voyages and tours.  Trekkers come
home and what do they tell you?  We had a great great
time...fabulous!  Do you believe them?
   Take the trio of twenty-somethings that drive to the
arboreal acres of Maryland in Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel
Myrick's fresh, imaginative feature.  These kids have a
purpose, and it isn't to ski, get a tan, play golf, swim, or
some other bourgeois design.  Like many their age, they
considere themselves amateur filmmakers, loading up with
both 16mm film and a High-8 video job intent on making a
full-sized, prizewinning documentary to confirm or lay
doubt on rumors of a witch in the woods.  The three who
journey on October 21, 1994 are Joshua Leonard, who
shoots the 16mm film; Michael Williams, who captures the
sound; and the group's leader, a Tracy-Flick-like Heather
Donahue who took charge and kept the respect of the two
males--for a while.  Just one thing, though.  "The Blair Witch
Project" is not a documentary, not a docudrama, but a
mockumentary, or mock documentary designed to give the
audience the distinct impression that what they are watching
really did happen.
   The group hike into the Black Forest region of Maryland,
near the town of Burkittsville, to search out an old legend that
the region was inhabited by the wicked Blair Witch--who
allegedly tortured and killed trespassers from time
to time since February 1785.  Though an entire town is
cursed by this outcast, Burkittsville is founded on the site of
this witch, notwithstanding the fate of a 10-year old girl who is
dragged to her death by a pale woman's hand--as seen by
eleven witnesses.
   What made "The Blair Witch Project" captivating to
some, so much that when its screening was announced at a
recent Sundance Festival every one of a theater's 1300 seats
filled up rapidly?  Simply this: instead of giving the three
trekkers a script to read, Myrick and Sanchez pulled a Marlon
Brando and engaged them in "method filmmaking."  The
three young performers were given quick training in camera
work and then turned loose for eight days to improvise
according to their actual predilections.   The directors planted
actors in the town for the three to interview, turning the burg
into a kind of Truman Show: the protagonists essentially are
to pretend--kind of like Truman Burbank in Peter Weir's
comedy--that they are not part of a movie at all.  They
speak with several salt-of-the-earth townspeople, most of
whom insist that they do not believe the legend of the evil
enchantress.  In the one situation that could cause the
audience to shudder, a small baby repeatedly puts her hand
across her mother's mouth to prevent the adult from telling
the scary story of the Blair Witch.
   The treatment given to the three (which resembles an
effective fraternity hell week) recalls the training given to the
cast of "Saving Private Ryan."  The actors playing soldiers on
the beach in the riveting opening moments of Steven
Spielberg's masterpiece had gone through such rigorous
discipline for the role that at least a half dozen repeatedly
threatened to quit.  In "Blair," Donahue, Williams and Leonard
are forced to suffer as actual people in their situation might
have done.  After a few days, they are soaked, exhausted
and hungry to such an extent that they actually feel the terror
of the journey, actually fearing for their lives.  This adds
markedly to the verisimilitude.  As the three prepare for the
trip by shopping, cracking jokes, and following Heather's
background narration, they speak to residents of the town,
drive to the woods, and proceed to hike for hours.  Without a
cell phone, they become increasingly anxious as they lose
their bearings.  When the map of the area--the only
document that could virtually guarantee their safe arrival back
to the car--disappears, panic takes over.  As Heather, the
confident tour leader, begins to lose it--screaming, crying,
cursing--the three go increasingly off the wall, their disquiet
reaching a climax when two of the party make a gruesome
and bloody discovery.
  "Blair," at once a road movie, a buddy drama, and a horror
show, is the sort of film that could be expected to come from
a studio like Artisan, known for willingness to experiment. 
Last year, Darren Aronofsky's "Pi," released under the Artisan
label, became the most innovative indie of the year. "Pi"
featured the nerdish Max Cohen, a mathematical genius, who
sets out to prove that everything can be reduced to a
numerical pattern.   Unfortunately, "The Blair Witch Project"
does not come close to matching "Pi." Though we may
indeed be convinced of the apprehension felt increasingly by
the three performers, we feel strangely distanced from their
dilemma.  The fault lies paradoxically with improvisation
which, for my money, almost never works.  What's needed to
get the pulse of the viewers racing is a solid script by a guy
like David Mamet or, going back a while, to a director like
James Whale. Only a tight screenplay effected by a director's
strong hand, can accomplish the indisputable goal of every
horror movie--to scare the living daylights out of everyone
willing to suspend disbelief.  Take, by contrast, the recent
movie "Limbo," which, like this one deals with people who are
stranded in a remote area, so desperate for help that they
are willing to risk their lives when an opportunity for rescue
finally comes.  "Limbo" is a near-great film--controversial
ending and all--because of the superb skills of John Sayles at
the helm.  What we have here, though, is a group of kids who
scream like banshees, uttering obscenities without a clever
piece of dialogue in the 87-minute production.  The moral?
To convey an atmosphere of anarchy, a film may need an
authoritarian hand at the controls--a tight script embodying a
real story and firm direction.  Though after viewing "Blair"
some in the audience might vow never again to travel without
a knowledgeable tour guide, I say, "Bring on the woods...The
city is hot and I have no problem tackling some sylvan
splendor."

Author
Christopher Null
     THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT has the bizarre distinction of being the
first horror film ever to give me nightmares *before* having seen it.
The nightmares will probably continue for awhile, even though BLAIR
WITCH is not, contrary to the reports I've heard, the scariest movie
ever made.
     Not even close.  The conceit of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is this:
Three eager filmmakers go into the woods of Maryland in search of
material for a project about `The Blair Witch,' a supposed woman who was
exiled from the town of Blair during the witch trial era.
     And today, the Blair Witch continues to ply her trade, as
interviews at the film's beginning make clear  stories of massacred
children and haunted houses have left a lasting impression on the
residents of Burkittsville (formerly Blair, MD).  All of this sets the
stage for us, plus a textual prologue telling us that these filmmakers
vanished, and what we are watching is the footage they shot, discovered
in the woods a year later.
     So we know up front that something evil is afoot, and in the 90
minutes of `discovered footage' we get to see plenty of it.  The trouble
starts when the trio gets lost, and their turmoil gets worse every day
(as they seem to be hiking in circles) and every night, when ...
something begins playing cruel tricks on them.
     Captured on videotape, black and white 16mm, and (I think) color
8mm, BLAIR WITCH is compelling as a faux documentary.  (And yes, *none*
of this is true, although most of the people in line and sitting around
us weren't aware of that.)
     But is this movie scary?  In a word, and on the whole, no.
Possibly a victim of its own hype, like STAR WARS, BLAIR WITCH has
plenty of atmosphere and creepy scenes (mostly unseen voices in the
woods), but it isn't that frightening.  My wife is a big wimp, and she
only grabbed my arm twice.  Not until the grand finale does the WITCH
trot out the Big Guns, and I will admit that the final images on screen
are some of the scariest I've ever seen.
     Still, two minutes of footage does not a stellar movie make.  The
other 88 are okay, and often funny, but it ain't horror.  However, for
the horror buff or indie film fan, this is a great example of something,
well, off the beaten path.
Director: Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sánchez
Producer: Robin Cowie, Gregg Hale
Writer: Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sánchez
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Greg King
If nothing else, 1999 will be remembered as the year in which
the internet became a vital marketing tool for films.  A case in point
is The Blair Witch Project, the ultra low budget independent film that
has become a runaway box office hit in the States, out grossing far
more polished, expensive studio productions.
        For months now we have been bombarded, via the internet, with
plenty of hype surrounding the film, preparing us for how scary it is,
and informing us that audiences have found the jerky hand held camera
work so unsettling that many have been rushing from the cinema to be
physically sick.  And the web has also been used to tell the back
story about the two hundred year old legend of the so-called Blair
Witch, who lives in the backwoods of upstate Maryland.  The site also
fills in the background information concerning the three student film
makers who disappeared, presumed murdered while making a film on the
popular legend.  Many people actually believe that this is a
documentary, compiled from the recently unearthed footage shot by the
three missing film makers.  Tyro film makers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez effectively create an unsettling atmosphere, and they
certainly play on the audiences' fears and expectations beautifully.
The film is shot using a combination of hand held video and 16mm film.
The hand held camera work is not as unsettling as the massive
publicity campaign would have it, and indeed much of the
cinematography here seems deliberately amateurish, which adds to the
overall effect.
The film follows three students - Heather Donahue, Joshua
Leonard and Michael Williams - as they set out to record a documentary
on the legend of the Blair Witch.  As the three become hopelessly lost
in the woods, hysteria sets in, and they quickly turn on one another,
blaming each other for their predicament.  These scenes are the most
effective and unsettling, as they establish a growing air of unease
that is fed by paranoia and distrust.  At night while they try to
sleep, the three are disturbed by the night time sounds of the forest,
which further unhinges them.  Are they imagining things?  Or has their
belief in the legend of the witch made them unusually jumpy?  Heather,
the project's director and narrator, and the dominant force behind the
three tyro film makers' journey, is also one of the most irritating
and annoying characters.  As her shrill voice unleashes another tirade
against her two male colleagues, many within the audience would gladly
feel like throttling her.
Most of the dialogue is also unscripted, giving the whole film
a natural and spontaneous atmosphere, that further adds to the
illusion of reality.  The Blair Witch Project is easily the most
cleverly marketed film of the decade (century?), but it is by no means
the scariest!  Only the more impressionable and susceptible younger
audiences may find any thing remotely scary and disturbing about the
whole thing.  Rather, this is a cynical triumph of style and hype over
substance.  You have been warned! 
**1/2
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Author
Ross Anthony
My goodness, this little picture has become such an event, hasn't it? The
film itself (without the chatter) wouldn't be much more than a video teens
might think pretty cool. However, everyone is talking about this film; the
gardener, the taxi driver -- I just discussed it with a semi-retired notary
in San Louis. Unless you're one of those weird, remote, or way-married folks
who never see movies anymore -- you've heard the hype.
Admittedly, I wouldn't have seen it without the popularity, without the
lines of people outside the theaters. Alas, my ever-growing curiosity could
no longer remain in the dark.
What it appears to be: The picture is about a film crew of three young
people (Josh, Mike and Heather) with the mission of documenting the legend
of Blair Witch. Supposedly, in 1940 seven children were killed up in the
back woods of New England and since then the older generation has always
spoken of hauntings.
The preface (in text) tells us that this documentary trio disappeared and
that we're about to see the film and video tape that they left behind. The
first twenty minutes are spent in nearby towns interviewing a few people
concerning their knowledge of the myth and whether or not they buy into it.
But much of the footage holds behind the scenes glimpses of the young trio
as they think and talk about their mission. It's reminiscent of MTV's "Real
World."
The remainder of the film is shot with no other subjects beyond these three
crew members in no other location than in the woods. No witch is ever
filmed. In short, there's a lot of shaky camera movement, hiking, arguing
about map interpretation, and spooky noises in a dark tent during the four
or five nights.
Heather is the director and project leader, she drives the crew. It appears
to me that she is in on the hoax. The other two actors seem to be truly
bewildered and increasingly "freaked out" by what appear to be "the real"
filmmakers (or producers, or friends of Heather) out in the woods making
cackling noises, ruffling the tent mesh, and leaving creepy patterns of
stones and sticks. Though I must say, Heather's cracking voice and red-eyed
tears often had me reconsidering my assumption.
Did I say "hoax"?
Perhaps hoax is too strong a word. Anyway, what's really happening is...
before the shoot, "real" directors Myrick and Sanchez provided their three
person mock-documentary crew a 35 page outline, a crash course on 16 mm film
and Hi-8 video photography, and daily clues left in a box. From there, "BWP"
is three rattled actors doing a fine job of ad-libbing. Whether or not the
actors where informed that they'd be harassed at night, I don't know. Either
way ... Myrick and Sanchez were getting heated drama during the day and
truly animalistic fear-filled utterances from them in the dark.
Technically speaking:
The little film is shot mostly on video tape and 16mm film, both of which
are not considered acceptable formats for the big screen under normal
circumstances. However this is not a normal situation. I have high praise
(and envy) for the conception of the "Blair Witch Project." The filmmakers
took a great idea, lied a little, and made a motion picture out of a bunch
of sticks and very little money. I'm sure they'll have secured themselves a
nice budget for their next production.
(FYI: DAT is Digital Audio Tape. The three often worry about getting the DAT
back. Which means ... they'd probably rented sound recording equipment and
needed to return it promptly or pay penalty fees etc.)
Entertainment value:
Oddly I found most of the production rather interesting -- though nothing
terribly scary till the end, which was more of a spooky cub-scout-camp-story
scary than really horrific. I enjoyed the drama between the three. I wanted
to see just how long Heather could keep these guys from beating the crap out
of her or taking off on their own. The sometimes extremely heated arguments
(usually between Heather and either one of the guys) did get tiresome. That
and the video was very jittery at times -- beyond what was necessary to
create the sense of nervousness I'm sure they wanted. I had to
intermittently look away from the screen to prevent a headache. Ultimately,
the movie was better than I'd anticipated, a curiously unique endeavor on
it's own (which I'm reviewing) and plainly outstanding as the event that
it's become.
The Remarkable Dollar Stats:
Filmmaker's budget: $35,000
Artisan's purchase price: $1.1 million
Projected domestic box office gross: $100 million
Starring Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams.
Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Released by Artisan.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Ivana Redwine
After being a little bit seduced by the advance buzz for the
low-budget Sundance indie "The Blair Witch Project," I entered the
theater expecting to see one of the scariest movies ever made.
And I did experience moments of sheer terror--especially toward
the film's end--but overall it isn't all that scary, although
it is extremely unsettling. To my mind, this movie doesn't fit
neatly into the horror genre category--it's more of a
psychological thriller. What affected me even more intensely
than the undercurrent of horror in the film was the tension that
continued to build slowly throughout, culminating when the
pressures of being hopelessly lost in the woods (and possibly
hunted) cause the sanity of the characters to slowly start to
snap. In some ways, I found "The Blair Witch Project" reminiscent
of the 1972 adventure/thriller "Deliverance," although that film
is stylistically quite different.
Employing a cinema verite style, "The Blair Witch Project" tells
the tale of a three-person student film crew that went out to
the woods near Burkittsville (formerly Blair), Maryland, in
1994 to make a documentary about the legend of a local witch.
The film opens with stark letters on a black background,
stating that their footage was found a year after their
disappearance and comprises what we are about to see.
At the beginning, the students laugh and joke in an easy,
relaxed manner. But as things go fatally wrong during the
creation of their documentary, their mental and physical
condition progressively erodes, causing them to become brittle
and start to turn on each other. The gradual deterioration of
the film crew's state of mind is heartbreaking. Particularly
devastating is the degeneration of the documentary's plucky
director. Finally realizing that they will probably not get
out alive, she films an apology to her own parents and those
of the crew in the movie's most memorable scene.
Adding to the realistic nature of "The Blair Witch Project,"
Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick, who co-wrote and co-
directed the film, make extensive use of improvisation in
collaboration with their actors, resulting in scenes that
seem natural and uncontrived. The first names of the
characters are the same as those of the actors who portray
them. Heather (Heather Donahue) is the documentary's director;
Michael (Michael Williams) the sound man, and Joshua (Joshua
Leonard) the cameraman. The acting is so convincing that at
times I had to remind myself that this was fiction rather
than fact and that these were actors rather than the
characters they portrayed. I found this reminiscent of the
films of John Cassavetes--one of the pioneers of independent
filmmaking--who also made extensive use of improvisation.
>From its uncomplicated premise to its stark visual style, much
of the film's impact stems from its simplicity, and this is
particularly true of the film's stunning cinematography. While
emulating the look and feel of a student documentary
production, it also manages to slyly conceal a slow-release
emotional wallop cleverly hidden in its seemingly naive
delivery. The vertiginous, jerky hand-held camera work, along
with the constant intermixing of film stock--much of it grainy
and often shot from disorienting, oblique angles--create a
dizzying visual edge. This cleverly complements the mood of
uncertainty, bewilderment, dread, and ever-encroaching doom
that permeates the movie.
In "The Blair Witch Project," imagination is the ultimate
special effect. One of the most daring aspects of the camera
work is that it sometimes drops down to velvet black; there
is nothing to be seen, except for what exists in the
audience's imagination. These moments of absolute darkness are
extremely disturbing because your mind wraps itself around the
ambiguity, conjuring the rest out of whatever happens to lurk
in your subconscious.
I think "The Blair Witch Project" is well worth seeing, although
it probably won't meet most people's expectations of what a
horror film should be. Despite a meager budget, Sanchez and
Myrick have created a remarkably original, vividly realistic
movie that reaches down deep into the personal and
psychological aspects of fear. It's a film that shows what
can happen when talented independent filmmakers follow their
creative vision without compromise.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Heather Donahue; Michael C. Williams; Joshua Leonard; Bob Griffin &
Jim King
To all of those "respected" critics out there who used words and phrases
like "terrifying", "bone chilling", "the scariest movie ever" and other such
expressions which lend themselves well to a movie advertisement, I have only
one question. Is this the first horror movie that you have ever seen?
Obviously for those of you who found it so terrifying, your only previous
"horror" experiences must have come courtesy of old Scooby-Doo reruns. I
guarantee you that if you had ever set foot in the horror section of your
local video store you would have realized that this was far from a scary
movie. But I guess for some people, jumping on the old "Blair Witch
Bandwagon" was more important than writing a credible review.
This movie ranked a 3 out of 10 for me. And to be honest, none of that is
for the scare factor in this movie. For those of you that have been living
in a cave the past little while, here is a recap of the basic plot of the
movie. The story goes that three documentary filmmakers went out into the
Maryland woods looking for evidence of a local legend. This legend is a
ghost known as the Blair Witch. The filmmakers went into the woods never to
be heard from again. But, some time later, their equipment was found --
including their cameras and all of the footage that they shot before
vanishing. This film has been compiled into the movie we now see as The
Blair Witch Project.
I'll say right off the bat that this is a very cool idea. So much so, that
some people actually believed that this was real documentary footage that
they were watching in theaters. This is of course due, in no small part, to
the incredible marketing that this movie got. The hype that surrounded this
movie, specifically over the Internet, before it opened was nothing short of
a phenomenon. Considering that this movie was reportedly made for something
in the 40 thousand-dollar range and grossed hundreds of millions in
theaters, the marketing campaign would have to be classed as an unqualified
success. Sadly, like many things in life, just because there is a huge
amount of hype, doesn't mean that there is actually anything good behind
that hype. The Blair Witch Project does not even come close to living up to
its advance word. Leaving me to wonder who exactly it was that had all these
glowing things to say about the movie. Regardless, I'm glad I didn't
actually pay to see this thing in a theater. I'm even happier that when I
saw it on video, I didn't pay for that either.
About the only part of this movie that even got close to what I would call
eerie was the final sequence in the movie. I'm certainly not about to spoil
the ending, but suffice to say that if you feel the urge to abandon ship
halfway through the movie you won't be missing anything. That also goes for
the "newly discovered footage" which has been tacked on after the credits in
the Home video versions. What a waste of about 5 minutes that was. The
scariest part of the movie is the now famous close-up shot of star Heather
Donahue looking into the camera and saying how scared she is. It is only
scary because we get an extreme close-up view up her nostrils. There should
be a law against such things.
Then we have the much-publicized camerawork that reportedly made some people
physically ill in theaters. Sorry, don't buy it. Sure the angles were herky
jerky, but there was nothing present that would make anyone ill who was not
already suffering from an acute case of the stomach flu. I expected the
lousy camera work and the black and white photography going in, so that, for
the most part, didn't annoy me. But there were parts that did qualify as
downright frustrating. In one scene "the witch" leaves a bundle of sticks
with something inside it. Donahue's character opens it and goes into
hysterics. The camera focus is so fuzzy that we can only see that whatever
it is looks to be bloody, but nothing more. So we have no idea why she is so
upset. The scares are like this the whole movie. The actors are running
around terrified, but we, the audience, never quite get why they are so
upset. They get all terrified when a pile of stones appears outside their
tent. Weird, I'll grant you, but I would have been a little more unnerved if
someone had been hurling them at my tent and not piling them outside it. But
nobody said that these characters were that bright. They hear strange noises
in the middle of the night. (Noises in the woods -- go figure.) They run off
blindly into the woods and sit in the dark. Call me crazy, but if I think
something might potentially attack me, I've got every light available on.
I'd have the whole place lit up like Christmas tree, not sit around in the
dark waiting for whatever it was to sneak up on me. This also leads to the
added annoyance of having protracted sequences where the screen is totally
dark with the characters whispering back and forth to each other -- very
annoying. One nice touch was the fact that there was no soundtrack to this
movie, which did give it more of an "authentic" feel about it. I almost
wonder if a little mood music might not have improved things.
I have to give the actors credit. There was very little script involved in
the making of this movie. The three were sent out into the woods where they
would be left notes as to the basic that their characters were to perform.
The rest is improv. And considering what they had to work with, I think that
they did a hell of a good job. To be fair, considering that the three actors
not only were the cast, but also doubled as the crew, the film turned out
pretty well. I'm certainly not faulting the ingenious ideas or methods used
in the production of this film.
What I am faulting is that this movie is billed as a horror, but it just
isn't scary. Not in the least. The Blair Witch Project may make for an
interesting topic for discussion in some university film class, but it sure
won't make you spill your popcorn while you are jumping out of your seat. I
think my brother summed it up best as the end credits started to roll. He
said: They shouldn't be giving us the credits, they should be giving us an
apology. Truer words were never spoken.
3/10 -- For the concept; the marketing; and the acting

Author
Jonathan Hauer
The movie: 3 and a half dried twigs (out of 4)
The movie, plus the website, plus the featurette: 4 dried twigs (out of 4)
Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez (II)
Written by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez (II)
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and Joshua Leonard
But, you've got to hand it to them, the folks behind "The Blair Witch
Project" were.  With no money or name actors, writer-directors Daniel Myrick
and Eduardo Sanchez (II) got clever, and created an event bigger than the
actuality of their film.
The story of the film is best encapsulated by the words that appear before
the footage begins: "In October of 1994, three student filmmakers
dissapeared in the woods near Burkittesville, Maryland, while shooting a
documentary. One year later, their footage was found."  Now that is a good
premise for a horror story.  The ensuing tension and revelations are worth
the price of admission.
Debuting their film at midnight during the Sundance film festival, Myrick
and Sanchez scared the bejeezus out of an indy-film crowd with an
unexpectedly well made, scary film project.  The Sundance buzz was ignited,
but the duo did not stop there.  They went on to create a wonderful web-site
that tells much of the history of the film's story and paired up with the
Sci-Fi channel to create a "Blair Witch Project" documentary, "The Mythology
of Blair Witch."  By the time the actualy film was released (to only one
theater in the D.C. area!) my desire to know the story and learn the secrets
that film contained were greater than ever.  I was as anxious to see the
footage as I was to see *GASP* "Episode One."
This is a very well made, very clever film. The real question is, "Is it
scary?"  Yes, it is scary.  "Is it the scariest movie you've ever seen?"  It
was pretty intense.  I think, though, that "Schindler's List" ranks up there
on the actual fear meter.  On the other hand, this movie is not meant to
preach, it is meant to scare.  It may be a post-haunted house "I'm no
coward" mentality that leads me to say that it wasn't too terribly scary.
However, I can say that my mind was haunted on the drive home; to the extent
of turning off the radio and picturing the film's final images again and
again to try to discern exactly what it was that occurred.
In reality, the movie is really little more than a documentary style ghost
story told with a lot of screaming, a teensy bit of fake blood and a couple
of shaky cameras.  The media hoopla has described the style of the film as a
necessity because of the project's low budget, but I don't believe that this
film would have been as effective any other way.  The casting of unknown
actors -- Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and Joshua Leonard (playing
themselves) -- closed the gap between reality and fantasy.  The camera's
blurred images and distant sound (sometimes the sound you hear was captured
by the video camera, and sometimes by DAT) make you believe that this is
actually happening as documented by the machinery.  And, perhaps most
effective of all, is the lack of a clear picture of whatever it is that's
happening.  In an age when filmmakers are being encouraged to dream their
most fantastic digital dreams for their audience, these two filmmakers were
forced to look into the negative space of our psyches and remember that what
we don't know is the source of true magic and terror.
Thank you to Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, along with your cast and
crew, for creating excitement about an innovative vision and a film that
mostly achieves its own hype.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film made a major impression at the 1999 Sundance Film Festival. This
film made a major impression on moviegoers when it opened wide on July 30th,
with a box-office gross of close to US$30 Million, with only a $30,000
filming budget. This film also made major impressions with most movie
critics who agreed that this film was one of the creepiest rides of a
lifetime.
I must've missed that movie critic memo. This film made only a minor
impression on me.
PLOT:
Three young filmmakers go out into the woods to film a documentary about the
legend of the Blair Witch. They are lost and never heard from again, until
someone finds all of their videotape footage. This film is a compilation of
their footage from the woods.
CRITIQUE:
This film simply did not "do it" for me. I thought it was an original idea
with an extremely authentic look and acting from its main characters, but
God help if I didn't really find it all that interesting, scary or even
entertaining. The last fifteen minutes of this film get a little creepy, and
certainly leaves for an impression, but unfortunately, you have to sit
through an hour and more of watching these three kids walking, talking
shite, getting creeped out here and there, and whispering in the dark. I am
assuming that all of this activity absorbed others into the characters and
their plight, but I just thought it was pretty boring. It was like watching
a camping trip video of some friends that I could care less about. I felt
little tension, little suspense and absolutely no scares whatsoever. This is
definitely NOT a scary movie.
If there was ever a film to which you could stick the motto "Don't believe
the hype", it would be this one. And I'm not saying that the film is garbage
either. It's like I said, I thought the style and premise were interesting,
the actors believable and solid in their roles, with funny moments here and
there, but overall, the film just didn't do much for me. It got a little
spooky near the end, and certainly tied itself nicely to a story told at the
beginning of the film by a town person, but don't go into this film thinking
that you are going to get your pants scared off of you, cause that's not its
primary intention. In fact, if you have a problem watching a camera
jittering about for an hour and a half, you may just get nauseous watching
the film stock shot here.
Did Mrs. JoBlo like it? Nope. I even caught her staring at the ceiling of
the theatre every now and then. All in all, you obviously needn't take my
word for it, since there are many huge fans of the film surfing the Web as
we speak, but in my humble little opinion, the movie did not make any
special impression upon me, and certainly did not entertain my sorry ass for
its duration. And I think that is ultimately the main criteria of any film--
was it entertaining? In this case...no. See it on video, if interested.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
In case some of you still aren't sure...Is the film a real documentary or
not?
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is entirely fictional. The entire thing is the
brainchild of the films' co-writers/co-directors, Ed Sanchez and Dan Myrick,
and was made over the past two years. The three student filmmakers are all
played by actors. The actors used their real names in the film, and the
conditions were a bit different than your average shoot. First off, the
actors actually had to agree (it was written into their contracts) that they
could be messed with psychologically. Then, they were sent off into the
woods for eight days, and literally shot the film themselves (Shot at the
Seneca Creek State Park in Maryland). Over 18 hours of raw footage was
generated from the excursion in the woods. The only contact that they had
with the crew was through notes and minimal rations left for them to pick up
daily (they also carried a GPS (Global Positioning Satellite receiver), so
they couldn't really get lost, and so that the crew knew where they were in
the forest and where to head for instructions and food.) They knew their
"characters" well, and knew the general setup of the "story", but everything
that happens as the story unfolds was a surprise to them. The film was shot
in October of 1997 and the directors spend more than a year editing the film
down to its final product.
Has the legend of the "Blair Witch" also been fictionalized? Yes, it was
also created by the filmmakers, as were all the supporting documents and all
the events in the Blair Witch mythology (See http://www.blairwitch.com/).
The filmmakers wanted to create a sense of history to add to the depth and
believability of the film.
This movie is the feature film debut of all three of its young stars,
Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and Joshua Leonard. Michael is already
set to co-star opposite Robert DeNiro and Cuba Gooding Jr. in a film
entitled NAVY DIVER, due out in the year 2000. Not too bad, eh?
An alternative ending was shot for Artisan Entertainment, but the studio
left the decision as to which ending to use to the filmmakers, so they went
with their original ending. Maybe we will see this and some of the deleted
scenes on the DVD release. Needless to say, ideas for prequels and sequels
are already being seriously tossed around.

Author
Matt P
When I was eight, my brother, a friend and I decided to camp out in our
backyard on a summer night.  We pitched a tent and rolled out sleeping bags.
For us, this was almost "roughing it."  We ate junk food, watched the skies
for UFO's, and told ghost stories until the middle of the night.  Sometime
around 3 a.m., just as we were drifting off to sleep, we heard someone
scream in the distance, about a block away. It was a loud, shrill scream.
I've almost never been so frightened in my life.   In a blind panic, we all
rushed to the front of the tent, fumbled with the zipper, and trampled over
each other get out of the tent and rushed inside the house, where lights,
carpeting, and TV would seemingly protect us from whatever was lurking
outside.  Looking back, our terror seems silly and absurd, since we were in
a fenced backyard of a suburban Los Angeles home, yards away from my
parents' bedroom window. I'm not even sure today that what we heard was a
woman screaming, not a cat.  But on that night, it was what we couldn't see
and didn't know that was so terrifying.
What triggered my memory of that incident was The Blair Witch Project.  This
$35,000 independent film has stunned the entertainment industry by
out-grossing many major studio releases this summer.  The film deserves both
the hype and ticket sales it has generated.  It is a fresh, engaging, and
flat-out scary film. Unlike the countless Scream clones and sci-fi monster
movies, Blair is scary without relying on special effects, haunting
soundtracks, or a teams of high-paid make-up artists.  It draws on the
primal fears all of us share, and have experienced at one time -- the  fear
of the unknown and the fear of being vulnerable and exposed.
Presented as the recovered footage of three documentary filmmakers who
vanished in the woods of Maryland while making a film about a legendary
local witch, the movie depicts three college students as they go into the
woods to explore the spooky local legend.  You know it's not going to have a
happy ending, but don't know what the characters are going to face.  You're
along for the ride, trying to figure out what's going on and what's out
there, in the dark, just out of sight, before it reaches out and gets them.
The film starts with the project's leader, Heather (Heather Donahue), who
compulsively (and conveniently) tapes everything the group does, as she
prepares for the trip.  The documentary is supposed to examine the local
legend of the "Blair Witch," who has supposedly been responsible for several
unsettling and mysterious deaths in Burkittsville, Maryland, since she was
banished from the town in 1786.  Heather is joined by fellow students Mike
(Michael Williams) and Josh (Joshua Leonard), and the trio head to
Burkittsville, where they interview people on the street about the legend.
Some townspeople have never heard of the Blair Witch legend, while others
seemingly know a lot about it. A few suggest to the filmmakers that they
think she's still out there somewhere. In an eerie scene, a local  woman
explains on camera what she knows about the story of the witch, while the
baby girl she is carrying keeps putting her hand over her mother's mouth, as
if to keep the words from coming out.
The next day, the three students strap on backpacks and head into the woods
in search of some famous landmarks related to the history of the Blair
Witch.  They find a spot known as "coffin rock," where five men's bodies
were found ritualistically dismembered and inscribed with strange symbols in
1886.  After that, the students set off to find an infamous graveyard deep
in the woods.  When they camp at night, odd things start happening, and they
begin to hear noises nearby and sometimes right outside their tent. As they
plod on, tensions rise along with fatigue and fear.  Soon, they are lost and
struggle to find their way out of the woods.  Disturbing late-night
visitations continue to plague them, and they begin to fear that their
harassers may be worse than curious wildlife or mischievous rednecks.
Heather, from the outset, is the in-control type -- always in charge of the
map, always making decisions -- but as they become increasingly lost and
fearful, you can see her sense the control over the situation slipping away,
which perhaps scares her the most. Their cycle of hope, fatigue, and fear
continue for days, leading up to some creepy developments, surprising final
twists, and an absolutely chilling finale.
The film's creators, Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, didn't so much
direct the film as manipulate it.  They gave the three actors the basic
backstory of the film, then sent them off on their own to film the scenes in
the woods without any script.  They would get daily messages to the actors
about general plot developments and things to do, but otherwise, the actors
improvised scenes and filmed them.  In turn, the Myrick and Sanchez would
review the tapes after each day and make suggestions for the next day.  To
keep the developments spontaneous, they kept the actors in the dark about
what else would happen (except that they would not be hurt), so the late
night disturbances faced by the actors were genuinely surprising, and no
doubt, frightening to them.  When the characters look tired, it's because
the actors were tired.  If they sound testy, they probably were. Reportedly,
the directors warned the actors before taking the job that "your safety is
our concern, your conform it not."  (In fact, the actors, while alone in the
woods, unlike the characters in the film, did have a GPS locator device in
their gear to prevent them from genuinely becoming "missing," like their
fictional counterparts.)
Part of what makes Blair effective is that it looks and feels genuine.  The
shaky camcorder effect isn't contrived as in some ads or in NYPD Blue, it's
a camcorder being held by someone on the move or whose arm is actually
shaking.  The early part of the film looks like anyone's goofy camcorder
tape -- people clowning off in front of the camera, playing with the zoom
control, and hamming it up.  By the time things start getting strange, the
viewer has been sucked into the illusion that he or she is watching a real
videotape of real people making a documentary.  The film wouldn't work if
you were constantly aware that these were three actors in the woods, dirty
and tired, but perfectly safe.  The improvisational acting in the film,
mixed with genuine reactions of surprise, frustration, and fear, make the
performances by the three actors convincing and compelling.  Two of the
actors have noted that people have recognized them since the film's release
on the street and stopped them to express how relieved they are to see that
they are safe after all.  In the course of the 90-minute film, you see and
feel the toll the experience takes on the characters, as they descend from
frivolity, to frustration, to anger, to desperation, and finally, to sheer
terror.
The Blair Witch Project is one of the scariest movies in recent years: a
film that follows you around for a while after you leave the theater. Some
friends who have seen the movie have told me that it disturbed them more a
week after they saw the film than right after seeing it.  It does a much
better job at getting at the things that truly scare all of us than most
contemporary horror films.  The smartest move by its creators was to let the
audience imagine the scariest parts of the film themselves.  Many of the
scariest elements of the film are just out of camera range, hard to hear
clearly, too blurry to see, or just far enough away in the darkness that you
can't see.  That's what scares us in real life, what scared me years ago in
my backyard, and what continues to frighten millions of audience members.
When you leave the theater, you're not exactly sure what you saw, what you
heard, or even what ultimately happened to the characters.  And that, quite
possibly, is the scariest part of the experience.
Copyright 1999 Matt Pusateri
Check out other film reviews, game reviews, features, and columns at The
Separate Radio Volume Knob (http://www.pusateri.org/knob.htm)

Author
Louis Proyect
"The Blair Witch Project" is the most profitable movie in American
history. Made at a cost of $30,000, it returned $48 million in its
first week of wide release. Its huge box-office success, threadbare
production values and offbeat approach to the horror genre have
generated widespread discussion. What does "The Blair Witch Project"
mean for movie-making in general? Furthermore, what does its dark
theme tell us about the mood of the American society, particularly
among the youth who have catapulted it into success?
Before discussing these questions, it would be worthwhile to consider
the film as film. Made by two neophyte directors, 35 year old Daniel
Myrick and 30 year old Eduardo Sanchez, it depicts in self-referential
fashion--but importantly, absent any sense of irony--the making of a
student documentary in the woods of Maryland where according to legend
a homicidal witch dwells.
The student director Heather (Heather Donohue) is accompanied only by
Michael the cameraman (Michael Williams) and soundman Joshua (Joshua
Leonard). With packs on their back, they descend into the forest on
Halloween looking for interesting footage to use in their film, most
particularly a cemetery where victims of the witch are buried--mostly
children. Heather is a compulsive film-maker and takes shots
continuously, including bags of marshmallows in a supermarket where
they have stocked up for the hike, and of a dead mouse on the side of
the trail. The two young men occasionally get annoyed at her, but she
insists that she is serious about her documentary and wants to get in
as much footage as possible. She is in control not only of the
film--perhaps overly so, but of their safety as well. She has a map
that they keep referring to as they make their way deeper and deeper
into the gloomy autumn woods.
Not too long after they have entered the depths of the forest, they
begin to notice spooky piles of stones on the ground and stick figures
hung from the branches of trees. At night in their tent they hear
indistinct cries outside in the distance. Although nobody ever sees
their source, they are continuously on their minds. Heather takes it
all in stride since all of these elements will only help to make her
film more interesting.
The mood of the film changes drastically when it is discovered that
Josh the soundman has thrown the map into a brook as a gesture of
defiance against the overbearing Heather. At first the three head due
south in hopes of running into a settled area, but after a sixteen
hour hike they end up exactly where they started out from. At night,
after pitching their tent, they again hear the eerie cries from within
the forest, which seem closer now.
The three young film-makers eventually succumb to the dark forces of
the forest and the film purports to be based on their footage, which
survived them. An elaborate website (www.blairwitch.com) has been
created to fill in details that were left out of the theatrical
release. But in keeping with the mock documentary spirit of the film,
the website assumes that the events depicted in the film actually took
place.
"The Blair Witch Project" is really not a movie about ghosts, witches
and monsters. It is about insecurity and it is very good at capturing
the genuinely creepy fears that everybody has about being lost in the
woods. It is a noir version of the scene in "The Wizard of Oz" when
Dorothy and her companions are beset by hostile trees in a dark,
haunted forest. In a July 11, 1999 interview with the NY Daily News,
co-director Myrick says, "What [we] were going after was
identifiability. . .Do you identify with the fear? Being lost in the
woods, everyone's felt that."
Working on a shoe-string budget, the directors and cast improvised the
dialog. They also worked in tense conditions not unlike those that the
film's characters found themselves in. A Newsweek article on the film
reports that "Though the actors would pass an occasional jogger, they
began to feel cut off from the safety of the civilized world."
Since the film has captured the imagination of the public despite
lacking all of the accoutrements of blockbuster films--no film track,
no special effects, no stars--many journalists and academics have
looked closely at it to try to figure out what it reflects about
American society.
In an August 31, 1999 NY Times article on "The Blair Witch Project"
and "Sixth Sense", another blockbuster horror movie, Robert Sklar, a
New York University professor on the editorial board of the left-wing
film magazine Cineaste, speculated that its popularity might be driven
by unease about the millennium. People are "spooked by all the things
that are coming up at this time." He added that the horror genre has
always been cyclical, and that its moments of highest popularity have
coincided with moments of extreme social and cultural dislocation.
"The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" and "Nosferatu" were popular as silent
films in Europe following the real horrors of World War I and
Hollywood horror films such as "Frankenstein" and "Dracula" made their
mark in the early 1930's, when Americans were struggling with economic
depression. In the 1950's, as Americans were troubled by the atomic
age and the cold war, films like "The Day the Earth Stood Still" and
"The Invasion of the Body Snatchers" depicted alien invaders, giant
bugs and nuclear experiments gone awry.
According to an August 22, 1999 article in the British Independent
newspaper, Todd Boyd, a professor of critical studies at the
University of Southern California's School of Cinema and Television,
believes that new interest in the horror genre is linked to America's
geopolitical climate. When the enemy was more clearly defined, as in
the case of the former Soviet Union, then the monsters in horror
movies could be more clearly and logically. With the collapse of
Communism, he maintains, "You see the US in a bit of disarray in terms
of self-representation ... The evil is not so clear in our
imagination." 
Boyd views the crude hand-held camerawork and lack of even rudimentary
set designs as an attempt to control the technology that had been the
province of Hollywood experts. "By having fear 'in our own hands'
rather than waiting for it to be evoked by visual or aural cues, we
reassert some measure of power in an age of cynicism and impotency."
What such commentaries on the film seem to miss, however, is the
importance of the forest in defining the film's attitude toward the
supernatural. The forest, as much as the witch lurking within it, is a
terrifying force, not unlike Moby Dick or Stephen Spielberg's Great
White Shark in "Jaws." This is not the Arcadian ideal depicted in a
Audubon Society calendar, but a hostile and unpredictable entity that
can gobble you up with no warning.
The young film-makers probably did not have this history in mind when
they sat down to write the scenario for "The Blair Witch Project," but
for as long as humanity has considered its environment, the forest has
often appeared as some kind of hostile force that needed to be
subdued. Such fear of the woods had much to do with European hostility
toward the American Indian who seemed not only at home there, but who
felt no need to tame it. It is appropriate, therefore, in such
mythology for a witch to reside in the forest since such a creature
not only represents defiance of civilized Christian values, but a
belief that we are part of nature ourselves.
Engels writes in "The Dialectics of Nature": "Thus at every step we
are reminded that we by no means rule over nature like a conqueror
over a foreign people, like someone standing outside nature -- but
that we, with flesh, blood and brain, belong to nature, and exist in
its midst, and that all our mastery of it consists in the fact that we
have the advantage over all other creatures of being able to learn its
laws and apply them correctly."
While I am writing this review, helicopters and trucks are spraying
Malathion over the five boroughs of New York City in an effort to kill
encephalitis-bearing mosquitoes. While city government officials claim
that the insecticide is "harmless," they urge New Yorkers to remain
indoors while the spraying is in progress. Since the virus was early
in August, mosquito experts around the country have been surprised and
befuddled that St. Louis encephalitis has turned up so far north and
east.
But the environmentalist Rachel's Weekly (www.rachels.org) cites
scientists who attribute northern migration of plants and animals to
global warming. As northern regions become more like the south,
mosquitoes that carry diseases such as malaria, yellow fever, dengue
fever, and encephalitis extend their range, and move to higher
elevations --thus threatening larger human populations with exposure
to serious infectious diseases.
Perhaps the insecurities about the forest in "The Blair Witch Project"
are an unconscious projection of such real-life horrors, bred by a
capitalist system run amok.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Author
James Brundage
Written, Directed, and Edited by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, and Joshua Leonard
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The Blair Witch Project can be described with many adjectives, one of which
is mildly nauseating. Watching the camera shake and shimmy and other
adjectives beginning with "s" used by William Shatner during Airplane 2, one
cannot help but either get a stomach ache or a headache and wonder why they
left the Alks Seltzer at home. Myself, I spent half of the movie thinking of
the old jingle: "pop, pop, fizz, fizz, oh what a relief it is."
 To describe The Blair Witch Project's plot is simple: three student
filmmakers decide to make a documentary and end up disappearing in the woods
of Burkitsville, Maryland. They spend time arguing and slowly disintegrating
into madness, at the same time being haunted by the Blair witch.
 The key word here is slowly. Although this, by technical definitions, is an
excellent horror movie, it remains as genre as anything else turned out. The
film takes its time getting to the scares, but does not make tension in the
meantime.
 Before I go on my analytical and essayistic diatribe, you should probably
know that The Blair Witch Project is a complete hoax. It is a hoax done so
well that one cannot help but be scared by it (I'll give The Blair Witch
Project that, it actually scared me at a few moments).
 The film, however a well done of a hoax it is, feels boring. It also feels
real.
 Supernatural elements aside, the dialogue, the camerawork, the emotions,
and even the timing: all of these things feel incredibly real to the viewer.
People do not suddenly go insane in real life: it is a slow process. Nor
does terror become complete immediately. The Blair Witch Project, taking its
time, is true to life as it displays the emotions and nature of what people
in that situation would be and feel like.
 This most likely comes from the way that the movie was filmed, from the
complete ad-libbing that makes up the script, and from the fact that the
actors and actresses had very little idea what was going on.
 However, as the film becomes more "realistic", it also becomes more boring.
As much as we would not like to admit it, the thing that attracts us to film
is the escapism from it. Even in ultra-realistic films such as Taxi Driver,
we still feel that bizarre contrast between being complete in the reality
that the movie creates while being separate from it. Our view of realism, of
Hollywood realism, is that of a good orchestral score, background music,
good cinematography, and all of the other technical aspects of filmmaking
that we take for granted. The emotions and reactions of the people may be
completely realistic, but, on some level, we want the fake. We want the
unreal -- and better -- camera angles, lighting, musical accompaniment and
contrived lines that go along with films.
 The Blair Witch Project gets my very lukewarm acceptance as a horror film,
if only because it hits its teen target head on. The teen crowds can go with
their girlfriends or boyfriends and make out (thus saving the need for
motion sickness pills), and they can, if they so wish, be cynical and crack
on the movie. The Blair Witch Project is open for insult in this fashion.
 As far as viewing The Blair Witch Project as a social commentary, I am
giving it a resounding recommendation. The Blair Witch Project, in the most
backhanded way, teaches us that what we truly are searching for in the
movies is not realism, but instead the illusion of it. Much as art is the
illusion of sentience, The Blair Witch Project illustrates the need for the
illusion of reality created by the movies. It illustrates, in a way very
difficult to achieve, the need for the contrived in our lives to make them
interesting.
 Concluding, The Blair Witch Project is oddly haunting, especially in the
aspect that it provides a mirror to our own desires. That it contains,
without script, without musical score, without any of the bonuses we take
for granted, a blistering satire of our own desires to experience not the
real, but the illusion.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To request a review, email MK2K@usa.net

Author
Steve Legge
{Please be advised that during the course of this review, I may speak of
things that could spoil the film for those who haven't seen it.}
A low budget fright fest, The Blair Witch Project plays upon our
now-programmed ideology, brought about by News footage and Real Video
programs, that video footage is "truth", bringing a realism to the story
that probably wouldn't exist if it were made entirely on film.
TBWP has had a great turn of excellent hype and word of mouth, but it didn't
do it for me. The story elements of the Blair Witch during the beginning of
the film went by too fast, and some key elements that were to be
foreshadowed later on, zipped by almost imperceptibly. The BWP website gives
much detailed information about the background of the Blair Witch, more than
is presented in the film. This, in my mind, is good and bad. Good that we
get the fascinating background information, bad that most of it isn't in the
film.
The characters were all realistic and well acted, considering that the
entirety of their performances was more or less improvised on the spot.
Their camerawork has an honest amateurism to it, but the constant shakiness
wore me down, and inability to turn off the auto focus would have been
something any filmmaker worth their salt would have done. (Unless, of course
they were told to turn off the auto-focus.) Also the rationale of constantly
taping every day's events was thin at best, other than that if they didn't
there wouldn't have been much of a film. And on that note, while the
characters are lost and hungry in the woods, why doesn't Heather take out
her book "How to Stay Alive in the  Woods" which we clearly see at the
beginning of the film? I guess she only had it out of a sense of irony.
The characters also seem to dump the human instinct of self preservation and
"flight or fight", that say, that characters in "The Edge" displayed so
well. In that film, it was a Bear, Not a "Ghost" or a "Witch", or a "Witch's
Ghost". A large bonfire was built in that film to light up the darkness, and
weapons were fashioned for self protection from a very real, menacing
Grizzly Bear. But what do our intrepid filmmakers do? They hide themselves
in a cramped tent and complain that they're out of smokes. And for that,
they deserve thier fate.
After they team leaves the town and finishes their interviews of the
townsfolk ,the film breaks down into simple formula:
Walk around. Tape stuff. Get lost. "Colorfully" complain about how lost they
are. Gradual group dynamic and individual breakdown. Sleep in tent. Get
scared late at night. Repeat.
The days were longest parts of the film, and while the conflicts between the
characters were fine, and shouldn't have been made any shorter, the night
scenes should have been made longer, considering they were the best parts of
the film, although they never became more than fleetingly frightful. In
contrast, the climax, taking place in the old house in the woods had what
all the other night scenes didn't have. A sense of dread. The characters
became separated (which is a genre no-no) and the character Mike frantically
rushes around the house looking for Josh, the member of the team who went
missing, whose voice can be heard yelling, from no discernible direction.
Meanwhile, Heather tries to follow him, screaming all the way. It was the
best edited, best shot scene, and the most effective.
Had the other night scenes been this effective, the film would have lived up
to the hype. Although I would have liked to have seen the Blair Witch at
least once. Not seen dead on, but seen for less than a split second, moving
just out of frame, enough so that we can see it, but not enough to make out
what it is, or even so that we debate that we saw it at all.
Although I didn't really like the film, it later played with my imagination
like a good spook story, making every little noise a threat, and I caught
myself occasionally looking over my shoulder. But I wanted more satisfaction
in the theatre, not a creepy afterglow. If I wanted creepy afterglow, I'd go
to the secondhand bookstore and pick up a spooky ghost story book for less
than 2 bucks. Instead I blew 9 bucks on a shaky 80 minute home video.

Author
MR JONATHAN RICHARDS
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
Written and Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
With Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard
 R    87 min
     You've been dining for weeks on haute cuisine with designer
ingredients and frou-frou presentations; suddenly you find yourself
munching a roadhouse cheeseburger, and nothing ever tasted so good.
This, in essence, is the appeal of the indie thriller phenomenon "The
Blair Witch Project".  To a public sated with the billion-dollar
effects of modern cinema tech, there's something irresistible about
this bare-bones little horror story, shot on 16mm and high-8 video,
without any special effects, on a budget you could carry in your
pocket in coins.
     "Blair" is a faux documentary (the hip word is "mockumentary"; I
offer "crockumentary").  It purports to be footage shot by a trio of
student filmmakers (Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and Joshua
Leonard) that was discovered a year after they disappeared in the
Maryland woods while shooting a documentary about a legendary
child-killing witch.
     Heather, Josh, and Mike start off in high spirits, recording each
other in the car and the motel room.  They interview locals and
explore sites connected to the folklore.  Then they head into the
woods with backpacks, a map, and a compass in search of an old
graveyard.  The seem to have plenty of film and an endless appetite
for shooting it.
     But soon they're hopelessly lost, and this is where the
creepiness creeps in.  Fear comes at them from two angles -- the
growing terror of being lost in the woods, and the encroaching horror
of the witch lore.  They begin to hear things -- real, or hysterical
suggestion?  They begin to find things -- ominous ritualistic-looking
bundles of sticks and piles of stones.  Something's out there...is it
supernatural, or psychotic?  Tempers flare, nerves crack.  Things get
very, very bad.  Then they get worse.
     Point-of-view is the inspiration that makes this movie click.
Everything we see is recorded by the young documentarians on their
16mm b&w production camera and the color camcorder brought by Heather
to document her documentary.  We're there with them -- there's no
omniscient crew, no other reality behind the camera.  It's all
subjective, hand-held, grainy and jerky.  On the upside this provides
immediacy; on the downside, it can make you a little nauseous, and you
welcome moments when the screen goes black and there's only audio from
the DAT recorder.
     "Blair" is a welcome antidote to gore, gadgets, explosions, and
computerized excess.  But despite the internet-orchestrated hype, it's
not the scariest thing you've ever seen.  It lives and dies on
credibility, and having committed themselves to the first-person
camera, the filmmakers find themselves in the awkward position of
having to keep the camera rolling when circumstances make it almost
impossible to believe.

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
There's a moment in "The Blair Witch Project" when I had to think of
the Brady Bunch.  Perhaps I'd been primed by the main characters
singing the Gilligan's Island theme as they go off into the woods, but
there's a moment evocative of Bobby picking up the tikki doll in the
Hawaii episodes.  Bad stuff is going to happen, though maybe not with
anyone losing it on a surf board.
Despite this, "Blair Witch" does generally go against the standard
horror movie cliches.  No deadly glitter of steel reflecting off a
knife or axe, no false scares when the rattling in the woods turns out
to be a bunny, no real shocks when the false scares turns into the lull
before the storm.  The movie's frights work through the ominous buildup
of information, and suggestive noises in the night.  Little gore is
used, and what gore we do see is ambiguous.  The creepiest Lovecraft
stories I've read works similarly: much time is spent telling the dark
history of this quiet house in, say, Providence, and only then do we
venture inside.
"Blair Witch", however, and despite the hype, really isn't the scariest
movie ever made.  Or at least I didn't find it that way.  Maybe I
couldn't suspend disbelief sufficiently -- I kept thinking that this
was a problem that could have been solved with a GPS unit, a pair night
vision goggles and some clue -- and, yes, there are creepy moments with
the barely audible children's voices and the grove full of wood
figures, and the quick vision in the cellar for some reason sticks in
my mind, but I've seen scarier X-Files.  Hell, the "Return to the
Cathedral" and "Bonehoard" levels in the computer game "Thief" were
creepier, at least until I figured out that my fire arrows work really
well against the undead.  Other people have used "Blair Witches"
techniques of creepiness, and have done it better.  I still think "The
Shining" is the scariest movie I've seen.  Give me the two dead girls
and redrum any day.
Besides background and creepy noises, the other major part of this
movie is watching the lost hikers freak out as they slowly realize that
they're lost and that there's something in the woods with them.  I
admire how well done this was.  There's genuine fear in their faces at
points.  The film's publicity campaign stresses how much of this was ad
libbed, with actors put out in the woods with relatively minimal
instructions, and the directors and crew trying to scare the hell out
of them in the middle of night.  "Method directing".
There's an interesting article in Salon about the film makers [1].
Basically, the author accuses the film makers of violating the
relationship between them and their actors, fundamentally not trusting
them to act.  The purpose of this, apparently, was to make everything
"real".  The film makers decry standard film making for that art's
ingenious fakery.  Ironically, the signature scene in the film, when
Heather is looking into the video camera and weepingly apologizes to
everyone, must have been a scene that was relatively scripted, compared
to the strategy of rousing up the actors, disorientating them and
forcing them to run through the woods.
It's also ironic, then, that the publicity surrounding this movie is
constructed as it is.  This campaign is all wonderful fakery, aimed at
obliterating the line between reality and fiction.  Partially to invoke
the backstory, so necessary to the film's creepiness, in the lobby of
the Angelika, where I saw the movie, are a number of nice vitrines
illustrating the film's background, including a museum-like write up of
the Blair Witch legend, the film canisters for the missing hikers'
backpacks, and so on.  We won't mention the websites (though this
article does [2]) (Snopes has provided a short deconstruction of the
"facts" of the piece [3].)  They purposely blur the film's background
into our hazy memory of childhood ghost stories:  I had thought "Blair
Witch" had something to do with the actual legend, centered on New
Jersey or Pennsylvania or such (I was probably mixing the Bell Witch
[4] with the Jersey Devil [5]).  True, it's in the spirit of the
"mockumentary", but I don't believe anyone else, not "Spinal Tap", not
"Dadetown", has gone to such an extent.
I'm reminded of the excellent book, "Mr. Wilson's Cabinet of Wonders"
[6], which describes Los Angeles's Museum of Jurassic Technology [7], a
sort of piece of performance art dedicated to evoking the delicate,
momentary weightlessness of wonder:  wonder whether that exhibit is
real, and wonder that it could possibly be real.  "The Blair Witch
Project" doesn't go much into wonder, however, and doesn't venture that
far into fright.
[1] http://www.salonmag.com/ent/movies/feature/1999/07/14/blair_essay/index.html
[2] http://www.salonmag.com/tech/feature/1999/07/16/blair_marketing/index.html
[3] http://snopes.simplenet.com/horrors/ghosts/blair.htm
[4] http://www.ghosts.org/bell.html
[5] http://www.serve.com/shadows/jd.htm
[6] http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0679764895/o/qid=931978762/sr=8-4/002-7638729-7343234
[7] http://www.mjt.org/index.html

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
TBWP is probably the single most profitable film ever. Not surprising,
considering its tiny US$100,000 budget, to date it has earned in excess of
US$130 million. That's a shocking 100 times profit! Rumours have it that a
smart internet `marketing' ploy was so successful in gaining cult-like
fanatics, by word of mouth coupled with strings of excellent reviews, the
film just exploded in the box-office, raking in millions on its opening
weekend.
Shot in 16mm and video (I suspect.), the film chronicles the forays of 3
students who go in search for the legendary Blair Witch. Audiences are put
in the first-person perspective in the entire mis-adventure, often wobbly
and blurry at times, it takes a bit of getting used to in the beginning.
This is supposed to be the material they discovered in the woods where the 3
disappeared; edited and put onto the screen for the benefit of our
audiences.
TBWP is simply smart. Filmed to look as if it was really a stock-shoot by a
bunch of students in search of the Blair Witch as a school project, one may
suspect (like yours truly) that its simply a lazy but smart approach to
film-making. Simply amazing in that respect, I must say. Talk about impact,
oh yes, TBWP does have quite a bit, in fact most audience will find it
deeply disturbing. I did, especially the last bit but I'm not revealing
more. You have to see it for yourself.
I can't help but feel a tad cheated after knowing how commercially
successful this film has become. Could it be that finally, an indie-film has
unwittingly found a formula for commercial appeal? Or was it all simply a
ploy by the big players right from the beginning?
Well, I guess the fact stays; TBWP is highly original, clever and will most
definitely leave most with something dreadful to talk and think about for
weeks prior to watching this film. No gore, no special effects, I just can't
get over how terribly smart this film is!

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I was talking with one of my reformed slacker friends about the movie scene
in Austin, when the subject of Robert Rodriguez (Desperado, From Dusk Till
Dawn) came up.  "He's a great guy," I was told.  "We were pretty good
friends when we were both living in Austin."
I asked, "Is it true that he got the money to film El Mariachi at
Pharmaco?"  Pharmaco, by the way, is (or was, they've renamed it) a
pharmaceutical research company that pays impoverished University of Texas
students to serve as guinea pigs in drug research.
If you know that story, you probably know the one about how Harvey Keitel
got hold of the script for Reservoir Dogs and gave Quentin Tarantino a hand
in finding the money to shoot the film with real actors instead of his
video-store pals.  Stories like these are to Generation X what the story of
Lana Turner getting discovered at the soda fountain were to an earlier
generation.  Being an independent film director/producer/writer is today
what being a movie star was to kids in the Forties, or what being a rock
star was to kids in the Sixties.  It is the coolest thing you could ever
hope to be.  (This side of playing quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys, of
course.)
The real legend of The Blair Witch Project has nothing to do with what may
or may not be lurking in the Maryland woods.  It has to do with novice
filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, and how they turned a few
thousand dollars and a few thousand feet of 16mm footage into the
multimillion dollar blockbuster that's got everyone talking this summer.
The story's familiar to anyone who's caught any part of the tremendous buzz
about this movie; directors Myrick and Sanchez recruited three actors,
equipped them with cameras and sent them into the woods for eight days with
little more than a promise that it might get a little scary for them alone
out there.  Combine this utterly unconventional approach to moviemaking
with the unprecedented positive word-of-mouth that the movie received on
the festival circuit and on the Internet, and it's the sort of story that
would make any aspiring wannabe director sick with envy.
The Blair Witch Project itself isn't as compelling as the story of how the
movie was made, but it's not far behind.  It's a taut, scary horror
thriller, one of the best of an increasingly bad lot of 1999 movies.  (It's
a bit too early to tap as an Oscar contender, but one wishes Oscar would
have a Rookie of the Year category.)
It begins in the most matter-of-fact way possible, with the now-famous
caption:  "In October of 1994, three student film makers disappeared in the
woods near Burkittesville, Maryland. One year later, their footage was
found."  And that's it.  No fancy opening sequence, no list of casting
directors or assistant executive producers, nothing to break the
verisimilitude that all this footage was shot by three kids wandering
around in the forest. (Which most of it was.)
The three kids are Heather, Josh, and Mike, played by Heather Donahue, Josh
Leonard, and Mike Williams.  They've checked out a couple of cameras and an
audio recorder from school, and they're on their way to the town of
Burkittesville (formerly Blair, we're told) to shoot some location scenes
for a documentary on the local legend, whatever it is.  One of the movie's
little conceits is that the trio carries two cameras for two different
purposes.  The actual scenes that they're going to use in the documentary
are shot in black-and-white on a 16mm movie camera.  They're also carrying
along some sort of color camcorder that they mostly use to goof off with.
So, the footage of Heather speaking to the camera in the town graveyard is
in black-and-white, and the footage of the cast relaxing in the
authentically cheesy motel room afterward is in color.
This conceit defines the look of the movie in three important ways.  First,
film from the two cameras is interwoven together, so the movie switches
back and forth from B&W to color more often than the shuttle bus that runs
between Kansas and Oz.  Since both cameras are hand-held most of the time,
the whole movie is herky- jerky enough to cause motion sickness in some
viewers.  And since cameras need light to operate, there are a lot of
scenes that take place either in total blackness or in the eerie glow of a
flashlight.
But the look of the movie isn't what you'll remember, isn't what will keep
you up until the wee hours of the morning.  The hyperbole about The Blair
Witch Project being the scariest movie ever aside, this is a movie that
will scare you.  It may not scare you sitting in the theater.  (Myself, I
didn't think I was all that scared, although it was comforting to have an
aisle seat just in case things got a little too scary.)  But there are
scenes that will stick in your memory, that will haunt you at odd moments
when you're alone in your car or trying to get to sleep or when you hear a
strange noise in the middle of the night.
The Blair Witch Project does not rely on surprise or gore, the two
mainstays of the Hollywood slasher movie.  Instead, it uses the rules of
the campfire ghost story.  Myrick and Sanchez know that fear is contagious,
and they scare their actors silly, knowing that they will transmit the fear
to each other and to the audience.  They also know that they don't need to
show a lot of really scary stuff in the movie, just set up a scary
situation and let the mind fill in the blanks.  (Next time you get the
chance to tell a ghost story at a campfire out in the woods to a group of
kids that hasn't seen the movie, tell the story of the Blair Witch and see
what happens.)
But The Blair Witch Project is more than just a spooky ghost story, thanks
to the work of actors Heather, Mike, and Josh.  There are some drawbacks to
their performance.  They're a bunch of Generation X twits, for one thing.
They wear plaid flannel shirts and whine and moan a lot.  Like Tarantino
characters, they seem to have only two modes of conversation, obscenity and
pop culture references.  ("Did you ever see Deliverance?" one of them asks
as they make their way into the woods.)
They're highly dependent on emotion.  As they wander through the woods with
only a compass, trying to figure out which direction civilization lies, one
of them asks, "How does east feel?"  The ordeal of being lost in the woods
drains them emotionally to the point that they have to stop walking and
have a good cry every once in a while.  (I kept imagining what would happen
if you placed the squad from Saving Private Ryan in a similar situation,
after Normandy, seeing piles of rocks and twigs might not be so bad.)
But these are minor quibbles.  The cast does a great, intense, powerful
job.  There's an unfakable genuineness and sincerity to their
performances.  We're not just being told that they're cold and hungry and
scared, we feel it along with them (the hungry part, especially, given how
much popcorn costs these days).   Their slow, linear descent into the
nether world of psychological disintegration is much scarier than the
things that go bump in the night.
Donahue is outstanding, taking a part that could have been nothing more
than a Jamie Lee Curtis scream queen role and taking it to the next level.
The movie's signature scene is hers, and her brittle, tense, unblinking
delivery will stay with you.  So will the last scenes of the movie, filmed
in this, um... well... place.... with this stuff everywhere... and... well,
I could describe it, but you'll want to see it for yourself without me
spoiling it.
One of the best things about The Blair Witch Project is that even though we
know (or think we know) that Josh, Heather and Mike are doomed, we're still
rooting for them all the way, hoping that they'll find their car and get
back home so Josh can call his girlfriend and so Heather can to turn in the
camera equipment on time.  And as we root for them, we're also rooting for
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, the young geniuses who started with
nothing but managed to spin straw (and twigs, and rocks, and slime) into
gold.  Box office aside, the real success of The Blair Witch Project will
be the hope and inspiration it will give to the next generation of
filmmakers, actors, and screenwriters seeking to become the coolest thing
you can ever hope to be.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers began work on a
documentary about the Blair Witch, a creature of urban legend (ala
Bigfoot or the Loch Ness Monster) which supposedly lives in the woods
outside Burkittsville, Maryland. Laughing at these children's tales,
which many of the townsfolk still believed, the trio entered the woods
in search of material for their 'Blair Witch project.' 
But their story did not vanish along with them: nearly a year after
their disappearance, their film was found by a group of archaeology
students from a nearby university. Using this footage, and only this
footage, filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez have pieced
together an 88-minute account of the trio's last days, revealing an
intimate portrait of an expedition gone horribly wrong. It's a raw,
heartwrenching tale, drenched in slowly mounting paranoia and madness.
Through their own camera lenses, we witness the group's skyrocketing
sense of desperation, as well as their growing alienation from one
another. Things go wrong-- major things, all of which culminate in
their inability to escape from the mysterious entity (or entities)
quietly stalking them in the darkness. 
There's something cathartic about fear--a certain trait which allows
us to put our own lives into perspective. Things could always be
worse, horror movies assure us. Many films have attempted to
capatilize on our love and need for terror over the years-- stories
like Jaws, The Exorcist, Friday the 13th, The Shining, and hundreds
more. Often these movies succeed in giving us a harmless case of
nighttime shivers (and who among us hasn't enjoyed watching horror
movies with our friends, later professing that you weren't really that
scared even though you know deep down that you're lying?), but rarely
do the images stay with us after the sun comes up.  
No film, in fact, has triggered quite the same sensation of impending
doom and crawling flesh that I received from a recent screening of The
Blair Witch Project. This achievement is even more remarkable since
the movie, a small production even by independent cinema standards,
contains no name actors, no special effects, no script, only a handful
of props, and a budget residing somewhere in the 'used car' price
range. 
It's very rare indeed to find a film, any film, which offers not only
a fresh, intriguing premise and superior performances, but also a
complete retooling of the entire filmmaking process. There is no
musical score here, nor smooth, clean editing (the story is presented
as it was shot--with abrupt starts and starts courtesy of the amateur
camera operators). But the movie's biggest surprise is the way that it
doesn't feel like a movie at all: it's more akin to a historical
record, like the infamous Zapruder Super 8 reel which captured John F.
Kennedy's assassination for posterity. 
The movie is ficticious, of course, but you'd never know it. The
performances are so incredibly astounding that the tale could easily
pass for a real documentary (and in fact, it has fooled many viewers).
Of particular note is the incredible Heather Donahue, the leader of
the trio, who flawlessly conveys many complex emotions and, through
her flawless performance, makes us feel them too. She gets the movie's
standout scene, the one that will go down in movie lore ala the shower
scene from Psycho: a mesmerizing monologue, delivered directly to the
camera, in which she begs for forgiveness from her parents and the
families of her two male companions. She believes that she is to blame
for their current hopeless predicament, due to a judgment error made
early in the journey. Heather seems to know, as do we, that time is
running out for the group, and her plea for absolution is so
hardhitting, the look in her eyes so tragic and terrified, that the
viewer can easily be forgived for blinking back involuntary tears of
his or her own. The film's skillful manipulation of the audience's
fear is only accentuated by our knowledge that these precedings cannot
possibly have a happy ending. 
In terms of pure originality, The Blair Witch Project is sheer genius.
It is quite simply the most original approach to filmmaking I've seen
in recent memory, as innovative and disarmingly unique today as
Citizen Kane was upon its release nearly sixty years ago. It's proof
that films don't have to cost a hundred million dollars to be
fascinating. The movie is intense, scary, brilliant, and perhaps the
best film of 1999 thusfar. 
But be warned: much of the story's terror comes not from watching the
events of the story on the screen, but from witnessing them on mental
instant-reply as the clock ticks away the long, early hours of the
morning, when every sound in the darkness of your bedroom could be the
Blair Witch, come to get you. I wasn't particularly scared while
watching the movie. Then I tried to go to sleep an hour later. 
(The Blair Witch Project haunts the suburbs of your psyche on July
30th.) 
---------------
Copyright (c)1999 by Joe Barlow. This review may not be reproduced
without the written consent of the author. 
E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Author
Allan Jenoff
The Blair Witch Project
Directed by:  Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick
Starring: Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael Williams
Running time:  88 minutes
My rating (5 star scale):  **
I have a confession to make.  I scare easily.  I can be scared
by an episode of Charmed.  I can be
scared by books, tv, and movies.  I've read Lord of the Rings a
dozen times and parts of it still spook me.  The Blair Witch 
Project has been touted as a truly scary movie.  A movie which
scares you with your imagination and not expensive special fx.
Now, I agree that kind of scare is the best, but I didn't see
it here.  At most, I found myself occasionally amused and often 
bored.  But never, not for an instant, really scared.
Heather, Josh, and Mike are three would-be documentarians.  They
are making a documentary about the Blair witch, a mythical 
character who haunts the woods near Burkittsville (formerly Blair).
They start by interviewing some locals.  They hear stories about
the witch, a child killer, the mysterious deaths of several men 
and the disappearance of their bodies.  It's all vague and in 
the past and mostly from pretty unreliable sources.  
They head into the woods to camp for a couple of days and film 
some of the sites mentioned in the local legends.  And things
start going wrong.  None of them is very good at reading the map,
which may not be accurate anyway.  There are mysterious noises
in the night.  They find strange piles of rocks and bundles of 
sticks.  They fall behind schedule and start bickering amongst 
themselves.
Since the movie starts by telling us the film footage was 
recovered a year after the events and the three filmmakers 
disappeared, we aren't exactly surprised by the ending.  But 
lots of movies start off by telling you the ending (Sunset 
Boulevard and DOA are two great examples).  They work because
you want to see how the characters get to that point.  That's 
where Blair fails.  
Blair attempts to scare you by convincing you the story is true.
The actors don't recreate events - they are actually living and
filming what you see.  This means some of the scenes are poorly
lit and poorly framed - just as you would expect.  Many of the
events staged were done without the actors' knowledge - so their
reaction is genuine.  All this works, we get a film that looks 
like what it pretends to be.  
Unfortunately, realism isn't enough.  Even documentary film makers
realize they need to have a story as well.  There is an attempt
to create a story here by having us hear the legends and by
having mysterious and unexplained things happen in the woods.  
I think that's where the directors made their mistake.  The 
movie gets closest to scary when the characters squabble 
amongst themselves - not when they think they are confronting 
supernatural beings or rednecks out of Deliverance.  It's that
internal conflict that should have been the focus and that 
might have made this a truly scary film.
Instead, we get a movie with an interesting style.  I can see
why so many critics have praised it.  The directors had an idea 
and followed through well.  And what they have is a well executed
idea that falls short of success.  I saw this at a matinee 
discount and still felt like asking for my money back.  You 
will miss nothing by waiting for this to be available on video.

Author
Frankie Paiva
The Blair Witch Project (R) ** 1/2
Starring Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard
Directed by Daniel Myrick & Eduardo Sanchez
A Review by Frankie Paiva
If there is one film this summer (or any summer for that matter) besides Star
Wars could possibly create more hype than this film I would give it a prize.
What started out as a $35,000 dollar horror movie that could cover the fake
Blair Witch, would turn into a phenomenon. Early buzz out of Sundance had
people calling it the scariest film of all time, Artisan signed it that night
for 1 million, and the launch of the Blair Witch site began. 
Generating a cult months before the movie opens rarely happens, but do to the
fantastic webpage (www.blairwitch.com) which features all of the fake
mythology, it had people hanging on the edge, waiting for the film to be
released. "The film cannot possibly live up to all of the hype that's been
surrounding it." That was a quote from George Lucas about Star Wars, and it's
true here too.
You know the story, three student filmmakers Heather, (Donahue) Michael,
(Michael Williams) and Josh (Leonard) are out to shoot a documentary about the
Blair Witch. Townspeople say she was old Ellie Keyward, accused of witchcraft
she was banished in the 1800s. Every fourty years after that, mysterious things
would happen. Disemboweled fisherman showed up at the river, children started
going missing, and an old man says he was killing children because an old witch
told him so. 
They of course get lost and start hearing weird noises at night. One of the
crew goes missing, and what are all of those strange symbols that they keep
finding all over the forest?
The film does not live up to it's hype. I (and the 25 or so people that I've
talked with that saw it) all agree that is wasn't scary at all. What is hyped
to be the scariest film of all time didn't really inflict one twinge of pure
terror. The camera technique is interesting though, if not sickening, and I'd
like to see more films made that way. However do make sure to get a good
night's rest before seeing the film, the camera shaking didn't make me sick at
all, but it really made me sleepy. No, it's not "Scary as Hell" or is it "An
Instant Classic" but I still reccomend you see Blair Witch which gets ** 1/2
stars.

Author
Jon Ridge
     If youšve been paying attention to the media frenzy that
is THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, and who hasnšt, you know the story
and you know itšs pure dramatization.  Needless to say, though,
watching what has been committed to tape, one gets the undeniable
impression the events are veritable:  three students take hand-
helds into the woods, filming a school project about the myth of
a local witch, and get lost.  No biggie, as the put-upon leader
of their crew, Heather, states rationally, "Itšs hard to get
lost in America, and itšs harder to stay lost."  What starts
out fun and games, so to speak, amongst friends (correct "Gilliganšs
Island" vernacular; Heatheršs mishap with a pair of wet shoes)
quickly becomes something more serious.  Rations dwindle, their
only map disappears, and camaraderie gradually disintegrates into
bickering, nicotine jonesing and total disorientation.  They set
up camp, several times too often, and wake up to vague but ominous
noises just in the distance.  And, thatšs the ingenious thing of
the film:  the heard, yet unseen, proves to be a lot more
terrifying.  Because, try as you may to put whatšs going on into
perspective (twigs snap.. probably a small animal), you still
donšt know for certain.  And, because there is little light for
assistance, you can either stay in one place very quietly and pray,
or make a run for it in the pitch black and take your chances.
During Heatheršs emotionally-draining private confessional for
the camera, she sums this experience up quite nicely: "Išm afraid
to close my eyes, and Išm afraid to open them."
Whatšs also great about the film is its budget.  The point
of view footage is antsy, because the actors get antsy and donšt
know exactly where to look or where theyšre going in the heat of
apparent pursuit.  I think BLAIR WITCH will play even better on
the small screen, because of its aspect ratio and the likelihood
of a more quiet environment; occasionally, I was unable to hear
what the actors were hearing due to an audience loud with throat-
clearing and squeaky seats, and it bugged me immensely.
There is no special effects work, no computer-generated
anything, and mostly no gory close-ups (save for a set of teeth),
which gives the film a great deal of authenticity.  And, what I
like most is the eerie conclusion; that last scene, in an
abandoned, dilapidated house, is nerve-wracking and more than
a little disturbing.  The collective opinion circulating the
net at present is that this scene is too quick, and the film
ends rather abruptly.  Which is true, but thatšs the point.
It is Heatheršs fear and despondence, come to the breaking
point.  After being in the woods for so long, and not knowing
what would ultimately happen to them at any given moment ­ whether
she, or her friends, would make it ­ she and Mike arrive at one
last spot, maze-like and frustrating, and in an instant itšs all
over.  You leave with questions, and want to talk about what
youšve just witnessed with as many people as you can get it in
a room.  Movies that can put you there have done their job; real,
or fake (forget the whole is-it-a-sham-or-not business, already).
That final image ­ you know the one ­ is cryptic and haunting.
I wanted more scenes at night, with ­ not _clearer_ sounds,
but I donšt know, more of them.  Even greater a building of
exhaustion and fear.  The film does not quite go the psychological
distance, but itšs close.  Also, the arguing goes on a little
much for my taste (one fight, over the whereabouts of the map,
turns especially shrill), though such carrying-on is understand-
able, circumstances considered.     
"Scary as hell" no.  Creepy, yes.  Effective, brilliantly-
conceived and executed, and performed with all the conviction in
the world so that even if we doubt what wešre seeing is real,
suspension of disbelief is never an issue:  _oh yeah_.
Best line:  90% improv equals no cleverly constructed
dialogue; I like the reaction Heather has to a shot of scotch (I
hate it, too).

Author
David W Holtzen

For me, a movie like "The Blair Witch Project" comes along every four
or five years. It is the kind of movie that leaves me shaking....with
anger.  Angry that I was pick-pocketed out of $8 at the door (which, it
turned out, was the scariest part of my Blair Witch experience)?
No, angry that I spent an unrecoverable hour and a half of my life on one
of the most vapid, go-nowhere movies I have seen in a long time.
To obtain the most effective fright from any suspense/horror movie, I
walked into "The Blair Witch Project" with little prior knowledge, eyes
wide shut.  I had not visited the movie's website, had only seen the (very
interesting) trailer twice, and had heard secondhand that some critics
*loved* this movie. Thus, I was perfectly (un)prepared for the horrors
which I assumed would be laid out in the three filmmakers' documentary
footage--the remains and the cornerstone of the docu-horror premise. What
I watched instead was 90 minutes of three Gen Xers desperately trying to
find sense where there was none to be found. Once lost in the woods, they
puzzled over mounds of rock, suspiciously placed faggots, various
nighttime sounds, and worst of all how they could walk in a straight line
for 15 hours and wind up in the exact same place. Very, very frequently,
with cameras pointing at each other or into the dark woods of Maryland,
the twenty-something trio screamed and screamed and yelled "fuck" and "oh
fuck" and then screamed some more.  Suspenseful?  The first time. Scary?
Hardly. Annoying? Definately. Toward the end, during one of the many
running, screaming, oh-fuck scenes--long after I realized this dog was
going nowhere and about 5 minutes after one moviegoer in the aisle where I
was sitting left never to return--I cynically wondered if the actors were
screaming "oh fuck", because they realized that they had no script! 
With so many fundamentals missing from "The Blair Witch Project" (I was
unsurprised to learn afterwards that there was indeed no script for this
so-called film!), it is not difficult to see why such an effort fails so
miserably.  Without character development, without professional editing
(in addition to being a yawner, the damn thing was LONG even at 90
minutes), and with a film-as-you go approach, it is little wonder that the
movie finds itself running away from itself. 
The entertainment value of "The Blair Witch Project" comes later, long
after the "I've been had" anger subsides. It's a pathetic, PATHETIC,  
B-movie and laughing about it will no doubt entertain and take the sting
off of being ripped off.  At the viewing I saw in Boston last night (July
17), the audience began its hilarity immediately, during the first
millisecond of the closing credits.  They laughed, they heckled, they
mocked, and I can't help but wonder if they were thinking what I was
thinking:  I know what was in those woods in Maryland.  It was P.T.
Barnum.

Author
Stev Evans
The Blair Witch Project   Dirs: Edward Sanchez and Daniel Myrick. Starring
Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and Joshua Leonard.
The pitch: Three student filmmakers disappear in the forests of rural
Maryland while shooting a documentary about the legendary Blair Witch. A
year later, their footage is found.
This no-budget faux documentary was hyped last summer as the scariest movie
ever made. Don't believe it. Creepy, yes. Scary? See Hitchcock's Psycho.
Blair Witch is mainly nauseating, since the shaky, hand-held camerawork will
make some viewers wish they'd brought a bottle of Dramamine to go with the
popcorn.
The brilliant gimmick behind Blair Witch can be found in the synergy between
the movie and a detailed web site developed by co-director Sanchez. More
than a year ago he posted an elaborate back story about the legend of the
witch, dating to the 18th century. Thanks to market saturation, now almost
everyone knows that this is a work of fiction, an exploitation film, really,
that may eventually become the most profitable movie ever made. The
directors let their actors film the picture during an eight-day shoot in the
forests of a Maryland state park. The result is amateurish at times -- itchy
and scratchy to be sure -- but that's precisely the point. Realism is the
movie's strong suit.
Heather, Josh and Mike think they're terribly cool. And Heather, for one, is
wrapped a little too tight for her own good. She's pushy as hell and that's
what gets the trio in trouble. Making constant quips and mocking the locals
they've come to interview, the students are quite impressed with themselves
and Heather's project  to shoot a documentary tracing the lore of a
murderous spirit. The Blair Witch has supposedly been haunting the woods of
Burkittesville, Md., for two centuries. Heather, the director, keeps a
chronicle of the behind-the-scenes story, shooting everything they say and
do with her Hi8 videocamera. Josh handles the 16mm camera, shooting black
and white film. Mike wields the digital audio tape recorder. Their skills
with film equipment contrast sharply with their incompetence in the woods.
After interviewing the local yahoos about the witch, they venture into the
forest and are lost within a day. About the same time they discover their
predicament, someone or something begins stalking them. Strange totems
appear outside their tent in the morning. Soon they are rabid with fear,
living like hunted animals.
To tell more would be unfair. The buildup to the shocks is slow and
sometimes tedious, as the directors seem to be padding out their footage to
get the picture up to feature length (it runs a scant 82 minutes). But when
the ride starts, grab something and hang on. Ultimately, Blair Witch
succeeds on the basis of what it doesn't show us. The terror builds in our
imaginations as we wonder what is out there, just beyond the range of
Heather's camcorder light. Obviously something terrible will happen  we
know that much from the opening titles. The suspense comes from wondering
what will happen.
The final image, though ambiguous, becomes meaningful if careful attention
is paid during the first half-hour. Subtle clues are peppered throughout the
picture, although there is no definitive explanation before the credits
roll. Stick around after the film. On video, the directors have added about
five minutes of `newly discovered' footage, which consists of the actors
yakking in their tent at night. The conversation is clearly intended to
offer more clues about what happened to Heather, Josh and Mike, though it's
still far from concrete.
Some viewers will not be satisfied by the vague ending. We think there's a
different problem altogether (hey, if this movie can play games with
reality, then so can we): Filmmakers who go into the woods on a witch hunt
ought to have enough sense to pack heat and extra ammo. At Cinema Uprising,
our motto is `be prepared.' If the Blair Witch came a-creeping in the night,
and tried to unzip our tent, well, by gawd we'd be ready. `Say hello to Mr.
9mm,' we'd tell the old hag, or whatever the hell is slinking through the
forest, disturbing our sleep. And pop, pop, pop: No mo' witch. We might not
have enough footage for a feature-length film, but we'd come back with a
cool short subject. And a trophy for the den. Problem is, most campers just
aren't ready for an extended stay in the wilderness. So we wind up with
these herky-jerky horror films instead.
As such, Blair Witch delivers several good jolts for viewers who can stick
with it through the slow beginning. Its real triumph, though, is an
exploration of group dynamics  how three friends slowly unravel in the
woods and turn on each other, clamoring to get away.
Rated R for language. No gore, no onscreen violence, minimal blood.
Cinema Uprising copyright C 1999 by Stephen B. Evans. All rights reserved.
This work may not be reproduced or transmitted in any form, by any means,
without the prior, written permission of the author.

Author
Kent Johnson
All the hype and its resultant backlash have destroyed the conditions
for the kind of pleasant surprise that caused initial reviewers to rave
about this film, but the idea is clever (the film is supposedly found
footage taken by a missing film crew that was investigating the legend
of the Blair Witch) and the execution is reasonably good.
I felt the atmosphere would have benefited from an inclusion of the
town's history, which I hear is what the "The Mythology of the Blair
Witch" program on the SCI-FI Channel is about, but simply showing a
chronology at the beginning of the film (which you can see on-line at
http://www.blairwitch.com/mythology.html ) would have intensified the
mood.  (You can simulate the effect by printing out the chronology and
reading it while waiting in line or sitting inside the theatre so it's
fresh in your mind when the film begins.)
I found the first half of the film better than I expected and my
interest was sustained by the touches of humor, mundane details of the
trip and the banter between the three principals.  In the second half,
since the story was limited by the movie's structure and the filmmaker's
budget, it was obvious there was only so much that could happen and I
started to get a little bored, a little claustrophobic (they're going
around in circles in the same featureless patch of woods) and annoyed by
the characters' constant bickering.  The final shot (or second to final
shot, if you will) *was* rather chilling and while the film didn't
actually scare me, my nerves were a little tense when I left the
theatre.  The film may play back better in your head than it does on the
screen as your imagination edits out the weak parts and intensifies the
creepy ones.
A nice effort for a small film and Worth Seeing.  (Just don't expect to
see "the scariest film ever made.")
[Note 1:  If you're trying to see the film at the Bridge in San
Francisco, get your tickets days in advance.  I had no problem getting
tickets to the Thursday 5:30 show an hour in advance, but the 7:40 and
9:50 shows were already sold out for both that night *and* the next
night .  Later that night I happened to pass the theatre and there was a
huge line for the midnight show -- on a weeknight!  As with any popular
movie in San Francisco, even after you have tickets, get there an hour
in advance in order to get a good seat.)
[Note 2:  If you sit too close to the screen, as I was tipped off by a
friend, the hand-held nature of the photography may make you dizzy and
nauseous.  I was quite a ways back and still had to close my eyes
frequently -- for reasons other than fright!]

Author
Noel Wood
The following review is property of MOVIE CRITICISM FOR THE RETARDED and cannot
be quoted or referenced without proper credit. For more information, go to the
homepage at http://www.homestead.com/mc4tr
First off, a personal note. This is the first film I've reviewed in retarded
mode in a year and a half, since the video store where the concept was born
shut its doors. So if this sucks, bear with me, I'm just trying to be like
Stella and get my groove back. 
The Blair Witch Project. Great fuckin' movie. You heard it here. I don't care
how much buzz and hype is going around, ther is no room for dissenting opinion
in this matter. Blair Witch is amazing. If anyone tells you otherwise, they're
wrong. There's no debating it. 
Why, you ask? Because this is the scariest movie I've seen since Kubrick's THE
SHINING. Because the filmmaking style is so bold. Because you are literally
part of the action. 
If you read my essay ARTHOUSE MOVIES IN FRATHOUSE THEATERS, you know about the
conditions that I saw the film in. People threw shit at the screen, talked
during the whole thing, and basically booed the film. These people failed to
grasp the whole intent of the film. I think I heard someone say "You didn't
even get to see the witch!" as if that were a disappointing issue. I just
wanted to grab the fucker's neck and yell "OF COURSE you didn't see the fucking
witch! THAT WAS THE POINT!" 
Here's some perspective for you. Blair witch was made for about $25,000. That's
roughly one one-thousandth of what a typical Hollywood movie costs to make as a
bare minimum. I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER and THE HAUNTING probably cost
way more, and neither one of them could hope to achieve what this film did so
well. So with $25,000, it's not like we're going to see any amazing special
effects. No computer generated images, no elaborate costumes or make-up jobs,
no explosions, no elaborate sets. We get woods, three scared people, and a
whole bunch of frightening sound effects. We don't HAVE to see the witch. We
don't HAVE to have everything spoon-fed to us. It's a super-fucking-frightening
experience because you are there, in those woods, seeing and hearing what the
actors do. 
Remember the old adage that man's greatest fear is the fear of the unknown?
Well finally that idea is captured on film. After decades of being shoveled
crappy horror movies where we are supposed to be frightened by actually seeing
the antagonist, some people haven't grasped that that's not what's scary. The
human psyche is a much more tender spot to fuck with than the eyes. I was
nervous as shit after the trio realized they were lost, and I wan't even sure
why. Being lost in the woods is a scary thing. Being in the woods at night is
even scarier, especially when there's not a town for miles to provide any
light. EVERY noise seems like an explosion. EVERYTHING is scary in that
situation, so it's especially scary when there's some weird shit going on like
piles of stones arranged around your tent and Christian Death symbols hanging
from trees. You don't know if it's bears or crazy rednecks or child-murdering
witches, and you don't care. 
You know what really scared the shite out of me? The scenes where they turned
the camera off and you only had the audio from the DAT. For the first time in
as long as I can remember, I felt uneasy in a movie theater. I was actually
releived when I realized that day had broken again. Yeah, I knew that the
characters would all be dead by the end, but none of that mattered. I was
there. I was in that tent. I was walking along with Heather and Mike and Josh.
That's how powerful the use of POV in the film was. I wasn't just concerned for
the lives of the characters, I was concerned for my own life. 
And another beautiful thing about this film is that you can tell someone
everything about it and not spoil it for them. It isn't even important that
they all die. You know they're gonna bite the big chicken in the sky by the
end. You can tell basically all the little details to everyone and not ruin the
movie for them. It's the execution of the film that matters. It's all the
little quirks involving the characters and their reactions to the environment.
It's the way the two mediums of Hi-8 video and 16mm black and white are
alternated to give you two different views of what's going on...the reality of
the video camera transposed with the control aspect of the 16mm. There's SO
much going for this film and the way it jars you emotionally that I could talk
for hours. 
And you know what's interesting? As great as this movie is in the theater, it's
going to be even better on video, because the jerky-cam won't be quite as
dramatic, and you won't have the comfort of 500 strangers nearby to lessen your
fear. 
Some people didn't find it scary. Too bad. I pity them, because they are
failing to grasp what true fear is all about. So for you people, have fun
watching the latest slasher films with a singly named psycopath that keeps on
magically rising from the dead. Keep on admiring Jennifer Love Hewitt and her
predictable getways from the forces of evil. Enjoy the newest hack job by the
creator of Dawson's Creek who needs Wes Craven to make anything amount to less
than a 2 hour sack of steaming shit. That stuff's fun, but it's not scary. The
only thing scary about it is that people will continue to pack theaters to see
it. 
As for me, I'm gonna wrap up and check out blairwitch.com to involve myself in
the backstory a bit more and suspend my disbelief a whole lot. And then I might
just see THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT again. 
"If Al Gore invented the internet, then I invented the spell-check."
-Danforth Quayle
HEY! Check out MOVIE CRITICISM FOR THE RETARDED:
http://www.homestead.com/mc4tr

Author
Nick Lyons
Starring: Heather Donahue, Mike Williams and Joshua Leonard
   After months and months of anticipation, Blair Witch has finally gone wide,
playing in more than 1000 screens.  To some, it may be the film you've been
looking for this year, to others, including myself, it's a flawed bone chiller.
   The film begins quite uniquely.  It turns out that 3 people,Heather Donahue,
Mike Williams and Joshua Leonard, went into the forest to do a project on the
mythical Blair Witch, and were never found. The only evidence left of their
trip, was film from an 18mm video camera. The interesting thing about the use
of the camera is the fact that it's 18mm, because it's as if the whole
situation seemed like a reality. Unfortunately it made me a little queezy at
times because it was too jumpy. Motion sickness people beware.
 Another positive note is, that there are no big budget effects or big named
actors to make it a blockbuster, just normal people who act like they do on a
every day basis who get lost in the woods. That itself seperates it from any
other film out there, but with that said, it still feels a bit staged. There
are many unbelivable situations that occur, some of which gets the film lost
itself. For 1 thing, it's highly doubtful anyone would tape themselves when
they're scared to the bone. It just isn't human.
  Many people were saying that the hype would ruin the experience, but it's a
false statement. You are so intensely interested in their venture into the
woods, that you clear you mind of most everything. Not too amny films can put
you in that state. One disappointing thing that I noticed was the lack of
terror. Sure it was chilling to hear blood curling screams in pure darkness,
and eerie sounds, but that's enough to get you frightened. In fact, it spends
more time trying to get to know the character's, that you wind up laughing at
their jokes more than being terrified. Don't get me wrong the characters did a
fine job. We all could relate to the nightmarish time they were having in these
woods, becoming more frightened and paranoid by the minute.
   I have to give credit to the real filmakers though, this film delivers it's
originality. It's not the same old slasher flick, it's a horror film that makes
you cringe in fear at the chilling sounds, pay attention to the intriguing
story, ponder into what is really going on. All these emotions never pop up in
one's mind when they watch a gore infested film. It dares to be different and
doesn't let down.
   By the end, everyone seems to lose it in the audience and on screen. The
film spends a good amount of time building up to the end, where everyone sits
still biting their nails or feeling sick to their stomach, but by then it's
over. It ends so quickly audiences aren't sure what they saw right then and
there until they have a few minutes to think about it. Strange? Maybe, but it's
sure one chill fest, that will be buried in your mind for quite some time,
despite it's unpleasant atmosphere.

Author
Michael J. Zwirn
        Glancing at the calendar, I note that only two weekends remain
before I leave Washington, more or less permanently, for graduate school
in Boston. This means that, barring an unprecedented burst of enthusiasm
for music reviewing, or a completely predictable disinclination to pack,
this will be the final column I write from my home on Capitol Hill. Had I
thought some things through, I could have wound down my tenure here in
Washington with a comprehensive overview of some local bands, or a
best-of-DC list of some sort, but I tend to be a bit haphazard in my
approach, and this column is no different.
        As turns out, summer 1999 will be remembered for my move from
Washington to Boston, for my somewhat-delayed entry into graduate school,
for my grandmother's move to a nursing home in Atlanta, and for a
misbegotten two-month romance that unfortunately coincided with these
other three concerns. It will also be remembered as the summer of The
Blair Witch Project, a film which has cast a long shadow over the past
year, as rumors and buzz began to circulate about the film and its
directors and cast, all of whom are based nearby in Maryland. Washington
is ground zero for what has become a brilliantly orchestrated cult
phenomenon around a movie that cost less than an SUV and is infinitely
more memorable than George Lucas' limp, lukewarm Jedi Knights. By the time
the film finally opened in limited release on the sixteenth of July, I had
become thoroughly immersed in Myrick and Sánchez' artful mythology, and
perhaps read too many reviews and spent too much time on the website. My
internalization of the arcane details on the site, which allowed for a
more nuanced but perhaps less visceral viewing of the tightly edited 82
minutes of film, came at the expense of many hours that I could have spent
working or packing, but I consider it time well spent. So, on July 16th I
was among the first group of filmgoers in Washington to catch The Blair
Witch Project at the frankly crummy Outer Circle theater.
        Is the film good? Yes, very good. Does it live up to the hype? I'm
not certain, and I'm not the best judge of this. I had become so
fascinated with the film and engrossed in the mythology that perhaps I'd
too many reviews, spent too much time on the website, and already
internalized too much of the storyline to be shocked at some of the
details. Perhaps, in fact, I am more in love with the ideas behind the
film than the film itself. There is something so brilliantly simple and 
elegant about a piece of fiction in which the actors don't act, the
directors don't direct, and the dialogue isn't scripted. The mythology 
of the film, which could have become cloying sentiment of the Friday
the 13th variety, is genuinely eloquent and eerily vague enough to be
resonant with its audience. Is the film scary? Assuredly. What is so
remarkable about The Blair Witch Project is that the fear is derived
internally, rather from the outside. We don't see witches, we don't see
dead bodies, we don't see gore. It's what we don't see that makes us
empathize so thoroughly with Heather, Josh and Mike. The stress, the
misery and the loneliness of being lost in the woods, combined with the
steadily more bizarre and terrifying experiences, conspire to slowly drive
the three into a state of continual near-terror. Everyone is on edge and
cracking under the strain of being assailed by an unknown enemy, including
the audience. There is one (well-described) moment when Heather is chasing
something through a ravine, lit only dimly from behind by Josh's camera,
and she lets out a horrified shriek. "Oh my God what is that?" We don't
see anything, and the film is stronger for it. 
        Ultimately, since we see everything through Josh, Heather and
Mike's eyes, The Blair Witch Project differs from the average horror film
(which makes the murderer or villain the central character). Ultimately,
these are your average college kids, which makes them easy to empathize
with, and their occasionally stupid and self-destructive behavior is all
the more heartbreaking because we all do stupid and self-destructive
things. They know arcane pop culture trivia (Cal Ripken, Gilligan's
Island) but can't read maps or interpret a compass reading, and get
blasted before launching into the woods. Josh's laid-back stoner façade
crumbles first, Mike's stolid core tries to stabilize the three, and
Heather's veneer of overconfidence and machisma collapses with
horrifying finality into stark terror. There is no acting per se, so this
is probably the closest we will ever get to watching three human beings
completely collapse on film. The ultimate realness of the three makes this
a rare film in which we genuinely care for characters even when we don't
like them. The ultimate primal fear of getting lost in a dark, strange
forest is something we can all identify with, and many of us 
have experienced under less gruesome circumstances. As the stress of that
situation mounts we find ourselves put in Heather, Mike and Josh's shoes,
looking through their eyes via the cameras. Heather's confession, which
isolates the tears falling from one eye, is utterly gutting in its
heartrending honesty.
        It seems strange to think of directing or cinematography when the
three characters, all novices at filmmaking, are in charge of the cameras
and sound. But the editing and cutting of the film are quite remarkable,
particularly in a final sequence so terrifying that I won't discuss it,
except to say that it ends with one searing image. Splicing 20 hours of
(mostly boring, one supposes) hi-8 video and 16-mm film footage and DAT
audio into a cohesive 82 minute film can't have been easy, but the
amateurish filming occasionally yields moments of stunning fright and
beauty. Did I say beauty? Yes. There is one scene shot in high resolution
black and white through the window of their car as they drive into the
woods that is simply stunning. Some of the film is completely black as
they turn their cameras off in fear, but leave the DAT recorder running,
and those are perversely among the most affecting moments. The final
sequences are edited frenetically and disorientingly, which probably
serves as an accurate reflection of the actors' own terror.
        The art design and sound were the understated keys to this film. 
In the barest and most minimal way, Myrick and Sánchez use bits of wood,
twine and rocks in utterly ingenious ways to create the impression of an
entire forest suffused with an evil presence. It's brilliant. They create
pure terror out of a bundle of sticks tied together with a bit of cloth,
the likes of which could never be equalled with a grandiose Hollywood
budget. The sound is the final piece to the film's shocking success.
Indeed, the soundtrack to The Blair Witch Project alone, absent the
visuals, could be bloodcurdling. In the interest of authenticity and to
preserve the semblence of faux-verité, there is no sound other than the
voices of the actors, the ambient noise of their journey into the forest,
and the horrible wails that reverberate around their campsite in the
middle of the night. Other suspense and horror films rely on garish
violins, spare keyboards or predictably nihilist industrial or metal to
create an atmosphere of fear and tension; The Blair Witch Project's most
frightening moments are audible only through the gasping breaths of the
actors and the crunch of twigs being snapped. 
        It was several weeks before the release of the film that I had the
idea to make a mix tape to interpret some of the elements and moments
depicted in the film. Obviously, I had to watch the movie first, but by
the time I finally saw the film I was dead set on the idea. For the
purposes of this little project I ended up delving into some of the realms
of my collection that are usually side interests outside the broad
category of pop. Pop musicians are great at selling soundtrack albums, but
generally bad at scoring films, and I was trying to create an audio
complement to the film rather than a marketing tie-in. (Indeed I came to
find out shortly after the film was released that there is an album,
called Josh's Blair Witch Mix, allegedly assembled by Joshua Leonard. His
taste leans toward dour and bludgeoning metal and industrial, music too
vulgar to adequately represent the chilling elegance of the film.) I
relied largely on a mix of modern classical, some experimental and
electronic compositions, a few pop selections, and a number of innovative
multimedia and soundtrack pieces, particularly those with an Eastern
European or Middle Eastern flavor for reasons that seemed more aesthetic
than authenic. I was also able to rely on the superlative Blair Witch
Project website for some brief audio and video segments to cut into the
music. The result is a 90-minute cassette, my attempt to represent the
Blair Witch Project experience on tape.
Heather, Josh, and Mike, "Off to the shack? The shanty?" .mov file. A
seemingly jaunty trio shoulder their packs, leave their car behind,
and head into the woods outside Burkittsville, Maryland.
David Byrne, "Ava" (Nu Wage Remix), from the Forestry EP. A lurching
classical piece presciently remixed with jittery proto-trip-hop drums,
borrowed and adapted from Byrne's 1991 theater piece The Forest. 
Taylor & Rifle, "Main theme" from the soundtrack to Amateur. A luminous
orchestral piece with choral vocals, led by a spare piano line, originally
from the 1995 Hal Hartley film soundtrack that also featured the Jesus 
Lizard and Yo La Tengo. Perfectly evokes the scene shot in high-resolution 
black and white through the window of their car as the three embark into
the forests of rural Maryland. 
The Kingdom of Leisure, "Across-the-Bow," from This is the New America. An
echoing, swampy blues riff from the DC-based innovators of tripgrass.
Heather, Josh, and Mike, "Argument" .au file. The three, lost and hungry,
argue bitterly over their location and Heather's leadership.
Peter Gabriel, "Of These, Hope - Reprise," from Passion: Soundtrack to The
Last Temptation of Christ. Peter Gabriel is perhaps the popular musician
best equipped to produce a full soundtrack score, as he did for Scorcese's
Last Temptation of Christ. Passion makes use of remarkable field
recordings from the Middle East, North Africa and Central Asia, giving
them a lush and overwhelmingly engrossing studio veneer. 
Domácí Kapela, "Prizraky" [Phantoms], from Nedęle. Gripping, off-putting
and to Western ears, unspeakably bizarre, this Czech art-rock composition
gives off the impression of Enya and a lost klezmer band trying
desperately to make sense of fuzzy photocopied samizdat transcriptions of
Queensryche. 
Heather, Josh, and Mike, "Are you happy?" .au file. Josh protests
that he's supposed to be at work the next morning; Mike begs the two to
be civil in the unpleasant circumstances.
Dawn Upshaw, "The Girl With Orange Lips," from The Girl With Orange Lips.
>From the 1990 album of the same name, one of a lengthy series of cryptic
and moving poems (by Stephan Mallarmé, Arthur Rimbaud, and others) set
to brief and often jarring classical orchestration. Also features one of
the most astonishing and lyrical cover photographs in my entire
collection. 
Andie MacDowell, "Define Violence," from the soundtrack to The End of
Violence. Wim Wenders' soundtracks for Until the End of the World and The
End of Violence were models for this project, and Andie MacDowell's drily
accusatory rebuke can apply nicely here. Plays over a nice ambient piece
by the film's music director, Ry Cooder.
Duane Eddy, "Trembler" (remix), from the soundtrack to Natural Born
Killers. Trent Reznor, who shows every indication of being a completely
unpleasant human being, nevertheless is a remarkably ingenious manipulator
of sounds and images. Nothing illustrates his gift more effectively than
the jarring, hallucinatory soundtrack to Natural Born Killers, an album
that conveys the message of the film far more effectively than the film
itself. Eddy's rumbling bass guitar introduction is one of the moments on
this tape that still makes my heart stop, even after repeated listens.
Heather, Josh, and Mike, "My God, what is that" .mov file. Heather,
sprinting through a ravine in the middle of the night, lit only from 
behind by the light from Josh's camera, sees something in the distance.
Lauren Hoffman, "Look Like Shit" (4-track demo), from the A Harmless
Little Kiss EP. Hoffman's numb, aching vocals and raw guitar playing are
testimony to the circumstances of the song's recording and a musical
journal for the strain of sleepless nights and grinding terror. One of the
four musicians on this tape I'm privileged to know personally, even if
only from a distance.
Golden Palominos, "Prison of the Rhythm," from the Prison of the Rhythm
EP. Lori Carson's breathy vocals and Anton Fier's frenetic drum
programming conflate sex with God with fear, which isn't quite the point
of the film, but it works in context.
Nine Inch Nails, "Down In It," from Pretty Hate Machine. The best "wind
rushing through a moral vacuum" noises ever made.
Towering Inferno, "Edvard Király," from Kaddish. Maniacal, hysterical
screaming in Magyar, a thumping, ominous bass drum, and what sounds like 
the ghastly looped braying of some tortured donkey. It seemed apt.
Andie MacDowell, "Unintentional Prayers," from the soundtrack to The End
of Violence.
Low, "Below and Above," from Long Division. By Low standards, this is a
spritely little number. By anyone else's standards, Mimi vocals are
icy beauty over the aching, needful simmer of Alan Sparhawk's
carefully chosen guitar notes, doled out sparingly as if the band is
deathly afraid that they don't have enough to reach the end of the song. 
Heather, "Confession" .mov file excerpt. An excerpt from Heather's
midnight confessional.
Aphex Twin, Disc One, Track 11, from Selected Ambient Works Volume II.
Like sonar pinging the depths of the soul.
Kronos Quartet, "Kyrie I," from Early Music (Lachrymć Antiquć). A
haunting piece of Fourteenth Century liturgy that sounds strangely of a
piece with the modern Eastern European masters.
The Moon Seven Times, "My Game," from 7=49. Perhaps m7x's sparest moment,
with Henry Frayne's ringing guitars excised in favor of a dry, thumping
rhythm line that exposes every breath and quaver in Lynn Canfield's
haunting vocals. 
Crime and the City Solution, "Adversary," from the soundtrack to Until the
End of the World. Perhaps the best pop-music soundtrack ever, the Wim 
Wenders soundtrack for Until the End of the World is a seamless
exploration of minor-key dread and pre-millennial desperation. Crime and
the City Solution's "Adversary," a menacing and completely convincing
open letter from predator to prey, is one of the film's perfect
matches of music to visuals. 
Tama Renata, "Screaming Pipes/Haka," from the soundtrack to Once Were
Warriors. The Maori haka is a ritual chant and dance designed to
intimidate, belittle and terrify tribal enemies on the field of battle. In
Lee Tamahori's frightfully authentic and visceral South Auckland slums,
the embrace of this warrior tradition is both a rallying call and a deadly
siren song. 
Moby, "New Dawn Fades," from I Like to Score. A dense, ominous and searing 
Joy Division cover with a darkly moving vocal from Moby himself.
Forgiveness, "Kol Nidrei," from The Jewish Alternative Movement: A Guide
for the Perplexed. Groaning with the weight of four thousand years of sin
and repentance, this interpretation of the classical Sephardi liturgical
motif from the Yom Kippur service sounds like it could have been performed
in a dark, dank woods itself. It's also my musical elegy for Joshua
Leonard and his undisclosed but presumably dire fate.
Balanescu Quartet, "East," from Luminatza. A jittery chamber piece that
leaps from a buzzsaw cello introduction into a bracing, cutting violin
finale.
Lanterna, "Turbine," from Lanterna. A clattering, churning, surging 
instrumental from Moon Seven Times guitar wizard Henry Frayne. 
Heather, "Confession" .mov file. When The Blair Witch Project is
examined in retrospect, this scene and the mindbending finale will be 
the landmarks that guarantee its place in cinema legend.
Sugar, "Tilted" excerpt, from the Beaster EP. Bob Mould's tortured Jesus
Christ imagery scales new heights in this swirling, anguished piece of
feedback and sampled demogoguery.
Kate Bush, "Army Dreamers," from The Whole Story. Perhaps an atypical
piece for this collection, but I find the contrast between the lilting
guitar and vocal lines and the stately waltz rhythms, and the mournful
lyrics, remarkably effective.
This Mortal Coil, "Fyt," from It'll End in Tears. A rare instrumental from
Ivo-Watts and his assembled 4AD minions. Murky, lurching and resonant with
dread. 
Nine Inch Nails, "March of the Pigs," from The Downward Spiral, intercut
with "News Reporter" .mov file. Despite the remarkable variety of noises
that Trent Reznor manages to coax from his formidable arsenal of machines,
instruments and computers, he's perhaps at his best when he uses silence 
as a weapon instead of bombast.
Towering Inferno, "The Rose II," from Kaddish. An otherworldly vocal in
Magyar by Márta Sebastyén and an eerie poem in English over Richard
Wolfson and Andy Saunder's liquid synthesizers. "This sky will cover you
when you fall down."
Loveliescrushing, "Bones of Angels" excerpt, from Beneath the Icy Floe: A
Projekt Sampler Vol. 4. Perhaps surprisingly, the moody synthesized goth
stylings of the Projekt bands didn't altogether suit this compilation, but
Loveliescrushing's ghostly reverie fits here nicely. 
Mystery Machine, "Pound for Pound," from Decadence: Nettwerk Records boxed
set. It's to the credit of this innovative band from Vancouver that I
can't pin down their sound as dizzying rock guitar with progressive metal 
leanings, blistering punk, twitching indie or soaringly anthemic. This
song from the Nettwerk box set me in search of their other work
immediately.
Moby, "God Moving Over the Face of the Waters (edit)," from Everything is
Wrong. Perhaps the most stunning of Moby's richly orchestrated keyboard
pieces, this staggeringly beautiful eight minute piece has also found a
home on the soundtrack to Heat and in a range of additional contexts. 
Lisa Germano, "...callin'," from On the Way Down from the Moon Palace.
Perhaps it's the optimist in me that reached for a vaguely elegaic
minute-long violin and guitar piece to close this album, promising a
gentler end than Heather, Josh and Mike ever found.

Author
Homer Yen
It's been a few weeks since this much-talked about film has been
released.  I've heard how critics have labeled this as the scariest
movie in the last 20 years.  I've heard how much the material is
unsettling.  And, I've heard that many people suffer headaches after
watching this film because the footage is shot using hand-held cameras
and thus the picture is shaky.  And after absorbing all of these tales,
a general sense of eerieness began to stir within my stomach.  I became
more curious to know about the Blair Witch Project, yet I was also
afraid at the same time.  This fear was probably caused by a
combination of anticipation and anxiety that manifested within mind.
When you don't know what to expect but only know that it's something
that can only be tremendously frightening, that's the most intense fear
that you can have.  It eats you, it taunts you, and it drives you mad. 
In `BWP,' three students shooting a documentary mysteriously disappear
in a heavily wooded area in western Maryland.  A year later, the video
footage is found, and the events that you see are supposedly the last
days that the students were ever seen again.  Heather, Josh and Mike
are all excited to be a part of this project.  It should only be a day
or two of interviews with the local denizens of a small town where the
Blair Witch myth has had the most resonance.  After that, the three
would travel into the woods to see if there's any evidence to
substantiate the statements made by the local folks.  Most of the
townsfolk dismiss the Blair Witch as just folklore with no basis in
fact.  But they do come across a few that are more cautious with their
statements.  `I don't really believe in her, but I do believe enough in
her to know not to go into those woods,' one woman says.  Another
eccentric woman tells of how she once saw the witch and described her
as a haggardly old woman covered with fur that seemed to float on air. 
The Blair Witch may be nothing more than fodder for tabloid newspapers
or perhaps a story similar to that of Bigfoot.  Nonetheless, the three
pack up their gear, and begin to explore the deep woods where the Blair
Witch is said to roam.
Their situation quickly worsens.  They lose the map, they begin to hear
unexplainable sounds in the dead of night, and when they wake up they
find evidence that someone has been there.  After much pleading by a
frightened Josh and Mike, Heather believes that the best thing to do is
to leave.  But no matter what they do, they seem to always make the
wrong choice.  They walk around in circles as they fall short on
supplies as well as morale.  Soon, they fear that they are being hunted
by something unseen.  The fright factor begins to quickly escalate as
each one slowly turns on one another and as each begins to lose their
own sanity.  Fear is slowly settling in, and the transformation is
utterly disturbing.
What makes their fear that much more gripping is that they have no idea
what's out there.  The otherwise pristine woods transforms into an
unsettling landscape as branches cast strange shadows, the leaves
ruffle in a most disconcerting way, and the howling wind sounds like
cries of help possibly from the tortured victims of the Blair Witch. 
Their flashlights can not see far enough into the distance.  When they
run, the cameras are focused at the ground, which doesn't allow the
audience to see where they are going.  This is equally frustrating and
frightening.  Like me, their fear was probably caused by a combination
of anticipation and anxiety that manifested within their minds.  Is
there really anything out there?  No one can be really sure. 
Regardless, I found myself turning my head several times to avoid
seeing what was on the screen.
With its documentary-like style, the plight of the students (though
completely fictional) seems very real, as does the fear that they (and
the audience) experience.  Unlike conventional scary movies like
`Scream' where scenes allow us to shriek in delight, the audience
uttered not a sound  complete dead silence.  The film is not about the
Blair Witch itself, but rather how fear overtakes us, strips us of our
sanity, and reduces us to shriveling weaklings.  It's haunting, it's
frightening, it's gripping and it deserves a strong recommendation. 
But be warned, for even now I am still chilled by the film.

Author
Jamie Peck
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Artisan Entertainment / 1:27 / 1999 / R (language, intensity)
Cast: Heather Donahue; Michael Williams; Joshua Leonard
Director: Daniel Myrick; Eduardo Sanchez
Screenplay: Daniel Myrick; Eduardo Sanchez
In a day when cities never sleep and the crime rates in them soar, the
woods would seem to offer nature's last refuge, a simple, reassuring
solace from the hectic hustle and bustle of the real world. But along
comes "The Blair Witch Project," this year's Little Movie That Could, to
promptly and potently shoot that notion out of the water. If "Blair
Witch" breaks out - and robust pre-release buzz certainly suggests that
it will - expect weekend camping trips to become a thing of the past.
You won't be able to sleep soundly in your own bed. Kiss the wilderness
goodbye forever.
An exercise in mounting dread set in the murky "Black Hills" of
Maryland, "The Blair Witch Project" was the hot ticket at this year's
Sundance Film Festival, inspiring additional screenings and even a
studio bidding war as a result of the blazingly positive word-of-mouth -
raves that must have blindsided the first-time filmmakers of this
impressive independent feature. They are Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez, and their directorial debut - cleverly spun as if the story
actually happened and shot on 16mm and home video to further hit the
horror home - is clearly one to remember. As if you'll be able to forget
it.
Know this going in - that "Blair Witch" is a purely fictional creation -
and the impact is perhaps lessened a bit; to make up for any potential
viewing drawbacks, just assure friends that the events displayed here
are factual, drag them along and watch them squirm. Which isn't to say
that those in the know won't get a mean case of "Witch" willies - the
three main performers in Blair are so authentic that it's easy to
believe in the on-screen dread they expertly convey. Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard never strike false notes as student
filmmakers interviewing the yokels and exploring the terrain of
Frederick County in their quest to document the existence of a local
urban legend.
Unfortunately for them, their trek into the forest takes exceedingly
nasty turns - the less said of which the better. Worth noting: The
movie's concise mythology might leave you craving more. As tension
slowly, steadily builds over "Blair Witch"'s 87-minute run,
disagreements and skirmishes amongst the trio grow in both number and
anxiety, often escalating to shouting matches studded with various
expletives. Realistic, yes, and also redundant. But once "Project" kicks
into high gear for its final third - a non-stop stomach-churner -
there's little time for the cast to catch their breath enough to scream,
let alone swear.
Even with this intense noise-making, genre fans expecting an all-out
splatterfest are sure to be disappointed: "The Blair Witch Project,"
proudly respecting the power of the unseen, assaults the mind with
psychological terror instead of the eyes with explicit gore. Following
suit, Myrick and Sanchez also keep their ghastly antagonist completely
in viewers' imaginations for the duration of the film. Whether it's
intentional or merely a side effect of "Blair Witch"'s shoestring
budget, this game of no-show is a smart, sensical move - and the key to
the movie's scary success.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Author
Kent Johnson
"Eyes Wide Shut" also has a wonderful cast. Tom Cruise eschews his trademark
boyish smile (except for the opening scenes) for long stares usually at a low
angle (A Kubrick motif). His slow descent into anger is thrilling to watch, and
one of his most quixotic moments of his career is when he confronts his friend
Ziegler and discovers the true nature behind his own adventurous and nocturnal
activities. 
Nicole Kidman has become a first-rate actress, and her mood swings are
something to behold. I also liked her laughing fit at Bill's remarks that he
would not sleep with his patients - when was the last time that a character
laughed at Tom Cruise? Her final moment of realization about their marriage is
stunning - this woman should be nominated for an Oscar. 
Also worth mentioning is Sydney Pollack's quietly decadent millionaire
character Ziegler - he is more fierce and yet just as restrained as he was in
"Tootsie" or "Husbands and Wives." Vinessa Shaw displays a sweetness and
sexiness not often seen on the silver screen, and she plays a prostitute! Rade
Serbedzija ("Before the Rain") has one of the sole moments of comic relief as
the owner of the Rainbow, a costume shop, who asks the good doctor for advice
about his balding spot. Todd Field is also engaging as the piano player Nick
Nightingale who plays blindfolded at some musical events. 
If I have one or two gripes about Kubrick's long, difficult and splendid film,
it is the abrupt ending and the inclusion of a character that would have been
better omitted or replaced by a different actor. The ending is optimistic (a
rarity in any of his films) but somehow feels rushed. Still, this is among the
late master's finest films, preferable to the pretensions of "The Shining" or
"Full Metal Jacket." "Eyes Wide Shut" easily stands among such giants as "A
Clockwork Orange," "Paths of Glory" or "2001." It is a bizarre, strangely
moving and enlightening film guaranteed to provoke as much controversy as
anything he's ever done. Stanley, you may be gone, but we are glad you came
back with one of the best films of your career.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, comments, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com
or jerry@movieluver.com

Author
Kevin Patterson
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
Rating: ***1/2 (out of four)
R, 1999
Directors/Screenplay: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Starring Cast: Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael Williams
Almost everyone predicted that cinema in 1999 would be the year of 
Lucas and Kubrick, but few would have guessed ahead of time that one 
of the most talked-about films of the year after THE PHANTOM MENACE 
and EYES WIDE SHUT would be a micro-budget horror film called THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT. The film was made (do I even need to repeat this 
story?) on a budget of $37,000 and boasts an intriguing premise: it 
claims to be the footage, only recently discovered, shot by three 
film students who disappeared in the woods near a small town called 
Burkittsville while making a documentary about the local legend of 
the "Blair Witch." This is, of course, a piece of fiction, though 
reportedly much of what we see was improvised on the spot by the 
three actors (Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams, 
all using their real names), who really did shoot the footage 
themselves and who were given only a broad outline by co-writers and 
directors Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Since the scenes were filmed by the actors, with the directors 
waiting off-camera and out of sight, there are no special effects or 
scenes of gruesome murder in THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, and the witch 
herself never actually appears on-screen. The "horror" rests instead 
on slowly escalating psychological tension, as the students become 
lost in the woods, their map disappears, and unseen menaces seem to 
draw nearer. They seem to be surrounded by strange noises at night 
whose origins they cannot determine, and in the morning, 
ominous-looking stick figures made of twigs and leaves are found 
outside their tent. One night, children's voices are heard outside 
and their tent suddenly collapses on them, but when they run outside, 
there is no one in sight. As their situation grows more desperate, 
they start to turn against each other and lay blame for their 
predicament, mostly on Heather, who had conceived of the project and 
who insisted beyond all reason that they were not lost.
John Carpenter said once that horror revolves around the loss of 
control, and Myrick and Sanchez seem to understand that. Until the 
last five minutes, the overall effect of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is 
more disturbing than it is "scary" in the way the word is typically 
understood. Since none of the apparent supernatural elements are ever 
witnessed on screen, there are very few moments that are likely to 
make the audience jump out of their seats in fright. Instead, we come 
to empathize with the three characters as they endure day after day 
that is dominated by fear and confusion; what the film lacks in 
visceral thrills is compensated for by the human tragedy that plays 
itself out. Towards the end, Heather records a tearful apology to 
Josh's and Mike's families as well as her own and accepts 
responsibility for the untimely end which she knows they will soon 
meet. This scene is matched in power perhaps only by the final five 
minutes, which will truly scare many viewers witless and which end 
with an ambiguous but unsettling visual that will not easily be 
forgotten.
All three performers pull off their roles almost flawlessly. Heather 
is perhaps the most interesting of the trio, as her later need to put 
some sort of emotional distance between herself and the increasingly 
grim situation accounts partly for the fact that the entire ordeal is 
caught on camera. Even when they are hopelessly lost and running out 
of food, she insists that they keep filming, and Josh, who had 
earlier screamed at her to turn the camera off, later takes a look 
through the lens and tells her he understands, because watching 
through the camera rather than through one's own eyes is "not quite 
reality." She is also the most flawed of the three, as it was her 
initial overconfidence that led indirectly to their predicament. Both 
Josh and Mike are also quite believable and sympathetic, though the 
way in which one of them is revealed as being responsible for the map 
disappearing doesn't really work: it strikes me as an amazingly 
boneheaded stunt, however frustrated the guilty party may have been.
I don't know if there's really much of a theme or a point to THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT aside from some fairly routine "humankind's 
arrogance in overstepping its boundaries" implications. It's a story 
that exists mostly for its own sake, as an experiment in blending two 
cinematic approaches that are usually incompatible, i.e. the 
supernatural thriller and the verisimilitude of a pseudo-documentary. 
On this level, however, it does definitely succeed. There is never 
the sense that we are watching actors perform a scene, and the 
supernatural elements are necessarily implied rather than shown (an 
appearance by a CGI-rendered Blair Witch would have turned the whole 
thing into a long joke with a bad punchline). The key to the film's 
success is the realization that, for the most part, stories sink or 
swim with their characters. By giving the protagonists center stage 
and keeping the spooks off-screen, Myrick and Sanchez have made THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT into a film that is not only disturbing and 
occasionally downright chilling, but tragic and empathetic as well. 
It's a bold debut, and I would be surprised if I see a better horror 
film any time soon.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick.
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
1999 - 87 minutes (opens July 16, 1999 in limited release; July 30 
wider)
Rated R (for profanity and intensity).
Reviewed April 5, 1999.
"On October 21, 1994, Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael 
Williams hiked into the Black Hills Forest to shoot a documentary film 
on a local legend called 'The Blair Witch,' and were never seen again. 
One year later, their footage was found."
This is the title card that appears at the start of "The Blair Witch 
Project," a film made on a microscopic budget by first-time 
writer-directors Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick that probably caused 
more of a stir with audiences than any other motion picture that was 
showcased at this year's Sundance Film Festival.
What follows is that footage that was ultimately found in the forest, 
meticulously edited together from the 16mm and video formats they used 
to shoot it on. Set up as a sort of pseudo-documentary, "The Blair Witch 
Project" begins with the three aforementioned Montgomery College 
students preparing for their trip to Burkittsville, Maryland, home of 
the legendary Blair Witch who, as the people they interview in the town 
tell it, lives within the Black Hills Forest and murdered a string of 
children in the 1940's. Playfully shrugging off such horrific stories, 
the headstrong Heather, constantly with a Hi-8 video camera in her hand 
and using a map and compass, leads Joshua (who is filming with a grainy 
black-and-white 16mm camera) and Michael (who is there to pick up the 
sound) deep into the woods for what is supposed to be a simple 2-day 
excursion. It doesn't turn out that way, however, as they ultimately 
never make it back to their car on the second day and are forced to set 
up camp another night. Faint footsteps are heard, and the next day, they 
discover voodoo dolls and eerie symbols hanging over the trees. As the 
days pass by, their food begins to dwindle, the pitch black, freezing 
nights grow more and more intense and threatening as increasingly loud 
cackling noises and screams are heard, and they become hopelessly lost 
within the mouth of the forest, the three students are forced to come to 
terms with themselves and reconstruct their vision of what raw, 
unadulterated horror really is.
When was the last time you've been scared by a movie? No, strike that. 
When was the last time you have been so completely and utterly horrified
 by a motion picture that, when the end credits began to roll, you were 
left curled up in your chair, literally shaking, and filled with so many 
strong emotions that you weren't quite sure how to decipher it all? If 
your answer was never (which it most likely was), look no further than 
"The Blair Witch Project," which is a horror film like no other. It is 
not another manufactured and slick "Scream"-style flick, but a true 
horror movie, one drenched in such a thick, smothering veil of 
hopelessness and dread, not to mention utter realism, that it finally 
stops becoming merely a "movie" and is transformed into something that 
means more, as if you are watching a true-to-life documentation of the 
terror three students fell face-to-face upon on that fateful, chilly 
October week before they disappeared without a trace.
Also, unlike any other film I have ever seen, "The Blair Witch Project" 
is constantly shown from the point-of-view of one of the characters, 
since the movie is made up of the footage they filmed. This cinema 
verite style of filmmaking adds to the constant feeling that what you 
are watching is not fiction, but genuinely authentic, as it puts the 
viewer smack dab in the middle of the absolute nightmare. Jittery, 
shaky, and hand-held, the camera ultimately takes on a life all its own, 
used as a sort of metaphor for the off-kilter frame-of-mind the 
characters are forced to obtain as their spirits diminish and they start 
to question whether they will survive their dire, to say the least, 
ordeal.
To put it bluntly, there is no acting in "The Blair Witch Project." 
There is, since Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and Joshua Leonard 
are playing characters (despite have the same names), but what I mean is 
that there isn't a minute, a second, or even a frame where you can ever 
catch the actors "acting." Their entirely believable performances which, 
for the most part, were improvised for the eight days they spent in the 
woods, are mindblowing, to say the least. As the character of Heather 
starts off as a confidant young woman, and the leader of the group, she 
gradually finds that this feeling of always being right is only a facade 
to hide her own weaknesses and fears for the future. As Heather, as well 
as Michael and Joshua, slowly break down, becoming vulnerable and beyond 
frightened, they have nothing to do but pray that they will make their 
way out of the seemingly endless wilderness before whatever really is 
out there gets them. In a late scene, filled more power and truthfulness 
than I can remember in any other film I've ever seen, Heather, centering 
the camera directly on her right eye and nose, pours all of her emotions 
out, confessing to the faults of her own life, apologizing to her 
family, her comrades' families, her friends, and finally, making peace 
with herself. 
To see "The Blair Witch Project" is not to simply watch it, but to 
experience it. No film in recent memory has shocked me, petrified me, 
unsettled my spirits, and left me so enthusiastic afterwards, making me 
want to discuss and share the picture with others. After rustling 
through so many recent turkeys, "The Blair Witch Project" has reminded 
me why I love the sacred medium of film, and why I want to dedicate my 
life to it. Writer-directors Sanchez and Myrick have thrust upon the 
world a motion picture with more promise, originality, and excitement 
than I can remember, and as a horror film, without any actually physical 
gore or even violence, it is more unsettling, atmospheric, devastating, 
and unforgettable than I ever, in my wildest imagination, expected a 
film could possibly be.
Note: This review will appear soon on 
Dustin Putman's Film 
Haven.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
RATING: 10/10 - ALTERNATIVE RATING: A
"On October 21, 1994, Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams
hiked into the Black Hills Forest to shoot a documentary film on a local
legend called 'The Blair Witch,' and were never seen again. One year later,
their footage was found."
This is the beginning of one of the greatest achievements in the horror
genre and a wonderful step away from the well known blood-and-gut-clishes.
'Blair Witch' set a box office record of having the highest profits per
screen than any film has had before (Previous holder was Star Wars Episode
1).  While all good sense suggests that only an experienced and acclaimed
director would venture into something as controversial and original, this is
not the case. This instant classic is created by two totally unknown
directors and three unknown actors, sculptured from a $20.000 budget.
What follows the chilling prologue, is the footage that was ultimately found
in the forest, meticulously edited together from the 16mm and video formats
they used to shoot it on. Set up as a sort of pseudo-documentary about three
high school teens that venture into the woods to visit the sites of certain
grisly events.What starts as a fun outing in the woods, turns into hell.
Before long, they get the sense that someone or something is playing games
with them. And when their map disappears and their compass stops working,
panic sets in...
"The Blair Witch Project" works, not only because of its original and unique
style of production, but because the three central actors create believable,
authentic characters. Acting is on a totally different level, than you get
used to after watching too many "Scream"- features. Their entirely
believable performances which, for the most part, were improvised for the
eight days they spent in the woods, are mind-blowing, to say the least. This
combination of incredible acting and superior production design, create an
incredible realistic effect. While watching the film, not for a single
moment will you doubt in the authenticity of characters and events
displayed.
There is no severed limbs or flowing blood in 'Blair Witch', which plays on
a much higher intellectual level than most of the films in its genre.
Although the film is made as a bad homemade movie, it reveals a lot of
information, without seeming to.  It's beautifully directed as it shifts
from terror and panic to plain old apathy and flat out exhaustion. And again
resuming that high level of panic, as the characters realize that it is the
end, wonderfully displaying a very natural psychological evolution of
characters.
As Heather, as well as Michael and Joshua, slowly break down, becoming
vulnerable and beyond frightened, they have nothing to do but pray that they
will make their way out of the seemingly endless wilderness alive. In a late
scene, filled with and incredible power and truthfulness, Heather, centering
the camera directly on her right eye and nose, pours all of her emotions
out, confessing to the faults of her own life, apologizing to her family,
her comrades' families, her friends, and finally, making peace with herself.
There are times when there is nothing but a black screen, and all we can do
is listen to their scared voices and the unexplained noises going on around
them. The true horror behind this film is the unknown, and those dark places
where you know something is lurking.
The witch is never actually shown. This mystic creature somehow represents
all our fears for the unknown. It may be a frightening story we might have
heard and remembered, a UFO we think we have seen or something else -
personal and intimate. As any little kid knows, it is the noise in the dark
that is scarier than whatever is really out there making the noise.  The
human mind can imagine more in any given point in time than anyone could
ever put on screen.
'The Blair Witch Project' doesn't need any digital monsters or special
effects. This movie taps into the raw nerves of basic emotional
response.(One of the reasons "Deep Blue Sea" never achieved the high
professionalism of "Jaws"). The film is frightening because every audience
member relives his deepest fears once again while watching it.
Whether this film has lived up to its hype, you can judge for yourself, but
one fact remains: Eduardo Sánchez (II) and Daniel Myrick have created an
instant classic and certainly one of the most ambitious and interesting
films of the year.
Written by Alex Ioshpe 

Author
DeWyNGaLe
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Legends are something that are extremely popular to tell these days.  As we
learned in 1998's Urban Legend (A), there are many legends which may come true
and there are some that are just legends.  The Blair Witch Project is another
movie about a legend, and if it is true, these three kids could be in a lot of
trouble.  At the beginning of the film, we learn that three students
disappeared while making a documentary film in 1994.  One year later, their
footage was found.  Obviously, they did run into trouble while making their
documentary.
The film is setup to look like it is real, so therefore the character's names
are the same as the actor's names.  Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and
Joshua Leonard are the three students we learned about on the title card.  The
three are making a documentary about "The Blair witch", a witch that supposedly
roams the woods of Burkittsville, Maryland.  The entire film is the footage
that the three shot out in the woods while trying to complete the documentary. 
The footage explains the disappearance of the three and what lead up to a very
scary story.
The Blair Witch Project is filmed in a very interesting way.  The entire movie
is filmed through a hand-held camera, to add to the feel of this being a true
story.  (Which, by the way, it isn't.)  Sometimes the camera isn't very clear
and we, "the viewers" cannot tell what is being shown.  The filming through the
hand-held camera adds to the scariness of the film, especially at night when it
is hard to tell what is going on, and you must rely on sound to let you know
what is happening.
It was very hard for me to rate The Blair Witch Project.  After the film was
over, I was left very confused, and I couldn't unscramble what I thought of it.
 Still, I am uncertain if B' is what I want to give this film.  I am split
fifty-fifty on this film.  As I think about the film more and more, I like it
more and more.  Then there is another part of me that says the film could have
been much, much better.    
During the film, I was scared to death.  The first half didn't scare me, but in
the last thirty or forty minutes, it really picked up and completely blew me
away.  The fear was only there during the film though, and afterwards I didn't
feel scared or worried about what happened in the film.  The thing that added
to the scariness the most was the simplicity of it.  This just proves you don't
need special effects or blood to make a movie scary.  It isn't all scares in
The Blair Witch Project.  There are a lot of laughs too, especially during
interviews the three conducted on townspeople about the Blair witch.  It is
also very saddening.  If it wasn't so real to life, it wouldn't be as sad, but
the film did seem like real life. 
I must say that this film is the most realistic film I have ever seen in my
life.  The performances add to that statement very much.  Heather, the main
character, in particular did an outstanding job of acting.  It did not feel
like she was acting at all.  I hope that the Academy thinks of her next year
when they come up with their nominations.  Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
are both great in the film as well, it just so happens we don't see them as
much as Heather.
All in all, The Blair Witch Project was a good film.  The actors were all first
time actors, and the director was a first time director as well.  Considering
that and the low budget, it is extraordinary.  It was nice to get away from the
slasher genre and go into the psychological genre of movie, but the film didn't
use its potential to its fullest.  If they had added about twenty minutes of
more scary footage, this could have been one of the best films ever.
The Bottom Line- This project is incomplete.
